Sample text for The thirteenth tale : a novel / Diane Setterfield. Bibliographic record and links to related information available from the Library of Congress catalog Copyrighted sample text provided by the publisher and used with permission. May be incomplete or contain other coding. Counter The Letter It was November. Although it was not yet late, the sky was dark when I turned into Laundress Passage. Father had finished for the day, switched off the shop lights and closed the shutters; but so I would not come home to darkness he had left on the light over the stairs to the flat. Through the glass in the door it cast a foolscap rectangle of paleness onto the wet pavement, and it was while I was standing in that rectangle, about to turn my key in the door, that I first saw the letter. Another white rectangle, it was on the fifth step from the bottom, where I couldn't miss it. I closed the door and put the shop key in its usual place behind Bailey's Advanced Principles of Geometry. Poor Bailey. No one has wanted his fat gray book for thirty years. Sometimes I wonder what he makes of his role as guardian of the bookshop keys. I don't suppose it's the destiny he had in mind for the masterwork that he spent two decades writing. A letter. For me. That was something of an event. The crisp-cornered envelope, puffed up with its thickly folded contents, was addressed in a hand that must have given the postman a certain amount of trouble. Although the style of the writing was old-fashioned, with its heavily embellished capitals and curly flourishes, my first impression was that it had been written by a child. The letters seemed untrained. Their uneven strokes either faded into nothing or were heavily etched into the paper. There was no sense of flow in the letters that spelled out my name. Each had been undertaken separately -- M A R G A R E T L E A -- as a new and daunting enterprise. But I knew no children. That is when I thought, It is the hand of an invalid. It gave me a queer feeling. Yesterday or the day before, while I had been going about my business, quietly and in private, some unknown person -- some stranger -- had gone to the trouble of marking my name onto this envelope. Who was it who had had his mind's eye on me while I hadn't suspected a thing? Still in my coat and hat, I sank onto the stair to read the letter. (I never read without making sure I am in a secure position. I have been like this ever since the age of seven when, sitting on a high wall and reading The Water Babies, I was so seduced by the descriptions of underwater life that I unconsciously relaxed my muscles. Instead of being held buoyant by the water that so vividly surrounded me in my mind, I plummeted to the ground and knocked myself out. I can still feel the scar under my fringe now. Reading can be dangerous.) I opened the letter and pulled out a sheaf of half a dozen pages, all written in the same laborious script. Thanks to my work, I am experienced in the reading of difficult manuscripts. There is no great secret to it. Patience and practice are all that is required. That and the willingness to cultivate an inner eye. When you read a manuscript that has been damaged by water, fire, light or just the passing of the years, your eye needs to study not just the shape of the letters but other marks of production. The speed of the pen. The pressure of the hand on the page. Breaks and releases in the flow. You must relax. Think of nothing. Until you wake into a dream where you are at once a pen flying over vellum and the vellum itself with the touch of ink tickling your surface. Then you can read it. The intention of the writer, his thoughts, his hesitations, his longings and his meaning. You can read as clearly as if you were the very candlelight illuminating the page as the pen speeds over it. Not that this letter was anything like as challenging as some. It began with a curt "Miss Lea"; thereafter the hieroglyphs resolved themselves quickly into characters, then words, then sentences. This is what I read: I once did an interview for the Banbury Herald. I must look it out one of these days, for the biography. Strange chap they sent me. A boy, really. As tall as a man, but with the puppy fat of youth. Awkward in his new suit. The suit was brown and ugly and meant for a much older man. The collar, the cut, the fabric, all wrong. It was the kind of thing a mother might buy for a boy leaving school for his first job, imagining that her child will somehow grow into it. But boys do not leave their boyhood behind when they leave off their school uniform. There was something in his manner. An intensity. The moment I set eyes on him, I thought, "Aha, what's he after?" I've nothing against people who love truth. Apart from the fact that they make dull companions. Just so long as they don't start on about storytelling and honesty, the way some of them do. Naturally that annoys me. But provided they leave me alone, I won't hurt them. My gripe is not with lovers of the truth but with truth herself. What succor, what consolation is there in truth, compared to a story? What good is truth, at midnight, in the dark, when the wind is roaring like a bear in the chimney? When the lightning strikes shadows on the bedroom wall and the rain taps at the window with its long fingernails? No. When fear and cold make a statue of you in your bed, don't expect hard-boned and fleshless truth to come running to your aid. What you need are the plump comforts of a story. The soothing, rocking safety of a lie. Some writers don't like interviews of course. They get cross about it. "Same old questions," they complain. Well, what do they expect? Reporters are hacks. We writers are the real thing. Just because they always ask the same questions, it doesn't mean we have to give them the same old answers, does it? I mean, making things up, it's what we do for a living. So I give dozens of interviews a year. Hundreds over the course of a lifetime. For I have never believed that genius needs to be locked away out of sight to thrive. My genius is not so frail a thing that it cowers from the dirty fingers of the newspapermen. In the early years they used to try to catch me out. They would do research, come along with a little piece of truth concealed in their pocket, draw it out at an opportune moment and hope to startle me into revealing more. I had to be careful. Inch them in the direction I wanted them to take, use my bait to draw them gently, imperceptibly, toward a prettier story than the one they had their eye on. A delicate operation. Their eyes would start to shine, and their grasp on the little chip of truth would loosen, until it dropped from their hand and fell, disregarded, by the wayside. It never failed. A good story is always more dazzling than a broken piece of truth. Afterward, once I became famous, the Vida Winter interview became a sort of rite of passage for journalists. They knew roughly what to expect, would have been disappointed to leave without the story. A quick run through the normal questions (Where do you get your inspiration? Are your characters based on real people? How much of your main character is you?) and the shorter my answers the better they liked it. (Inside my head. No. None.) Then, the bit they were waiting for, the thing they had really come for. A dreamy, expectant look stole across their faces. They were like little children at bedtime. And you, Miss Winter, they said. Tell me about yourself. And I told. Simple little stories really, not much to them. Just a few strands, woven together in a pretty pattern, a memorable motif here, a couple of sequins there. Mere scraps from the bottom of my ragbag. Hundreds more where they came from. Offcuts from novels and stories, plots that never got finished, stillborn characters, picturesque locations I never found a use for. Odds and ends that fell out in the editing. Then it's just a matter of neatening the edges, stitching in the ends, and it's done. Another brand-new biography. They went away happy, clutching their notebooks in their paws like children with sweets at the end of a birthday party. It would be something to tell their grandchildren. "One day I met Vida Winter, and she told me a story." Anyway, the boy from the Banbury Herald. He said, "Miss Winter, tell me the truth." Now, what kind of appeal is that? I've had people devise all kinds of stratagems to trick me into telling, and I can spot them a mile off, but that? Laughable. I mean, whatever did he expect? A good question. What did he expect? His eyes were glistening with an intent fever. He watched me so closely. Seeking. Probing. He was after something quite specific, I was sure of it. His forehead was damp with perspiration. Perhaps he was sickening for something. Tell me the truth, he said. I felt a strange sensation inside. Like the past coming to life. The watery stirring of a previous life turning in my belly, creating a tide that rose in my veins and sent cool wavelets to lap at my temples. The ghastly excitement of it. Tell me the truth. I considered his request. I turned it over in my mind, weighed up the likely consequences. He disturbed me, this boy, with his pale face and his burning eyes. "All right," I said. An hour later he was gone. A faint, absentminded good-bye and no backward glance. I didn't tell him the truth. How could I? I told him a story. An impoverished, malnourished little thing. No sparkle, no sequins, just a few dull and faded patches, roughly tacked together with the edges left frayed. The kind of story that looks like real life. Or what people imagine real life to be, which is something rather different. It's not easy for someone of my talent to produce a story like that. I watched him from the window. He shuffled away up the street, shoulders drooping, head bowed, each step a weary effort. All that energy, the charge, the verve, gone. I had killed it. Not that I take all the blame. He should have known better than to believe me. I never saw him again. That feeling I had, the current in my stomach, my temples, my fingertips -- it remained with me for quite a while. It rose and fell, with the memory of the boy's words. Tell me the truth. "No," I said. Over and over again. "No." But it wouldn't be still. It was a distraction. More than that, it was a danger. In the end I did a deal. "Not yet." It sighed, it fidgeted, but eventually it fell quiet. So quiet that I as good as forgot about it. What a long time ago that was. Thirty years? Forty? More, perhaps. Time passes more quickly than you think. The boy has been on my mind lately. Tell me the truth. And lately I have felt again that strange inner stirring. There is something growing inside me, dividing and multiplying. I can feel it, in my stomach, round and hard, about the size of a grapefruit. It sucks the air out of my lungs and gnaws the marrow from my bones. The long dormancy has changed it. From being a meek and biddable thing, it has become a bully. It refuses all negotiation, blocks discussion, insists on its rights. It won't take no for an answer. The truth, it echoes, calling after the boy, watching his departing back. And then it turns to me, tightens its grip on my innards, gives a twist. We made a deal, remember? It is time. Come on Monday. I will send a car to meet you from the half past four arrival at Harrogate Station. Vida Winter How long did I sit on the stairs after reading the letter? I don't know. For I was spellbound. There is something about words. In expert hands, manipulated deftly, they take you prisoner. Wind themselves around your limbs like spider silk, and when you are so enthralled you cannot move, they pierce your skin, enter your blood, numb your thoughts. Inside you they work their magic. When I at last woke up to myself, I could only guess what had been going on in the darkness of my unconsciousness. What had the letter done to me? I knew very little about Vida Winter. I was aware naturally of the various epithets that usually came attached to her name: England's best-loved writer; our century's Dickens; the world's most famous living author; and so on. I knew of course that she was popular, though the figures, when I later researched them, still came as a surprise. Fifty-six books published in fifty-six years; they are translated into forty-nine languages; Miss Winter has been named twenty-seven times the most borrowed author from English libraries; nineteen feature films have been based on her novels. In terms of statistics, the most disputed question is this: Has she or has she not sold more books than the Bible? The difficulty comes less from working out how many books she has sold (an ever-changing figure in the millions) than in obtaining solid figures for the Bible -- whatever one thinks of the word of God, his sales data are notoriously unreliable. The figure that might have interested me the most, as I sat there at the bottom of the stairs, was twenty-two. This was the number of biographers who, for want of information, or lack of encouragement, or after inducements or threats from Miss Winter herself, had been persuaded to give up trying to discover the truth about her. But I knew none of this then. I knew only one statistic, and it was one that seemed relevant: How many books by Vida Winter had I, Margaret Lea, read? None. I shivered on the stairs, yawned and stretched. Returning to myself, I found that my thoughts had been rearranged in my absence. Two items in particular had been selected out of the unheeded detritus that is my memory and placed for my attention. The first was a little scene involving my father. A box of books we are unpacking from a private library clearance includes a number of Vida Winters. At the shop we don't deal in contemporary fiction. "I'll take them to the charity shop in my lunch hour," I say, and leave them on the side of the desk. But before the morning is out, three of the four books are gone. Sold. One to a priest, one to a cartographer, one to a military historian. Our clients' faces, with the customary outward paleness and inner glow of the book lover, seem to light up when they spot the rich colors of the paperback covers. After lunch, when we have finished the unpacking and the cataloging and the shelving and we have no customers, we sit reading as usual. It is late autumn, it is raining and the windows have misted up. In the background is the hiss of the gas heater; we hear the sound without hearing it for, side by side, together and miles apart, we are deep in our books. "Shall I make tea?" I ask, surfacing. No answer. I make tea all the same and put a cup next to him on the desk. An hour later the untouched tea is cold. I make a fresh pot and put another steaming cup beside him on the desk. He is oblivious to my every movement. Gently I tilt the volume in his hands so that I can see the cover. It is the fourth Vida Winter. I return the book to its original position and study my father's face. He cannot hear me. He cannot see me. He is in another world, and I am a ghost. That was the first memory. The second is an image. In three-quarter profile, carved massively out of light and shade, a face towers over the commuters who wait, stunted, beneath. It is only an advertising photograph pasted on a billboard in a railway station, but to my mind's eye it has the impassive grandeur of long-forgotten queens and deities carved into rock faces by ancient civilizations. To contemplate the exquisite arc of the eye; the broad, smooth sweep of the cheekbones; the impeccable line and proportions of the nose, is to marvel that the randomness of human variation can produce something so supernaturally perfect as this. Such bones, discovered by the archaeologists of the future, would seem an artifact, a product not of blunt-tooled nature but of the very peak of artistic endeavor. The skin that embellishes these remarkable bones has the opaque luminosity of alabaster; it appears paler still by contrast with the elaborate twists and coils of copper hair that are arranged with such precision about the fine temples and down the strong, elegant neck. As if this extravagant beauty were not enough, there are the eyes. Intensified by some photographic sleight of hand to an inhuman green, the green of glass in a church window, or of emeralds or of boiled sweets, they gaze out over the heads of the commuters with perfect inexpression. I can't say whether the other travelers that day felt the same way as I about the picture; they had read the books, so they may have had a different perspective on things. But for me, looking into the large green eyes, I could not help being reminded of that commonplace expression about the eyes being the gateway to the soul. This woman, I remember thinking, as I gazed at her green, unseeing eyes, does not have a soul. Such was, on the night of the letter, the extent of my knowledge about Vida Winter. It was not much. Though on reflection perhaps it was as much as anyone else might know. For although everyone knew Vida Winter -- knew her name, knew her face, knew her books -- at the same time nobody knew her. As famous for her secrets as for her stories, she was a perfect mystery. Now, if the letter was to be believed, Vida Winter wanted to tell the truth about herself. This was curious enough in itself, but curiouser still was my next thought: Why should she want to tell it to me? Copyright © 2006 by Diane Setterfield Library of Congress subject headings for this publication: Recluses as authors -- Fiction. Women authors -- Fiction. Female friendship -- Fiction. Sample text for Roma : the novel of ancient Rome / Steven Saylor. Bibliographic record and links to related information available from the Library of Congress catalog Copyrighted sample text provided by the publisher and used with permission. May be incomplete or contain other coding. Counter Chapter One A Stop on the Salt Route 1000 B.C. As they rounded a bend in the path that ran beside the river, Lara recognized the silhouette of a fig tree atop a nearby hill. The weather was hot and the days were long. The fig tree was in full leaf, but not yet bearing fruit. Soon Lara spotted other landmarks—an outcropping of limestone beside the path that had a silhouette like a man’s face, a marshy spot beside the river where the waterfowl were easily startled, a tall tree that looked like a man with his arms upraised. They were drawing near to the place where there was an island in the river. The island was a good spot to make camp. They would sleep on the island tonight. Lara had been back and forth along the river path many times in her short life. Her people had not created the path—it had always been there, like the river—but their deerskin-shod feet and the wooden wheels of their handcarts kept the path well worn. Lara’s people were salt traders, and their livelihood took them on a continual journey. At the mouth of the river, the little group of half a dozen intermingled families gathered salt from the great salt beds beside the sea. They groomed and sifted the salt and loaded it into handcarts. When the carts were full, most of the group would stay behind, taking shelter amid rocks and simple lean-tos, while a band of fifteen or so of the heartier members set out on the path that ran alongside the river. With their precious cargo of salt, the travelers crossed the coastal lowlands and traveled toward the mountains. But Lara’s people never reached the mountaintops; they traveled only as far as the foothills. Many people lived in the forests and grassy meadows of the foothills, gathered in small villages. In return for salt, these people would give Lara’s people dried meat, animal skins, cloth spun from wool, clay pots, needles and scraping tools carved from bone, and little toys made of wood. Their bartering done, Lara and her people would travel back down the river path to the sea. The cycle would begin again. It had always been like this. Lara knew no other life. She traveled back and forth, up and down the river path. No single place was home. She liked the seaside, where there was always fish to eat, and the gentle lapping of the waves lulled her to sleep at night. She was less fond of the foothills, where the path grew steep, the nights could be cold, and views of great distances made her dizzy. She felt uneasy in the villages, and was often shy around strangers. The path itself was where she felt most at home. She loved the smell of the river on a hot day, and the croaking of frogs at night. Vines grew amid the lush foliage along the river, with berries that were good to eat. Even on the hottest day, sundown brought a cool breeze off the water, which sighed and sang amid the reeds and tall grasses. Of all the places along the path, the area they were approaching, with the island in the river, was Lara’s favorite. The terrain along this stretch of the river was mostly flat, but in the immediate vicinity of the island, the land on the sunrise side was like a rumpled cloth, with hills and ridges and valleys. Among Lara’s people, there was a wooden baby’s crib, suitable for strapping to a cart, that had been passed down for generations. The island was shaped like that crib, longer than it was wide and pointed at the upriver end, where the flow had eroded both banks. The island was like a crib, and the group of hills on the sunrise side of the river were like old women mantled in heavy cloaks gathered to have a look at the baby in the crib—that was how Lara’s father had once described the lay of the land. Larth spoke like that all the time, conjuring images of giants and monsters in the landscape. He could perceive the spirits, called numina, that dwelled in rocks and trees. Sometimes he could speak to them and hear what they had to say. The river was his oldest friend and told him where the fishing would be best. From whispers in the wind he could foretell the next day’s weather. Because of such skills, Larth was the leader of the group. “We’re close to the island, aren’t we, Papa?” said Lara. “How did you know?” “The hills. First we start to see the hills, off to the right. The hills grow bigger. And just before we come to the island, we can see the silhouette of that fig tree up there, along the crest of that hill.” “Good girl!” said Larth, proud of his daughter’s memory and powers of observation. He was a strong, handsome man with flecks of gray in his black beard. His wife had borne several children, but all had died very young except Lara, the last, whom his wife had died bearing. Lara was very precious to him. Like her mother, she had golden hair. Now that she had reached the age of childbearing, Lara was beginning to display the fullness of a woman’s hips and breasts. It was Larth’s greatest wish that he might live to see his own grandchildren. Not every man lived that long, but Larth was hopeful. He had been healthy all his life, partly, he believed, because he had always been careful to show respect to the numina he encountered on his journeys. Respecting the numina was important. The numen of the river could suck a man under and drown him. The numen of a tree could trip a man with its roots, or drop a rotten branch on his head. Rocks could give way underfoot, chuckling with amusement at their own treachery. Even the sky, with a roar of fury, sometimes sent down fingers of fire that could roast a man like a rabbit on a spit, or worse, leave him alive but robbed of his senses. Larth had heard that the earth itself could open and swallow a man; though he had never actually seen such a thing, he nevertheless performed a ritual each morning, asking the earth’s permission before he went striding across it. “There’s something so special about this place,” said Lara, gazing at the sparkling river to her left and then at the rocky, tree-spotted hills ahead and to her right. “How was it made? Who made it?” Larth frowned. The question made no sense to him. A place was never made, it simply was. Small features might change over time. Uprooted by a storm, a tree might fall into the river. A boulder might decide to tumble down the hillside. The numina that animated all things went about reshaping the landscape from day to day, but the essential things never changed, and had always existed: the river, the hills, the sky, the sun, the sea, the salt beds at the mouth of the river. He was trying to think of some way to express these thoughts to Lara, when a deer, drinking at the river, was startled by their approach. The deer bolted up the brushy bank and onto the path. Instead of running to safety, the creature stood and stared at them. As clearly as if the animal had whispered aloud, Larth heard the words “Eat me.” The deer was offering herself. Larth turned to shout an order, but the most skilled hunter of the group, a youth called Po, was already in motion. Po ran forward, raised the sharpened stick he always carried and hurled it whistling through the air between Larth and Lara. A heartbeat later, the spear struck the deer’s breast with such force that the creature was knocked to the ground. Unable to rise, she thrashed her neck and flailed her long, slender legs. Po ran past Larth and Lara. When he reached the deer, he pulled the spear free and stabbed the creature again. The deer released a stifled noise, like a gasp, and stopped moving. There was a cheer from the group. Instead of yet another dinner of fish from the river, tonight there would be venison. The distance from the riverbank to the island was not great, but at this time of year—early summer—the river was too high to wade across. Lara’s people had long ago made simple rafts of branches lashed together with leather thongs, which they left on the riverbanks, repairing and replacing them as needed. When they last passed this way, there had been three rafts, all in good condition, left on the east bank. Two of the rafts were still there, but one was missing. “I see it! There—pulled up on the bank of the island, almost hidden among those leaves,” said Po, whose eyes were sharp. “Someone must have used it to cross over.” “Perhaps they’re still on the island,” said Larth. He did not begrudge others the use of the rafts, and the island was large enough to share. Nonetheless, the situation required caution. He cupped his hands to his mouth and gave a shout. It was not long before a man appeared on the bank of the island. The man waved. “Do we know him?” said Larth, squinting. “I don’t think so,” said Po. “He’s young—my age or younger, I’d say. He looks strong.” “Very strong!” said Lara. Even from this distance, the young stranger’s brawniness was impressive. He wore a short tunic without sleeves, and Lara had never seen such arms on a man. Po, who was small and wiry, looked at Lara sidelong and frowned. “I’m not sure I like the look of this stranger.” “Why not?” said Lara. “He’s smiling at us.” In fact, the young man was smiling at Lara, and Lara alone. His name was Tarketios. Much more than that, Larth could not tell, for the stranger spoke a language which Larth did not recognize, in which each word seemed as long and convoluted as the man’s name. Understanding the deer had been easier than understanding the strange noises uttered by this man and his two companions! Even so, they seemed friendly, and the three of them presented no threat to the more numerous salt traders. Tarketios and his two older companions were skilled metalworkers from a region some two hundred miles to the north, where the hills were rich with iron, copper, and lead. They had been on a trading journey to the south and were returning home. Just as the river path carried Larth’s people from the seashore to the hills, so another path, perpendicular to the river, traversed the long coastal plain. Because the island provided an easy place to ford the river, it was here that the two paths intersected. On this occasion, the salt traders and the metal traders happened to arrive at the island on the same day. Now they met for the first time. The two groups made separate camps at opposite ends of the island. As a gesture of friendship, speaking with his hands, Larth invited Tarketios and the others to share the venison that night. As the hosts and their guests feasted around the roasting fire, Tarketios tried to explain something of his craft. Firelight glittered in Lara’s eyes as she watched Tarketios point at the flames and mime the act of hammering. Firelight danced across the flexing muscles of his arms and shoulders. When he smiled at her, his grin was like a boast. She had never seen teeth so white and so perfect. Po saw the looks the two exchanged and frowned. Lara’s father saw the same looks and smiled. The meal was over. The metal traders, after many gestures of gratitude for the venison, withdrew to their camp at the far side of the island. Before he disappeared into the shadows, Tarketios looked over his shoulder and gave Lara a parting grin. While the others settled down to sleep, Larth stayed awake a while longer, as was his habit. He liked to watch the fire. Like all other things, fire possessed a numen that sometimes communicated with him, showing him visions. As the last of the embers faded into darkness, Larth fell asleep. Larth blinked. The flames, which had dwindled to almost nothing, suddenly shot up again. Hot air rushed over his face. His eyes were seared by white flames brighter than the sun. Amid the dazzling brightness, he perceived a thing that levitated above the flames. It was a masculine member, disembodied but nonetheless rampant and upright. It bore wings, like a bird, and hovered in midair. Though it seemed to be made of flesh, it was impervious to the flames. Larth had seen the winged phallus before, always in such circumstances, when he stared at a fire and entered a dream state. He had even given it a name, or more precisely, the thing had planted its name in his mind: Fascinus. Fascinus was not like the numina that animated trees, stones, or rivers. Those numina existed without names. Each was bound to the object in which it resided, and there was little to differentiate one from another. When such numina spoke, they could not always be trusted. Sometimes they were friendly, but at other times they were mischievous or even hostile. Fascinus was different. It was unique. It existed in and of itself, without beginning or end. Clearly, from its form, it had something to do with life and the origin of life, yet it seemed to come from a place beyond this world, slipping for a few moments through a breach opened by the heat of the dancing flames. An appearance by Fascinus was always significant. The winged phallus never appeared without giving Larth an answer to a dilemma that had been troubling him, or planting an important new thought in his mind. The guidance given to him by Fascinus had never led Larth astray. Elsewhere, in distant lands—Greece, Israel, Egypt—men and women worshiped gods and goddesses. Those people made images of their gods, told stories about them, and worshiped them in temples. Larth had never met such people. He had never even heard of the lands where they lived, and he had never encountered or conceived of a god. The very concept of a deity such as those other men worshiped was unknown to Larth, but the closest thing to a god in his imagination and experience was Fascinus. With a start, he blinked again. The flames had died. In place of intolerable brightness there was only the darkness of a warm summer night lit by the faintest sliver of a moon. The air on his face was no longer hot but fresh and cool. Fascinus had vanished—but not without planting a thought in Larth’s mind. He hurried to the leafy bower beside the river where Lara liked to sleep, thinking to himself, It must be made so, because Fascinus says it must! He knelt beside her, but there was no need to wake her. She was already awake. “Papa? What is it?” “Go to him!” She did not need to ask for an explanation. It was what she had been yearning to do, lying restless and eager in the dark. “Are you sure, Papa?” “Fascinus . . . ,” He did not finish the thought, but she understood. She had never seen Fascinus, but he had told her about it. Many times in the past, Fascinus had given guidance to her father. Now, once again, Fascinus had made its will known. The darkness did not deter her. She knew every twist and turn of every path on the little island. When she came to the metal trader’s camp, she found Tarketios lying in a leafy nook secluded from the others; she recognized him by his brawny silhouette. He was awake and waiting, just as she had been lying awake, waiting, when her father came to her. At her approach, Tarketios rose onto his elbows. He spoke her name in a whisper. There was a quiver of something like desperation in his voice; his neediness made her smile. She sighed and lowered herself beside him. By the faint moonlight, she saw that he wore an amulet of some sort, suspended from a strap of leather around his neck. Nestled amid the hair on his chest, the bit of shapeless metal seemed to capture and concentrate the faint moonlight, casting back a radiance brighter than the moon itself. His arms—the arms she had so admired earlier—reached out and closed around her in a surprisingly gentle embrace. His body was as warm and naked as her own, but much bigger and much harder. She wondered if Fascinus was with them in the darkness, for she seemed to feel the beating of wings between their legs as she was entered by the thing that gave origin to life. Copyright © 2007 by Steven Saylor. All rights reserved. Library of Congress subject headings for this publication: Rome -- History -- Fiction. Page semi-protected Encyclopedia From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia Jump to navigationJump to search This article is about the type of reference work. For other uses, see Encyclopedia (disambiguation). The volumes of the 15th edition of Encyclopædia Britannica (and the volume for the year 2002) span two bookshelves in a library. Title page of Lucubrationes, 1541 edition, one of the first books to use a variant of the word encyclopedia in the title An encyclopedia (American English), encyclopædia, or encyclopaedia (British English) is a reference work or compendium providing summaries of knowledge either from all branches or from a particular field or discipline.[1] Encyclopedias are divided into articles or entries that are often arranged alphabetically by article name[2] and sometimes by thematic categories. Encyclopedia entries are longer and more detailed than those in most dictionaries.[2] Generally speaking, unlike dictionary entries—which focus on linguistic information about words, such as their etymology, meaning, pronunciation, use, and grammatical forms—encyclopedia articles focus on factual information concerning the subject named in the article's title.[3][4][5][6] Encyclopedias have existed for around 2,000 years and have evolved considerably during that time as regards to language (written in a major international or a vernacular language), size (few or many volumes), intent (presentation of a global or a limited range of knowledge), cultural perspective (authoritative, ideological, didactic, utilitarian), authorship (qualifications, style), readership (education level, background, interests, capabilities), and the technologies available for their production and distribution (hand-written manuscripts, small or large print runs, Internet). As a valued source of reliable information compiled by experts, printed versions found a prominent place in libraries, schools and other educational institutions. The appearance of digital and open-source versions in the 21st century, such as Wikipedia, has vastly expanded the accessibility, authorship, readership, and variety of encyclopedia entries. Contents 1 Etymology 1.1 Two Greek words misunderstood as one 1.2 Sixteenth century usage of the compounded word 1.3 The suffix -p(a)edia within portmanteau names 1.4 Contemporary usage 2 Characteristics 3 History 3.1 Ancient times 3.2 Middle Ages 3.3 Renaissance 3.4 Traditional encyclopedias 3.5 Rise of digital and online encyclopedias 3.6 Largest encyclopedias 4 See also 5 Notes 6 References 7 External links Etymology Indeed, the purpose of an encyclopedia is to collect knowledge disseminated around the globe; to set forth its general system to the men with whom we live, and transmit it to those who will come after us, so that the work of preceding centuries will not become useless to the centuries to come; and so that our offspring, becoming better instructed, will at the same time become more virtuous and happy, and that we should not die without having rendered a service to the human race in the future years to come. Diderot[7] Two Greek words misunderstood as one The word encyclopedia (encyclo|pedia) comes from the Koine Greek ἐγκύκλιος παιδεία,[8] transliterated enkyklios paideia, meaning "general education" from enkyklios (ἐγκύκλιος), meaning "circular, recurrent, required regularly, general"[9] and paideia (παιδεία), meaning "education, rearing of a child"; together, the phrase literally translates as "complete instruction" or "complete knowledge".[10] However, the two separate words were reduced to a single word due to a scribal error[11] by copyists of a Latin manuscript edition of Quintillian in 1470.[12] The copyists took this phrase to be a single Greek word, enkyklopaedia, with the same meaning, and this spurious Greek word became the New Latin word "encyclopaedia", which in turn came into English. Because of this compounded word, fifteenth century readers and since have often, and incorrectly, thought that the Roman authors Quintillian and Pliny described an ancient genre.[13] Sixteenth century usage of the compounded word Title page of Skalich's Encyclopaediæ, seu orbis disciplinarum, tam sacrarum quam prophanarum, epistemon from 1559, first clear use of the word encyclopaedia in the title[14] In the sixteenth century there was a level of ambiguity as to how to use this new word. As several titles illustrate, there was not a settled notion about its spelling nor its status as a noun. For example: Jacobus Philomusus's Margarita philosophica encyclopaediam exhibens (1508); Johannes Aventinus's Encyclopedia orbisque doctrinarum, hoc est omnium artium, scientiarum, ipsius philosophiae index ac divisio; Joachimus Fortius Ringelbergius's Lucubrationes vel potius absolutissima kyklopaideia (1538, 1541); Paul Skalich's Encyclopaediæ, seu orbis disciplinarum, tam sacrarum quam prophanarum, epistemon (1559); Gregor Reisch's Margarita philosophica (1503, retitled Encyclopaedia in 1583); and Samuel Eisenmenger's Cyclopaedia Paracelsica (1585).[15] There have been two examples of the oldest vernacular use of the compounded word. In approximately 1490, Franciscus Puccius wrote a letter to Politianus thanking him for his Miscellanea, calling it an encyclopedia.[16] More commonly, François Rabelais is cited for his use of the term in Pantagruel (1532).[17][18] The suffix -p(a)edia within portmanteau names Some encyclopædia projects have portmanteau names, which include the suffix -p(a)edia. The name Wikipedia, for example, is a portmanteau of the word wiki, as in MediaWiki, and the word encyclopedia.[19] Contemporary usage In American English, the word is most commonly spelled encyclopedia, and in British English encyclopædia or encyclopaedia. See American and British English spelling differences.[20] Characteristics The modern encyclopedia was developed from the dictionary in the 18th century. Historically, both encyclopedias and dictionaries have been researched and written by well-educated, well-informed content experts, but they are significantly different in structure. A dictionary is a linguistic work which primarily focuses on alphabetical listing of words and their definitions. Synonymous words and those related by the subject matter are to be found scattered around the dictionary, giving no obvious place for in-depth treatment. Thus, a dictionary typically provides limited information, analysis or background for the word defined. While it may offer a definition, it may leave the reader lacking in understanding the meaning, significance or limitations of a term, and how the term relates to a broader field of knowledge. To address those needs, an encyclopedia article is typically not limited to simple definitions, and is not limited to defining an individual word, but provides a more extensive meaning for a subject or discipline. In addition to defining and listing synonymous terms for the topic, the article is able to treat the topic's more extensive meaning in more depth and convey the most relevant accumulated knowledge on that subject. An encyclopedia article also often includes many maps and illustrations, as well as bibliography and statistics. An encyclopedia is, theoretically, not written in order to convince, although one of its goals is indeed to convince its reader of its own veracity. Four major elements define an encyclopedia: its subject matter, its scope, its method of organization, and its method of production: Encyclopedias can be general, containing articles on topics in every field (the English-language Encyclopædia Britannica and German Brockhaus are well-known examples). General encyclopedias may contain guides on how to do a variety of things, as well as embedded dictionaries and gazetteers.[citation needed] There are also encyclopedias that cover a wide variety of topics from a particular cultural, ethnic, or national perspective, such as the Great Soviet Encyclopedia or Encyclopaedia Judaica. Works of encyclopedic scope aim to convey the important accumulated knowledge for their subject domain, such as an encyclopedia of medicine, philosophy or law. Works vary in the breadth of material and the depth of discussion, depending on the target audience. Some systematic method of organization is essential to making an encyclopedia usable for reference. There have historically been two main methods of organizing printed encyclopedias: the alphabetical method (consisting of a number of separate articles, organized in alphabetical order) and organization by hierarchical categories. The former method is today the more common, especially for general works. The fluidity of electronic media, however, allows new possibilities for multiple methods of organization of the same content. Further, electronic media offer new capabilities for search, indexing and cross reference. The epigraph from Horace on the title page of the 18th century Encyclopédie suggests the importance of the structure of an encyclopedia: "What grace may be added to commonplace matters by the power of order and connection." As modern multimedia and the information age have evolved, new methods have emerged for the collection, verification, summation, and presentation of information of all kinds. Projects such as Everything2, Encarta, h2g2, and Wikipedia are examples of new forms of the encyclopedia as information retrieval becomes simpler. The method of production for an encyclopedia historically has been supported in both for-profit and non-profit contexts. The Great Soviet Encyclopedia mentioned above was entirely state sponsored, while the Britannica was supported as a for-profit institution. By comparison, Wikipedia is supported by volunteers contributing in a non-profit environment under the organization of the Wikimedia Foundation. Some works entitled "dictionaries" are actually similar to encyclopedias, especially those concerned with a particular field (such as the Dictionary of the Middle Ages, the Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships, and Black's Law Dictionary). The Macquarie Dictionary, Australia's national dictionary, became an encyclopedic dictionary after its first edition in recognition of the use of proper nouns in common communication, and the words derived from such proper nouns. There are some broad differences between encyclopedias and dictionaries. Most noticeably, encyclopedia articles are longer, fuller and more thorough than entries in most general-purpose dictionaries.[2][21] There are differences in content as well. Generally speaking, dictionaries provide linguistic information about words themselves, while encyclopedias focus more on the thing for which those words stand.[3][4][5][6] Thus, while dictionary entries are inextricably fixed to the word described, encyclopedia articles can be given a different entry name. As such, dictionary entries are not fully translatable into other languages, but encyclopedia articles can be.[3] In practice, however, the distinction is not concrete, as there is no clear-cut difference between factual, "encyclopedic" information and linguistic information such as appears in dictionaries.[5][21][22] Thus encyclopedias may contain material that is also found in dictionaries, and vice versa.[22] In particular, dictionary entries often contain factual information about the thing named by the word.[21][22] History Main article: History of encyclopedias Encyclopedias have progressed from written form in antiquity, to print in modern times. Today they can also be distributed and displayed electronically. Ancient times Naturalis Historiae, 1669 edition, title page One of the earliest encyclopedic works to have survived to modern times is the Naturalis Historiae of Pliny the Elder, a Roman statesman living in the first century AD. He compiled a work of 37 chapters covering natural history, architecture, medicine, geography, geology, and other aspects of the world around him. He stated in the preface that he had compiled 20,000 facts from 2000 works by over 200 authors, and added many others from his own experience. The work was published around AD 77–79, although Pliny probably never finished editing the work before his death in the eruption of Vesuvius in AD 79.[23] Middle Ages Isidore of Seville, one of the greatest scholars of the early Middle Ages, is widely recognized for writing the first encyclopedia of the Middle Ages, the Etymologiae (The Etymologies) or Origines (around 630), in which he compiled a sizable portion of the learning available at his time, both ancient and contemporary. The work has 448 chapters in 20 volumes, and is valuable because of the quotes and fragments of texts by other authors that would have been lost had he not collected them. The most popular encyclopedia of the Carolingian Age was the De universo or De rerum naturis by Rabanus Maurus, written about 830; it was based on Etymologiae.[24] The encyclopedia of Suda, a massive 10th-century Byzantine encyclopedia, had 30 000 entries, many drawing from ancient sources that have since been lost, and often derived from medieval Christian compilers. The text was arranged alphabetically with some slight deviations from common vowel order and place in the Greek alphabet. The early Muslim compilations of knowledge in the Middle Ages included many comprehensive works. Around year 960, the Brethren of Purity of Basra were engaged in their Encyclopedia of the Brethren of Purity.[25] Notable works include Abu Bakr al-Razi's encyclopedia of science, the Mutazilite Al-Kindi's prolific output of 270 books, and Ibn Sina's medical encyclopedia, which was a standard reference work for centuries. Also notable are works of universal history (or sociology) from Asharites, al-Tabri, al-Masudi, Tabari's History of the Prophets and Kings, Ibn Rustah, al-Athir, and Ibn Khaldun, whose Muqadimmah contains cautions regarding trust in written records that remain wholly applicable today. Excerpt from the encyclopedia "Liber Floridus". Illustration of the writer Lambert, making an attempt at compiling the sum of human knowledge. Manuscript preserved in the Ghent University Library.[26] The enormous encyclopedic work in China of the Four Great Books of Song, compiled by the 11th century during the early Song dynasty (960–1279), was a massive literary undertaking for the time. The last encyclopedia of the four, the Prime Tortoise of the Record Bureau, amounted to 9.4 million Chinese characters in 1000 written volumes. The 'period of the encyclopedists' spanned from the tenth to seventeenth centuries, during which the government of China employed hundreds of scholars to assemble massive encyclopedias.[27] The largest of which is the Yongle Encyclopedia; it was completed in 1408 and consisted of almost 23,000 folio volumes in manuscript form,[27] the largest encyclopedia in history, until surpassed by Wikipedia in 2007. In late medieval Europe, several authors had the ambition of compiling the sum of human knowledge in a certain field or overall, for example Bartholomew of England, Vincent of Beauvais, Radulfus Ardens, Sydrac, Brunetto Latini, Giovanni da Sangiminiano, Pierre Bersuire. Some were women, like Hildegard of Bingen and Herrad of Landsberg. The most successful of those publications were the Speculum Maius (Great Mirror) of Vincent of Beauvais and the De proprietatibus rerum (On the Properties of Things) by Bartholomew of England. The latter was translated (or adapted) into French, Provençal, Italian, English, Flemish, Anglo-Norman, Spanish, and German during the Middle Ages. Both were written in the middle of the 13th century. No medieval encyclopedia bore the title Encyclopaedia – they were often called On nature (De natura, De naturis rerum), Mirror (Speculum maius, Speculum universale), Treasure (Trésor).[28] The first encyclopedic work to adopt a single alphabetical order for entries across a variety of topics was the fourteenth-century Omne Bonum, compiled by James le Palmer. Renaissance Nuremberg Chronicle was published in 1493. It was one of the first printed books to document world knowledge. Medieval encyclopedias were all hand-copied and thus available mostly to wealthy patrons or monastic men of learning; they were expensive, and usually written for those extending knowledge rather than those using it.[29] In 1493 Nuremberg Chronicle was produced, containing hundreds of illustrations, of historical figures, events and geographical places. Written as an encyclopedic chronicle, it remains one of the best-documented early printed books—an incunabulum—and one of the first to successfully integrate illustrations and text. Illustrations depicted many never before illustrated major cities in Europe and the Near East.[30] 645 original woodcuts were used for the illustrations.[31] During the Renaissance, the creation of printing allowed a wider diffusion of encyclopedias and every scholar could have his or her own copy. The De expetendis et fugiendis rebus [it] by Giorgio Valla was posthumously printed in 1501 by Aldo Manuzio in Venice. This work followed the traditional scheme of liberal arts. However, Valla added the translation of ancient Greek works on mathematics (firstly by Archimedes), newly discovered and translated. The Margarita Philosophica by Gregor Reisch, printed in 1503, was a complete encyclopedia explaining the seven liberal arts. The term encyclopaedia was coined by 16th-century humanists who misread copies of their texts of Pliny[32] and Quintilian,[33] and combined the two Greek words "enkyklios paedia" into one word, έγκυκλοπαιδεία.[34] The phrase enkyklios paedia (ἐγκύκλιος παιδεία) was used by Plutarch and the Latin word encyclopaedia came from him. The first work titled in this way was the Encyclopedia orbisque doctrinarum, hoc est omnium artium, scientiarum, ipsius philosophiae index ac divisio written by Johannes Aventinus in 1517.[citation needed] The English physician and philosopher, Sir Thomas Browne used the word 'encyclopaedia' in 1646 in the preface to the reader to define his Pseudodoxia Epidemica, a major work of the 17th-century scientific revolution. Browne structured his encyclopaedia upon the time-honoured scheme of the Renaissance, the so-called 'scale of creation' which ascends through the mineral, vegetable, animal, human, planetary, and cosmological worlds. Pseudodoxia Epidemica was a European best-seller, translated into French, Dutch, and German as well as Latin it went through no fewer than five editions, each revised and augmented, the last edition appearing in 1672. Financial, commercial, legal, and intellectual factors changed the size of encyclopedias. During the Renaissance, middle classes had more time to read and encyclopedias helped them to learn more. Publishers wanted to increase their output so some countries like Germany started selling books missing alphabetical sections, to publish faster. Also, publishers could not afford all the resources by themselves, so multiple publishers would come together with their resources to create better encyclopedias. When publishing at the same rate became financially impossible, they turned to subscriptions and serial publications. This was risky for publishers because they had to find people who would pay all upfront or make payments. When this worked, capital would rise and there would be a steady income for encyclopedias. Later, rivalry grew, causing copyright to occur due to weak underdeveloped laws. Some publishers would copy another publisher's work to produce an encyclopedia faster and cheaper so consumers did not have to pay a lot and they would sell more. Encyclopedias made it to where middle-class citizens could basically have a small library in their own house. Europeans were becoming more curious about their society around them causing them to revolt against their government.[35] Traditional encyclopedias Encyclopédie, 1773 The beginnings of the modern idea of the general-purpose, widely distributed printed encyclopedia precede the 18th century encyclopedists. However, Chambers' Cyclopaedia, or Universal Dictionary of Arts and Sciences (1728), and the Encyclopédie of Denis Diderot (1750) and Jean le Rond d'Alembert (1751 onwards), as well as Encyclopædia Britannica (1768) and the Conversations-Lexikon, were the first to realize the form we would recognize today, with a comprehensive scope of topics, discussed in depth and organized in an accessible, systematic method. Chambers, in 1728, followed the earlier lead of John Harris's Lexicon Technicum of 1704 and later editions (see also below); this work was by its title and content "A Universal English Dictionary of Arts and Sciences: Explaining not only the Terms of Art, but the Arts Themselves". Popular and affordable encyclopedias such as Harmsworth's Universal Encyclopaedia and the Children's Encyclopaedia appeared in the early 1920s. In the United States, the 1950s and 1960s saw the introduction of several large popular encyclopedias, often sold on installment plans. The best known of these were World Book and Funk and Wagnalls. As many as 90% were sold door to door. Jack Lynch says in his book You Could Look It Up that encyclopedia salespeople were so common that they became the butt of jokes. He describes their sales pitch saying, "They were selling not books but a lifestyle, a future, a promise of social mobility." A 1961 World Book ad said, "You are holding your family’s future in your hands right now," while showing a feminine hand holding an order form.[36] 1913 advertisement for Encyclopædia Britannica, the oldest and one of the largest contemporary English encyclopedias The second half of the 20th century also saw the proliferation of specialized encyclopedias that compiled topics in specific fields, mainly to support specific industries and professionals. This trend has continued. Encyclopedias of at least one volume in size now exist for most if not all academic disciplines, including such narrow topics such as bioethics. Rise of digital and online encyclopedias By the late 20th century, encyclopedias were being published on CD-ROMs for use with personal computers. Microsoft's Encarta, published between 1993 and 2009, was a landmark example as it had no printed equivalent. Articles were supplemented with both video and audio files as well as numerous high-quality images.[37] Relative frequency of the terms "encyclopedia". "Britannica", "Encarta", and "Wikipedia" in a large corpus of books (Google Ngram Viewer) Digital technologies and online crowdsourcing allowed encyclopedias to break away from traditional limitations in both breadth and depth of topics covered. Wikipedia, a crowd-sourced, multilingual, open licence, free online encyclopedia supported by the non-profit Wikimedia Foundation and open source MediaWiki software opened in 2001. Unlike commercial online encyclopedias such as Encyclopædia Britannica Online, which are written by experts, Wikipedia is collaboratively created and maintained by volunteer editors, organized by collaboratively agreed guidelines and user-roles. Most contributors use pseudonyms and stay anonymous. Content is therefore reviewed, checked, kept or removed based on its own intrinsic value and external sources supporting it. Traditional encyclopedias' reliability, on their side, stand upon authorship and associated professional expertise. Many academics, teachers, and journalists rejected and continue to reject open, crowd sourced encyclopedias, especially Wikipedia, as a reliable source of information, and Wikipedia is itself not a reliable source according to its own standards because of its openly editable and anonymous crowdsourcing model.[38] A study by Nature in 2005 found that Wikipedia's science articles were roughly comparable in accuracy to those of Encyclopædia Britannica, containing the same number of serious errors and about 1/3 more minor factual inaccuracies, but that Wikipedia's writing tended to be confusing and less readable.[39] Encyclopædia Britannica rejected the study's conclusions, deeming the study fatally flawed.[40] As of February 2014, Wikipedia had 18 billion page views and nearly 500 million unique visitors each month.[41] Critics argue Wikipedia exhibits systemic bias.[42][43] There are several much smaller, usually more specialized, encyclopedias on various themes, sometimes dedicated to a specific geographic region or time period.[44] One example is the Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy. Largest encyclopedias As of the early 2020s, the largest encyclopedias are the Chinese Baike.com (18 million articles) and Baidu Baike (16 million), followed by Wikipedias for English (6 million), German (+2 million) and French (+2 million), all of which are wholly online.[45][failed verification] More than a dozen other Wikipedias have 1 million articles or more, of variable quality and length.[45][failed verification] Measuring an encyclopedia's size by its articles is an ambiguous method since the online Chinese encyclopedias cited above allow multiple articles on the same topic, while Wikipedias accept only one single common article per topic but allow automated creation of nearly empty articles.[citation needed] See also Literature portal icon Education portal Bibliography of encyclopedias Biographical dictionary Encyclopedic knowledge Encyclopedism Fictitious entry History of science and technology Lexicography Library science Lists of encyclopedias Thesaurus Speculum literature Notes "Encyclopedia". Archived from the original on August 3, 2007. Glossary of Library Terms. Riverside City College, Digital Library/Learning Resource Center. Retrieved on: November 17, 2007. Hartmann, R. R. K.; James, Gregory (1998). Dictionary of Lexicography. Routledge. p. 48. ISBN 978-0-415-14143-7. Retrieved July 27, 2010. Béjoint, Henri (2000). Modern Lexicography, pp. 30–31. Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-829951-6 "Encyclopaedia". Encyclopædia Britannica. Retrieved July 27, 2010. An English lexicographer, H.W. Fowler, wrote in the preface to the first edition (1911) of The Concise Oxford Dictionary of Current English language that a dictionary is concerned with the uses of words and phrases and with giving information about the things for which they stand only so far as current use of the words depends upon knowledge of those things. The emphasis in an encyclopedia is much more on the nature of the things for which the words and phrases stand. Hartmann, R. R. K.; James, Gregory (1998). Dictionary of Lexicography. Routledge. p. 49. ISBN 978-0-415-14143-7. Retrieved July 27, 2010. In contrast with linguistic information, encyclopedia material is more concerned with the description of objective realities than the words or phrases that refer to them. In practice, however, there is no hard and fast boundary between factual and lexical knowledge. Cowie, Anthony Paul (2009). The Oxford History of English Lexicography, Volume I. Oxford University Press. p. 22. ISBN 978-0-415-14143-7. Retrieved August 17, 2010. An 'encyclopedia' (encyclopaedia) usually gives more information than a dictionary; it explains not only the words but also the things and concepts referred to by the words. Denis Diderot and Jean le Rond d'Alembert Encyclopédie. University of Michigan Library:Scholarly Publishing Office and DLXS. Retrieved on: November 17, 2007 Ἐγκύκλιος παιδεία, Quintilian, Institutio Oratoria, 1.10.1, at Perseus Project ἐγκύκλιος, Henry George Liddell, Robert Scott, A Greek–English Lexicon, at Perseus Project παιδεία, Henry George Liddell, Robert Scott, A Greek–English Lexicon, at Perseus Project According to some accounts, such as the American Heritage Dictionary Archived August 19, 2017, at the Wayback Machine, copyists of Latin manuscripts took this phrase to be a single Greek word, ἐγκυκλοπαιδεία enkyklopaedia. Franklin-Brown, Mary (2012). Reading the world: encyclopedic writing in the scholastic age. Chicago London: The University of Chicago Press. p. 8. ISBN 9780226260709. König, Jason (2013). Encyclopaedism from antiquity to the Renaissance. New York: Cambridge University Press. p. 1. ISBN 978-1-107-03823-3. Yeo, Richard (2001). Encyclopaedic visions : scientific dictionaries and enlightenment culture. Cambridge New York: Cambridge University Press. p. 6. ISBN 978-0521152921. Harris-McCoy, Daniel (2008). Varieties of encyclopedism in the early Roman Empire: Vitruvius, Pliny the Elder, Artemidorus (Ph.D). University of Pennsylvania. p. 12. ProQuest 304510158. Harris-McCoy 2008, p. 11–12. Roest, Bert (1997). "Compilation as Theme and Praxis in Franciscan Universal Chronicles". In Binkley, Peter (ed.). Pre-Modern Encyclopaedic Texts: Proceedings of the Second Comers Congress, Groningen, 1 – July 4, 1996. BRILL. p. 213. ISBN 90-04-10830-0. Carey, Sorcha (2003). "Two Strategies of Encyclopaedism". Pliny's Catalogue of Culture: Art and Empire in the Natural History. Oxford University Press. p. 17. ISBN 978-0-19-925913-7. "[Nupedia-l] Re: [Advisory-l] The wiki..." nupedia.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2003. "encyclopaedia". Oxford English Dictionary (online ed.). Oxford University Press. Retrieved February 18, 2012. Hartmann, R. R. K.; James, Gregory (1998). Dictionary of Lexicography. Routledge. pp. 48–49. ISBN 978-0-415-14143-7. Retrieved July 27, 2010. Usually these two aspects overlap – encyclopedic information being difficult to distinguish from linguistic information – and dictionaries attempt to capture both in the explanation of a meaning ... Béjoint, Henri (2000). Modern Lexicography. Oxford University Press. p. 31. ISBN 978-0-19-829951-6. The two types, as we have seen, are not easily differentiated; encyclopedias contain information that is also to be found in dictionaries, and vice versa. Naturalis Historia Kaske, Robert Earl; Groos, Arthur; Twomey, Michael W.; University of Toronto Centre for Medieval Studies (1988). Medieval Christian Literary Imagery: A Guide to Interpretation. University of Toronto Press. ISBN 978-0-8020-2636-1. P.D. Wightman (1953), The Growth of Scientific Ideas "Liber Floridus [manuscript]". lib.ugent.be. Retrieved August 26, 2020. Murray, Stuart (2009). The library: an illustrated history. New York, NY: Skyhorse Pub. ISBN 9781602397064. OCLC 277203534. Monique Paulmier-Foucart, "Medieval Encyclopaedias", in André Vauchez (ed.), Encyclopedia of the Middle Ages, James Clarke & Co, 2002. See "Encyclopedia" in Dictionary of the Middle Ages. Hennessy, Kathryn (2018). Remarkable Books, The World's Most Beautiful and Historic Works. 345 Hudson St, New York, New York 10014: DK Penguin Random House. p. 78. ISBN 9781465483065. McPhee, John; Museums and Galleries NSW. Great Collections: treasures from Art Gallery of NSW, Australian Museum, Botanic Gardens Trust, Historic Houses Trust of NSW, Museum of Contemporary Art, Powerhouse Museum, State Library of NSW, State Records NSW. Museums & Galleries NSW. p. 37. ISBN 9780646496030. OCLC 302147838. Pliny the Elder, Naturalis Historia, Preface 14. Quintilian, Institutio oratoria, 1.10.1: ut efficiatur orbis ille doctrinae, quem Graeci ἐγκύκλιον παιδείαν vocant. έγκυκλοπαιδεία, Henry George Liddell, Robert Scott, A Greek–English Lexicon, at Perseus Project: "f. l. [= falsa lectio, Latin for "false reading"] for ἐγκύκλιος παιδεία" Loveland, J. (2012). "Why Encyclopedias Got Bigger … and Smaller". Information & Culture. 47 (2): 233–254. doi:10.1353/lac.2012.0012. S2CID 144466580. Onion, Rebecca (June 3, 2016). "How Two Artists Turn Old Encyclopedias Into Beautiful, Melancholy Art". Slate. Retrieved September 23, 2019. Important Notice: MSN Encarta to be Discontinued. MSN Encarta. Archived from the original on October 27, 2009. Sidener, Jonathan (September 23, 2006). "Wikipedia co-founder looks to add accountability, end anarchy". The San Diego Union-Tribune. Archived from the original on January 17, 2018. Retrieved January 16, 2017. Giles, Jim (December 2005). "Internet encyclopedias go head to head". Nature. 438 (7070): 900–901. Bibcode:2005Natur.438..900G. doi:10.1038/438900a. PMID 16355180.(subscription required) Note: The study was cited in several news articles; e.g.: "Wikipedia survives research test". BBC News. December 15, 2005. "Fatally Flawed: Refuting the recent study on encyclopedic accuracy by the journal Nature" (PDF). Encyclopædia Britannica, Inc. March 2006. Retrieved January 17, 2018. Cohen, Noam (February 9, 2014). "Wikipedia vs. the Small Screen". The New York Times. Reagle, Joseph; Rhue, Lauren (August 8, 2011). "Gender Bias in Wikipedia and Britannica". International Journal of Communication. 5: 21. ISSN 1932-8036. Retrieved November 1, 2018. Holloway, Todd; Bozicevic, Miran; Börner, Katy (2007). "Analyzing and visualizing the semantic coverage of Wikipedia and its authors". Complexity. 12 (3): 30–40. arXiv:cs/0512085. Bibcode:2007Cmplx..12c..30H. doi:10.1002/cplx.20164. S2CID 28396770. Sideris A., "The Encyclopedic Concept in the Web Era", in Ioannides M., Arnold D., Niccolucci F. and K. Mania (eds.), The e-volution of Information Communication Technology in Cultural Heritage. Where Hi-Tech Touches the Past: Risks and Challenges for the 21st Century. VAST 2006, Epoch, Budapest 2006, pp. 192-197. ISBN 963-8046-74-0. "Wikipedia". www.wikipedia.org. Retrieved May 13, 2020. References "encyclopedia | Search Online Etymology Dictionary". www.etymonline.com. Retrieved May 13, 2020. "Encyclopaedia". Encyclopædia Britannica. Retrieved July 27, 2010. Béjoint, Henri (2000). Modern Lexicography. Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-829951-6. C. Codoner, S. Louis, M. Paulmier-Foucart, D. Hüe, M. Salvat, A. Llinares, L'Encyclopédisme. Actes du Colloque de Caen, A. Becq (dir.), Paris, 1991. Bergenholtz, H.; Nielsen, S.; Tarp, S., eds. (2009). Lexicography at a Crossroads: Dictionaries and Encyclopedias Today, Lexicographical Tools Tomorrow. Peter Lang. ISBN 978-3-03911-799-4. Blom, Phillip (2004). Enlightening the World: Encyclopédie, the Book that Changed the Course of History. New York; Basingstoke: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 978-1-4039-6895-1. OCLC 57669780. Collison, Robert Lewis (1966). Encyclopaedias: Their History Throughout the Ages (2nd ed.). New York, London: Hafner. OCLC 220101699. Cowie, Anthony Paul (2009). The Oxford History of English Lexicography, Volume I. Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-415-14143-7. Retrieved August 17, 2010. Darnton, Robert (1979). The business of enlightenment: a publishing history of the Encyclopédie, 1775–1800. Cambridge: Belknap Press. ISBN 978-0-674-08785-9. Hartmann, R. R. K.; James, Gregory (1998). Dictionary of Lexicography. Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-14143-7. Retrieved July 27, 2010. Kafker, Frank A., ed. (1981). Notable encyclopedias of the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries: nine predecessors of the Encyclopédie. Oxford: Voltaire Foundation. ISBN 978-0-7294-0256-9. OCLC 10645788. Kafker, Frank A., ed. (1994). Notable encyclopedias of the late eighteenth century: eleven successors of the Encyclopédie. Oxford: Voltaire Foundation. ISBN 978-0-7294-0467-9. OCLC 30787125. Needham, Joseph (1986). "Part 7, Military Technology; the Gunpowder Epic". Science and Civilization in China. 5 – Chemistry and Chemical Technology. Taipei: Caves Books Ltd. ISBN 978-0-521-30358-3. OCLC 59245877. Rosenzweig, Roy (June 2006). "Can History Be Open Source? Wikipedia and the Future of the Past". Journal of American History. 93 (1): 117–46. doi:10.2307/4486062. ISSN 1945-2314. JSTOR 4486062. Archived from the original on April 25, 2010. Ioannides, Marinos (2006). The e-volution of information communication technology in cultural heritage: where hi-tech touches the past: risks and challenges for the 21st century. Budapest: Archaeolingua. ISBN 963-8046-73-2. OCLC 218599120. Walsh, S. Padraig (1968). Anglo-American general encyclopedias: a historical bibliography, 1703–1967. New York: Bowker. p. 270. OCLC 577541. Yeo, Richard R. (2001). Encyclopaedic visions: scientific dictionaries and enlightenment culture. Cambridge, New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-65191-2. OCLC 45828872. External links Look up encyclopedia, encyclopaedia, or encyclopedic in Wiktionary, the free dictionary. Wikimedia Commons has media related to Encyclopedias. Wikisource has original works on the topic: Encyclopedias Encyclopaedia and Hypertext Internet Accuracy Project – Biographical errors in encyclopedias and almanacs Encyclopedia – Diderot's article on the Encyclopedia from the original Encyclopédie. De expetendis et fugiendis rebus – First Renaissance encyclopedia Errors and inconsistencies in several printed reference books and encyclopedias Archived July 18, 2001, at the Wayback Machine Digital encyclopedias put the world at your fingertips – CNET article Encyclopedias online University of Wisconsin – Stout listing by category Chambers' Cyclopaedia, 1728, with the 1753 supplement Encyclopædia Americana, 1851, Francis Lieber ed. (Boston: Mussey & Co.) at the University of Michigan Making of America site Encyclopædia Britannica, articles and illustrations from 9th ed., 1875–89, and 10th ed., 1902–03. Texts on Wikisource: "Cyclopædia". Collier's New Encyclopedia. 1921. "Encyclopædia". Encyclopedia Americana. 1920. "Encyclopædia". The New Student's Reference Work. 1914. "Encyclopaedia". Encyclopædia Britannica (11th ed.). 1911. "Encyclopædia". The Nuttall Encyclopædia. 1907. "Encyclopædia". New International Encyclopedia. 1905. "Cyclopædia". The American Cyclopædia. 1879. Authority control Edit this at Wikidata General Integrated Authority File (Germany) National libraries France (data) 2 (data)United States 2LatviaJapan Other Microsoft Academic Categories: EncyclopediasWorks about history Navigation menu Not logged in Talk Contributions Create account Log in ArticleTalk ReadView sourceView historySearch Search Wikipedia Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Tools What links here Related changes Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Wikidata item Print/export Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Languages Deutsch Español Français 한국어 Italiano Русский Tagalog Tiếng Việt 中文 184 more Edit links This page was last edited on 6 July 2021, at 21:37 (UTC). Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization. Privacy policyAbout WikipediaDisclaimersContact WikipediaMobile viewDevelopersStatisticsCookie statementWikimedia FoundationPowered by MediaWiki Johannes Aventinus From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia Jump to navigationJump to search For other uses, see Aventinus. Johannes Aventinus Johannes Aventinus.png Born 4 July 1477 Abensberg Died 9 January 1534 (aged 56) Regensburg Johann Georg Turmair (or Thurmayr) (4 July 1477 – 9 January 1534), known by the pen name Johannes Aventinus (Latin for "John of Abensberg") or Aventin,[1] was a Bavarian Renaissance humanist historian and philologist. He authored the 1523 Annals of Bavaria, a valuable record of the early history of Germany.[2] Contents 1 Tutor 2 Historian of Bavaria 3 The Reformation 4 Annals of Bavaria 4.1 Teutonic genealogy 5 Legacy 6 Notes 7 External links 8 Further reading Tutor Having studied at Ingolstadt, Vienna, Cracow and Paris, he returned to Ingolstadt in 1507 and in 1509 was appointed tutor to Louis and Ernest, the two younger brothers of William IV, Duke of Bavaria, all three the sons of Albert the Wise, the late duke of Bavaria. Aventinus retained this position until 1517, wrote a Latin grammar (Rudimenta grammaticae latinae; 1512) and other manuals for the use of his pupils, and in 1515 travelled in Italy with Ernest. In his zeal for learning, he helped found the Sodalitas litteraria Angilostadensis, the "literary brotherhood of Ingolstadt", under the auspices of which several old manuscripts were brought to light;[1] however, it soon ceased to exist (1520).[3] Historian of Bavaria In 1517, William appointed him as Bavaria's official historian and commissioned him to write a history of the country.[3] Many of the important authorities which Aventinus collected for this purpose have been preserved only in his copies. He embodied a critical treatment of them in a complete history of Bavaria, Annales Bojorum ("Annals of Bavaria"). His condensed German version of it, the Bayerische Chronik, is the first important history in the German language.[3] The Reformation Aventinus remained a Catholic throughout his life, even though he sympathized with aspects of the Protestant reform.[4] He was in communication with Philipp Melanchthon and Martin Luther.[citation needed] He rejected auricular confession, objected to pilgrimages and indulgences, and opposed the claims of the hierarchy as excessive.[3] He showed a strong dislike for monks. On this account, he was imprisoned in 1528, but his friends soon effected his release. The remainder of his life was somewhat unsettled, and he died at Regensburg.[1] Annals of Bavaria The Annals, which are in seven volumes, deal with the history of Bavaria in conjunction with general history from the earliest times to 1460, and the author shows sympathy for the Empire in its struggle with the Papacy. He took pains with his work, and to some degree anticipated the modern historiography.[1] Another result of his nonconformity was that the Annals were not published until 1554.[3] Many passages were omitted in this Ingolstadt edition, as they reflected on the Roman Catholics.[1] A more complete edition was published at Basel in 1580 by Nicholas Cisner. Aventinus, who has been called the "Bavarian Herodotus," wrote other books of lesser importance, and a complete edition of his works was published at Munich (1881–1886).[1] In his Annals, Aventinus preserved some of the text of the now lost 8th-century chronicle of Creontius. Teutonic genealogy In his Chronik, Aventinus fabricated a succession of Teutonic kings stretching back to the Great Flood, ruling over vast swathes of Germany and surrounding regions until the 1st century BC, and involving themselves in numerous events from Biblical and Classical history. These rulers and their exploits are mostly fictitious, though some are derived from mythological, legendary or historical figures. Examples of the latter are Boiger, Kels II and Teutenbuecher, whose joint reign is given as 127–100 BC, and who are based on King Boiorix of the Cimbri, the unnamed king of the Ambrones, and King Teutobod of the Teutons. Dynasty of Tuitsch Dynasty of Mader Dynasty of Brenner III Unknown dynastic affiliation Ruler Ruler Ruler Tuitsch 2214–2038 Adalger 1377–1328 Mader 644–589 Mannus 1978–1906 Larein 1328–1277 Brenner II & Koenman 589–479 Eingeb 1906–1870 Ylsing 1277–1224 Landein, Antör & Rögör 479–399 Ausstaeb 1870–1820 Brenner I 1224–1186 Brenner III 399–361 Herman 1820–1757 Heccar 1186–1155 Schirm & Brenner IV 361–263 Mers 1757–1711 Frank 1155–1114 Thessel, Lauther & Euring 279–194 Gampar 1711–1667 Wolfheim Siclinger 1114–1056 Dieth I & Diethmer 194–172 Schwab 1667–1621 Kels I, Gal & Hillyr 1056–1006 Baermund & Synpol 172–127 Wandler 1621–1580 Alber (& six unnamed others) 1006–946 Boiger, Kels II & Teutenbuecher 127–100 Deuto 1580–1553 Walther, Panno & Schard 946–884 Scheirer 100–70 Alman 1553–1489 Main, Öngel & Treibl 884–814 Ernst & Vocho 70–50 Baier 1489–1429 Myela, Laber & Penno 814–714 Pernpeist 50–40 Ingram 1429–1377 Venno & Helto 714–644 Cotz, Dieth II & Creitschir c. 40–13 Legacy Ludwig I of Bavaria had Aventinus' bust erected in the Walhalla temple. There is a German wheat beer named after him, made by G. Schneider & Son. Notes One or more of the preceding sentences incorporates text from a publication now in the public domain: Chisholm, Hugh, ed. (1911). "Aventinus". Encyclopædia Britannica. 3 (11th ed.). Cambridge University Press. p. 53. James Wood, ed., The Nuttall Encyclopædia, 1907; a modern biography in English is G. Strauss, Historian in an age of crisis: the life and work of Johannes Aventinus, 1477-1534, 1963. Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Johannes Thurmayr" . Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. Chisholm 1911. External links Wikisource-logo.svg German Wikisource has original text related to this article: Johannes Aventinus Online Galleries, History of Science Collections, University of Oklahoma Libraries High resolution images of works by and/or portraits of Johannes Aventinus in .jpg and .tiff format. Further reading Beck, Heinrich; Geuenich, Dieter; Steuer, Heiko; Hakelberg, Dietrich, eds. (2004). Zur Geschichte der Gleichung "germanisch – deutsch": Sprache und Namen, Geschichte und Institutionen [History of the Equation "Germanic = German": Language and Names, History and Institutions]. Reallexikon der Germanischen Altertumskunde – Ergänzungsbände. Berlin: W. De Gruyter. ISBN 9783110175363. OCLC 54825128. Georg Leidinger (1953), "Aventinus", Neue Deutsche Biographie (in German), 1, Berlin: Duncker & Humblot, pp. 469–470; (full text online) Eberhard Dünninger: Johannes Aventinus: Leben und Werk des Bayerischen Geschichtschreibers, Förg, Rosenheim 1977, ISBN 3-475-52190-3 Bayerische Landesbibliothek Online (BLO): Aventinus: Works: https://www.bayerische-landesbibliothek-online.de/aventinus-works Authority control Edit this at Wikidata General Integrated Authority File (Germany)ISNI 1VIAF 1WorldCat National libraries NorwaySpainFrance (data)CataloniaUnited StatesCzech RepublicAustraliaGreeceIsraelCroatiaNetherlandsPolandSwedenVatican Scientific databases CiNii (Japan) Other Faceted Application of Subject TerminologyRERO (Switzerland) 1SUDOC (France) 1Trove (Australia) 1 Categories: 1477 births1534 deaths16th-century Latin-language writersGerman historiansGerman Renaissance humanistsPeople from the Duchy of BavariaUniversity of Ingolstadt facultyGerman male non-fiction writers Navigation menu Not logged in Talk Contributions Create account Log in ArticleTalk ReadEditView historySearch Search Wikipedia Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Tools What links here Related changes Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Wikidata item Print/export Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Languages Беларуская Български Deutsch Español Français Italiano Português Русский Svenska 9 more Edit links This page was last edited on 22 June 2021, at 02:06 (UTC). Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization. Privacy policyAbout WikipediaDisclaimersContact WikipediaMobile viewDevelopersStatisticsCookie statementWikimedia FoundationPowered by MediaWiki Search CodeWorks 2021 CodeWorks 2021 random 150 Loading history... Kai 8:57 AM Image from iOS Image from iOS Jordan C.:turtle: 8:59 AM does anyone play Code Vein on Xbox One? New taylor (she / her) 9:11 AM Good morning Darian Waters 9:17 AM 9f8hzgym4s971.jpg 9f8hzgym4s971.jpg :laughing: 1 :fearful: 1 Ayo Talib-Bey (He/Him) 9:18 AM I think I'd rather walk :rolling_on_the_floor_laughing: 3 TyTy Rivera 9:53 AM ^^^ 9:55 yall please go hit up your local hot topic, spencers, zoomies, etc. Any store with a poster hanging that you want 9:56 They will give it to you for a fair price. Just bagged a ichigo and saitama poster Kai 9:57 AM waittt you can get the posters they got up in the store on display??? TyTy Rivera 10:01 AM yes Kai 11:17 AM oop lemme get over there and get all their kirby shirt displays- TyTy Rivera 11:50 AM those posters are bigger than they look when you hang it up in ya room TyTy Rivera 11:56 AM saiki k beats goku Darian Waters 12:26 PM static-assets-upload2039716062539613519.png static-assets-upload2039716062539613519.png white_check_mark eyes raised_hands React Reply Send a message to random Search CodeWorks 2021 CodeWorks 2021 tech-support 150 Loading history... Jaden Chapman 12:03 PM what time Sebastian (They/He/It) 12:04 PM anytime before 4pm Sunnie (He/Him) 10:24 AM @Faith Fatukasi Faith Fatukasi 10:53 AM I need a laptop since i currently have a chromebook. Mo 10:54 AM @Faith Fatukasi please Dm me to set it up 2 replies Last reply 1 day agoView thread New Jaden Chapman 1:36 PM my mom is at the building but dosent know where to go Sebastian (They/He/It) 1:39 PM @Jaden Chapman have her wait out side of 10 E North. Under the marquis Jaden Chapman 1:42 PM ok Noah Craig (He/Him/His) 12:27 PM Help please, I logged into my gather and i cannot get back into my class (intro_GameDev) While the I can enter the Codeworks lobby area fine. white_check_mark eyes raised_hands React Reply 12:28 I’ve tried entering the password a few times to no avail. But the room itself has disappeared from my recent spaces. Sebastian (They/He/It) 12:30 PM @Jacob Ferragamo Send a message to tech-support Slack needs your permission to enable notifications. Enable notifications AI About Responsibilities Research Education Tools Blog ABOUT Bringing the benefits of AI to everyone At Google AI, we’re conducting research that advances the state-of-the-art in the field, applying AI to products and to new domains, and developing tools to ensure that everyone can access AI. Google’s mission is to organize the world’s information and make it universally accessible and useful. AI is helping us do that in exciting new ways, solving problems for our users, our customers, and the world. AI is making it easier for people to do things every day, whether it’s searching for photos of loved ones, breaking down language barriers in Google Translate, typing emails on the go, or getting things done with the Google Assistant. AI also provides new ways of looking at existing problems, from rethinking healthcare to advancing scientific discovery. We want to use AI to augment the abilities of people, to enable us to accomplish more and to allow us to spend more time on our creative endeavors. Jeff Dean Google Senior Fellow And most importantly of all, we think AI will have the greatest impact when everyone can access it, and when it’s built with everyone’s benefit in mind. Core to this approach is publishing our research in a wide variety of venues, and open sourcing our tools and systems, like TensorFlow. And while we fundamentally believe in the promise of AI, we also think that it’s critical that this technology is used to help people — that it is socially beneficial, fair, accountable, and works for everyone. Learn more about our work to apply AI to the world’s most pressing problems, and about AI for Social Good, a program that focuses Google’s AI expertise on solving humanitarian and environmental challenges. Explore AI IN ACTION AI is helping people everywhere solve problems big and small See blog Privacy Terms About Google Google Products Feedback AI About Responsibilities Research Education Tools Blog AI FOR SOCIAL GOOD Applying AI to some of the world’s biggest challenges Through research, engineering, and initiatives to build the AI ecosystem, we’re working to use AI to address societal challenges. At Google, we believe that AI can provide new ways of approaching problems and meaningfully improve people’s lives. With AI, we have another tool to explore and address hard, unanswered questions. What if people could predict natural disasters before they happen? Track disease as it spreads, to eliminate it sooner? Or dramatically improve the lives of people with disabilities? AI can help, but it’s not a silver bullet: tackling these questions requires a concerted, collaborative effort across all sectors of society. At Google, we believe that we can meaningfully contribute, drawing on the scale of our products and services, investment in AI research, and our commitment to using and developing AI responsibly. We’re doing that through AI for Social Good, a program that focuses Google’s AI expertise on solving humanitarian and environmental challenges. Our work through the program centers around supporting core research and engineering efforts and empowering the social sector with tools, resources and funding, while engaging with partners across all sectors to have the biggest impact. Further, we are tackling problems within public health, nature & society, climate & energy, accessibility and crisis response. We also strongly believe the ability to find these solutions relies on the expertise of people around the world. That’s why we’ve opened up research centers in Japan, India, Israel, and Accra and are also partnering with nonprofits, academia and public sector organizations to create systemic solutions. Working together to apply AI for social good Supporting COVID-19 AI and data analytics projects Through a Google.org + University Relations joint program, $8.5M+ in funding was awarded to 31 NGOs and academic groups that are using AI and data analytics to aid in COVID-19 response efforts. Projects span across the world and focus on key areas where new information and action is needed to help mitigate the effects of the pandemic. Learn more AI Impact Challenge Google.org issued an open call to organizations around the world to submit their ideas for how they could use AI to help address societal challenges. We received applications from 119 countries, spanning 6 continents with projects ranging from environmental to humanitarian. We selected 20 organizations to support. These selected organizations are receiving customized support to help bring their ideas to life: coaching from Google’s AI experts, Google.org grant funding from a $25M pool, credit and consulting from Google Cloud, and more. Learn more Get started with machine learning basics We’ve developed a guide with educational content to support social impact organizations interested in using AI. Whether you’re a novice or interested in upleveling your ML skill set, get started by exploring our guide. Explore the guide Learn more about AI for social good projects at Google We’re working on research and engineering projects focused on using AI for social and environmental impact. Explore some of our recent projects. Quickly and accurately forecasting floods Quickly and accurately forecasting floods Floods are the most common and deadly natural disaster on the planet. By collecting data on various environmental and geographic factors that influence flood activity, we’re able to synthesize that information with AI to improve warning systems. Helping people with atypical speech be better understood Helping people with atypical speech be better understood Project Euphonia is a Google Research initiative focused on helping people with atypical speech be better understood. The approach is centered on analyzing speech recordings to better train speech recognition models. COVID-19 Open Data repository COVID-19 Open Data repository For researchers to understand and address the impacts of COVID-19 they need access to useful high-quality data, which has posed a significant challenge. Much of the publicly available data is scattered, incomplete, or compiled in many different formats. To help researchers spend more of their time understanding the disease instead of wrangling data, we developed a COVID-19 Open Data repository to make it simpler to discover high-quality public datasets. AI4SG from Google Research India AI4SG from Google Research India At Google Research India, we are collaborating with NGOs and Academics to advance AI research along with real-world impact. Our work ranges from improving maternal health outcomes, providing targeted information for HIV prevention, preventing human-wildlife conflict, improving the quality of Public Health Data and more. RESEARCH Research is core to our mission to bring the benefits of AI to everyone Explore our research Privacy Terms About Google Google Products FeedbackGoogle serves cookies to analyze traffic to this site. Information about your use of our site is shared with Google for that purpose.See details.OK Skip to Main Content The Keyword AI Share Subscribe OFFICIAL BLOG AI Stories and updates on the cutting-edge work Google is doing in artificial intelligence and machine learning. FOLLOW US Article's hero media AI Partnerships for advanced weather and climate prediction Our work with National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and other organizations to understand and predict the weather. READ ARTICLE SERIES Powered by TensorFlow TensorFlow, our open source machine learning library, is just that—open to anyone. Learn mor... NOV 2020 / POWERED BY TENSORFLOW 5 ways to celebrate TensorFlow's 5th birthday DEC 2019 / AI How a college student became a planet hunter NOV 2019 / AI Machine learning meets African agriculture VIEW THIS SERIES Top Stories AI Machine learning meets African agriculture AI How a college student became a planet hunter GOOGLE EARTH Using AI to find where the wild things are All the Latest JUL 08 / GOOGLE NEWS INITIATIVE Launching the AI Academy for small newsrooms JUL 08 / AUSTRALIA Kick like a pro with Footy Skills Lab JUL 07 / ASK A TECHSPERT Ask a Techspert: What’s a neural network? JUN 30 / AI An update on our progress in responsible AI innovation JUN 29 / ARTS & CULTURE Douglas Coupland fuses AI and art to inspire students JUN 29 / AI How we’re supporting 30 new AI for Social Good projects MAY 21 / GOOGLE CLOUD Finding any Cartier watch in under 3 seconds LOAD MORE STORIES Follow Us Privacy Terms About Google Google Products About the Keyword Help English Google serves cookies to analyze traffic to this site. Information about your use of our site is shared with Google for that purpose. See details. OK Skip to Main Content The Keyword Partnerships for advanced weather and climate prediction Share Subscribe AI Partnerships for advanced weather and climate prediction Oct 27, 2020 2 mins read J Jason Hickey Software Engineer Share Article's hero media When I was a child, growing up on an almond farm in central California, the day always began by turning on the radio and listening to the forecasters talking about temperature, precipitation, and something called “evapotranspiration rate.” I didn’t know what all those terms meant at the time, but I could see how my father made decisions based on what he heard, like when to water, or when to harvest. Now, when I chat with my colleagues around the world on video conference, they’re making daily decisions based on the weather around them, just like my father did on the farm. Some decisions are routine and others are dramatic, including decisions about what to wear for a walk outside, or how to prepare a family for extreme events like hurricanes and wildfires. At Google, we’ve been using AI research to develop new methods for understanding and predicting the weather, including hyperlocal precipitation forecasting to support precise personal decision making, flood forecasting in India and Bangladesh, and computational methods that can help improve the accuracy of forecasting technology. We’re also partnering with institutions that supply forecasts and technology. This month, we began working with the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) Satellite and Information Service (NESDIS) to explore the benefits of artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning (ML) for enhancing NOAA’s use of satellite and environmental data. Together, NESDIS and Google will use AI and ML to amplify NOAA’s environmental monitoring, weather forecasting and climate research using Google Cloud infrastructure. By working directly with NOAA’s forecast scientists, we’ll be able to utilize the vast amount of satellite and other environmental data that NOAA collects to enhance prediction for extreme weather events, such as hurricanes and tornadoes. Related, in August, the U.S. National Science Foundation (NSF) announced the AI Institute for Research on Trustworthy AI in Weather, Climate, and Coastal Oceanography (AI2ES) led by Amy McGovern at the University of Oklahoma, with Google as a founding member. This Institute includes seven academic institutions, four private-sector partners, as well as U.S. government and federally-funded labs. AI2ES assembles researchers from the atmospheric and ocean sciences and risk communication to develop trustworthy AI technology to address concerns in weather, climate, and coastal hazards prediction. The team will create educational pathways to develop a more diverse AI and environmental science workforce. AI2ES logo, an illustration of people and various weather conditions AI2ES logo Now, when I look at the fundamental scope and depth of these partnerships in the atmospheric sciences, I know my father would approve that the work is meaningful and relevant. And then he’d tell me to get back to work. POSTED IN: AI Related stories AI An update on our progress in responsible AI innovation Over the past year, responsibly developed AI has transformed health screenings, supported fact-checking to battle misinformation and save... By Kent Walker Marian Croak Jun 30, 2021 Slogans for the Class of 2030.png ARTS & CULTURE Douglas Coupland fuses AI and art to inspire students By Chris Henry Jun 29, 2021 ARMANN AI How we’re supporting 30 new AI for Social Good projects By Milind Tambe Jun 29, 2021 Cartier Google Cloud App.gif GOOGLE CLOUD Finding any Cartier watch in under 3 seconds By Alex Erfurt Anant Nawalgaria May 21, 2021 IO 2021 heroes_3.jpg AI 11 ways we're innovating with AI By Christine Robson May 20, 2021 Maysam Moussalem THE SHE WORD Maysam Moussalem teaches Googlers human-centered AI By MJ Pham May 19, 2021 Follow Us Privacy Terms About Google Google Products About the Keyword Help English Contracts Clauses Dictionary Resources About Pricing Sign In Sign Up Home Clauses Term of agreement Term of Agreement Sample Clauses Filter & Search Clause: Term of Agreement Contract Type Jurisdiction Country Include Keywords Exclude Keywords Additional filters are available in search Open Search Related Clauses Miscellaneous Severability Definitions Notices Governing Law Termination Entire Agreement Counterparts Parent Clauses Miscellaneous Term and Termination NOW, THEREFORE General Provisions Term AGREEMENT Effective Date Term Termination and Disconnection Miscellaneous Provisions Employment Special Conditions Remove Advertising Related Contracts Agreement Change in Control Agreement Collective Agreement Employment Agreement Investment Advisory Agreement Sub-Clauses Term Duration Agreement to Continue in Force Commencement of Bargaining Termination Changes in Agreement Effective Date of Agreement Initial Term Effective Date Change in Agreement Top Definition for Term of Agreement Term of Agreement means the term of this Agreement as specified in Section 9.01 hereof. See All Term of Agreement Definitions Remove Advertising Open Split View Download Share Cite Term of Agreement. This Agreement shall become effective as of the date of its execution and shall continue in effect for a period of two years from the date of execution. Thereafter, this Agreement shall continue automatically for successive annual periods, provided such continuance is specifically approved at least annually by (i) the Board or (ii) a vote of a “majority” (as defined in the 1940 Act) of the Portfolio’s outstanding voting securities, provided that in either event the continuance also is approved by a majority of the Board who are not “interested persons” (as defined in the 1940 Act) of any party to this Agreement, by vote cast in person at a meeting called for the purpose of voting on such approval. This Agreement is terminable, without penalty, at any time, by the Manager, by the Board, or by vote of holders of a majority (as defined in the 1940 Act) of the Portfolio’s shares; or on 60 days’ written notice by the Adviser, and will terminate five business days after the Adviser receives written notice of the termination of the Management Agreement between the Trust and the Manager. This Agreement also will terminate automatically in the event of its assignment (as defined in the 1940 Act). Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (732) Save Copy Remove Advertising Term of Agreement. The term of this Agreement shall begin as of the date and year upon which the Fund listed on Appendix A commences investment operations, and unless sooner terminated as hereinafter provided, this Agreement shall remain in effect for a period of two years. Thereafter, this Agreement shall continue in effect with respect to each Fund from year to year, subject to the termination provisions and all other terms and conditions hereof; PROVIDED, such continuance with respect to a Fund is approved at least annually by vote of the holders of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of the Fund or by the Trustees of the Trust; PROVIDED, that in either event such continuance is also approved annually by the vote, cast in person at a meeting called for the purpose of voting on such approval, of a majority of the Trustees of the Trust who are not parties to this Agreement or interested persons of either party hereto. The Adviser shall furnish to the Trust, promptly upon its request, such information as may reasonably be necessary to evaluate the terms of this Agreement or any extension, renewal or amendment thereof. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (672) Save Copy Term of Agreement. This Agreement and the Security Interest shall terminate on the date on which all payments under the Notes have been made in full and all other Obligations have been paid or discharged. Upon such termination, the Secured Party, at the request and at the expense of the Company, will join in executing any termination statement with respect to any financing statement executed and filed pursuant to this Agreement. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (588) Save Copy Term of Agreement. The term of this Agreement shall begin on the date first above written, and unless sooner terminated as hereinafter provided, this Agreement shall remain in effect through April 30, 2016. Thereafter, this Agreement shall continue in effect from year to year, with respect to the Fund, subject to the termination provisions and all other terms and conditions hereof, so long as: (a) such continuation shall be specifically approved at least annually by the board of directors of the Corporation or by vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of the Fund and, concurrently with such approval by the board of directors or prior to such approval by the holders of the outstanding voting securities of the Fund, as the case may be, by the vote, cast in person at a meeting called for the purpose of voting on such approval, of a majority of the directors of the Corporation, with respect to the Fund, who are not parties to this Agreement or interested persons of any such party; and (b) the Manager shall not have notified the Corporation, in writing, at least 60 days prior to April 30, 2016 or prior to April 30th of any year thereafter, that it does not desire such continuation. The Manager shall furnish to the Corporation, promptly upon its request, such information as may reasonably be necessary to evaluate the terms of this Agreement or any extension, renewal, or amendment hereof. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (532) Save Copy Term of Agreement. This Agreement shall continue in full force and effect until the tenth (10th) anniversary of Bank Closing; provided, that the provisions of Section 6.3 and 6.4 shall survive the expiration of the term of this Agreement; and provided further, that the receivership of the Failed Bank may be terminated prior to the expiration of the term of this Agreement, and in such event, the guaranty of the Corporation, as provided in and in accordance with the provisions of Section 12.7 shall be in effect for the remainder of the term of this Agreement. Expiration of the term of this Agreement shall not affect any claim or liability of any party with respect to any (i) amount which is owing at the time of such expiration, regardless of when such amount becomes payable, and (ii) breach of this Agreement occurring prior to such expiration, regardless of when such breach is discovered. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (502) Save Copy Term of Agreement. This Agreement shall terminate upon the date that all obligations of the parties hereto with respect to this Agreement have been satisfied. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (458) Save Copy Term of Agreement. This Agreement and the Security Interests shall terminate on the date on which all payments under the Debentures have been indefeasibly paid in full and all other Obligations have been paid or discharged; provided, however, that all indemnities of the Debtors contained in this Agreement (including, without limitation, Annex B hereto) shall survive and remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of the termination of this Agreement. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (377) Save Copy Remove Advertising Term of Agreement. This Agreement, and all rights and obligations of the parties hereunder, shall take effect upon the Effective Date and shall expire upon the first to occur of (a) the expiration of the Term (as defined below) if a Change in Control has not occurred during the Term, (b) the termination of the Executive's employment with the Company prior to the Change in Control Date, (c) the date 12 months after the Change in Control Date, if the Executive is still employed by the Company as of such later date, or (d) the fulfillment by the Company of all of its obligations under Sections 4 and 5.2 if the Executive's employment with the Company terminates within 12 months following the Change in Control Date. "Term" shall mean the period commencing as of the Effective Date and continuing in effect through December 31, 2007; provided, however, that commencing on January 1, 2008 and each January 1 thereafter, the Term shall be automatically extended for one additional year unless, not later than 90 days prior to the scheduled expiration of the Term (or any extension thereof), the Company shall have given the Executive written notice that the Term will not be extended. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (361) Save Copy Term of Agreement. The Term of this Agreement shall commence on the effective date hereof and shall continue in effect through December 31, 2007; provided, however, that commencing on January 1, 2007 and each January 1 thereafter, the Term shall automatically be extended for one additional year unless, not later than September 30 of the preceding year, the Company or the Executive shall have given notice not to extend the Term; and further provided, however, that if a Change in Control shall have occurred during the Term, the Term shall expire no earlier than twenty-four (24) months beyond the month in which such Change in Control occurred. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (358) Save Copy Term of Agreement. This Agreement shall be effective on the date hereof and shall continue in effect until the Company shall have given three (3) years’ written notice of cancellation; provided, that, notwithstanding the delivery of any such notice, this Agreement shall continue in effect for a period of two (2) years after a Change in Control, if such Change in Control shall have occurred during the term of this Agreement. Moreover, if Executive is party to a written employment agreement with the Company at the time of a Change in Control, and such agreement would otherwise expire during the Termination Period, the term of such agreement shall automatically be extended to the end of the Termination Period or, if earlier, Executive’s Retirement. Notwithstanding anything in this Section to the contrary, except as provided in the second sentence of Section 1(r), this Agreement shall terminate if Executive or the Company Terminates Executive’s Employment prior to a Change in Control. Sample 1 Sample 2 Sample 3 See All (328) Save Copy Contracts Clauses Dictionary Resources About Pricing Search Law Insider Resources Contract TeardownDraftingFeaturedWebinarsGuides & Checklists Resources for drafting and negotiating better contracts. Contract Teardown June 30, 2021 • Contract Teardown Independent Contractor Arbitration Clause from Amazon Few clauses create more friction than arbitration clauses—particularly arbitration clauses that end up in front of the Supreme Court of the United States. In two cases, Amazon drivers sought reclassification as independent contractors in order to avoid an arbitration clause. Amazon’s ultimately unsuccessful struggle to enforce arbitration reveals how difficult these clauses can be to draft. In this episode of the Contract Teardown show, attorney Margeaux Thomas pulls lessons from Amazon’s experience so that you can draft better contracts. By Margeaux ThomasMike Whelan June 22, 2021 • Contract Teardown Wizards of the Coast Open Game License Did Dungeons and Dragons change the copyright world? Most companies use copyright licenses to strictly control the reproduction of intellectual property; the makers of Dungeons & Dragons went another way. Through the Open Game License, Wizards of the Coast created a community and a new standard for content-based licensing that contract professionals can learn from. By Bob TarantinoMike Whelan June 14, 2021 • Contract Teardown AXA Cybersecurity Insurance Policy Historically, insurers protected against cyber risk in narrow, hard-to-get, and expensive ways. With few significant breaches, the limits made sense. But now breaches—and the policies that compensate for them—are common. So what should you know about these cybersecurity insurance policies? What should they include? How do you advise clients about their assumptions or risks and smart costs? In this issue of the Contract Teardown, attorney Eric Drattell walks us through the most important red flags and wise counsel around the burgeoning field of cybersecurity insurance policies. By Eric DrattellMike Whelan June 9, 2021 • Contract Teardown Kanye West's Contract in Plain English It’s hard to think of anything more frustrating than signing on to a contract that, turns out, you didn’t understand at all. Kanye West felt this frustration over one of his music contracts. He posted his contract publicly to show what he meant. Contract drafting expert Ross Guberman touches on necessary and unnecessary language, why this conversation is important, and how to implement these tactics in any industry. By Ross GubermanMike Whelan Drafting May 11, 2021 • Drafting Y-Combinator SAFE Agreement Briefing Matias expounds on his teardown of the Y Combinator SAFE Agreements, discussing why this document is important and some of the common practices to watch out for. By Matias Vukusic January 17, 2021 • DraftingFeatured Cannabis Simple Agreement for Future Equity The primary goal of the cannabis Safe is to address the regulatory complexities that come with raising money in the industry. For example, depending on whether a company is raising a priced round (i.e., selling equity at a fixed valuation) or a convertible security round (i.e., a Safe or convertible note), each triggers different regulatory reporting and/or approval processes. By Jason Kornfeld August 13, 2020 • Drafting Negotiation Skills – Art of Manipulation The role of lawyers in a transaction ranges not only from document drafting and reviewing but also to negotiating. In fact, from my perspective, drafting and reviewing documents are the basic skills that each and every lawyer must be well-equipped with while negotiation technique is what defines an outstanding lawyer. By Bao Quoc Nguyen July 24, 2020 • Drafting How to Write an International Commercial Arbitration Agreement Successfully crafting an international commercial arbitration agreement requires the writer to incorporate certain fundamental elements into the text. By Jasper Allen Barrientos Featured May 11, 2021 • Featured Law Insider Announces Partnership with Eigen Technologies Law Insider, the leading contract and clause database, today announces an exclusive partnership with Eigen Technologies, the global Document AI technology provider. By Preston Clark January 17, 2021 • DraftingFeatured Cannabis Simple Agreement for Future Equity The primary goal of the cannabis Safe is to address the regulatory complexities that come with raising money in the industry. For example, depending on whether a company is raising a priced round (i.e., selling equity at a fixed valuation) or a convertible security round (i.e., a Safe or convertible note), each triggers different regulatory reporting and/or approval processes. By Jason Kornfeld October 6, 2020 • Featured Law Insider Announces Content Partnership with Laura Frederick Law Insider is announcing today its partnership with attorney and contracts expert Laura Frederick. By Preston Clark September 17, 2020 • Featured Kanye’s Contracts (Full PDF) Law Insider compiled Kanye West’s contract tweetstorm into complete, downloadable contracts. By Preston Clark Webinars February 2, 2021 • Webinars How to Negotiate Compliance Contract Provisions Ethics and compliance concerns pervade today’s business world. Companies worry about everything from conflicts of interest to ethics to anti-bribery. Because of their importance, it is critical that we properly address compliance in our contracts. Everyone who works with contracts needs to know what compliance provisions should say and how to negotiate them. By Amee SandhuAsha PalmerLaura Frederick December 29, 2020 • Webinars How to Negotiate Payment Contract Provisions Precise and clear price and payment contract provisions are critical to the success of every commercial deals. While most attorneys and professionals have no problems drafting simple price and payment provisions, they may find themselves challenged when the terms and issues become more complex. By Sarah McElvaneyChad KingLaura Frederick November 18, 2020 • Webinars How to Negotiate Cybersecurity Contract Provisions In this on-demand webinar, our host Laura Frederick speaks with Raella Dyke, Deal Support Lead, Cybersecurity Governance, Risk & Compliance at HP, and Carlyn Epstein, Corporate Counsel at The Clorox Company. By Laura Frederick September 29, 2020 • Webinars How to Negotiate a Podcasting Agreement Ever wonder how top tech/media transactional lawyers draft and negotiate agreements? Well, this webinar is your chance to find out! By Gabe MeisterLaura Frederick Guides & Checklists February 10, 2021 • Guides & Checklists 12 Practical Tips on How to Negotiate Contracts By Laura Frederick Contributors We’re launching the Law Insider newsletter and we’re looking for contributors. If you’re interested in sharing your expertise with our community of over 300,000 subscribers, please complete this short form so we can match your expertise and interest with our publication calendar. Have questions? Please send email to community@lawinsider.com Plans & Pricing Individual Subscription Law Insider for Teams Education and Government Learn More About Law Insider Read Reviews on G2 Law Insider on YouTube Help FAQ & Knowledge Base Support: support@lawinsider.com Sales: sales@lawinsider.com All contents of the lawinsider.com excluding publicly sourced documents are Copyright © 2013-2021 Law Insider Inc. All rights reserved. View our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. Scholastic Logo SHOPDown Arrow BOOK CLUBS BOOK FAIRS EDUCATORS MAGAZINESProfile Icon Recommended Books Writing a Newspaper Article Teach students to turn their research and interviews into vibrant, interesting stories Grades 3–5, 6–8 FROM Most newspaper articles break down into two categories: News articles Feature articles You will also find opinion pieces, like editorials and book and movie reviews. But this lesson deals strictly with news and feature articles. Here's how you can tell the difference between a news story and a feature story. News articles cover the basics of current events. They answer the questions: who, what, where, how, and when? Feature articles are longer and more in depth than regular news articles. They cover one subject from multiple angles and are written in a more creative, entertaining format. Although a news story can be creative and entertaining, too. Check out the examples below. It is important to remember that both news and features demand the same level of research and reporting. Read examples of news and feature articles from the Scholastic Kids Press Corps. Read them all, then write your own articles modeled after them. The Basic Story Outline The best way to structure a newspaper article is to first write an outline. Review your research and notes. Then jot down ideas for the following six sections. Remember, this is just a foundation upon which to build your story. I. Lead sentence Grab and hook your reader right away. II. Introduction Which facts and figures will ground your story? You have to tell your readers where and when this story is happening. III. Opening quotation What will give the reader a sense of the people involved and what they are thinking? IV. Main body What is at the heart of your story? V. Closing quotation Find something that sums the article up in a few words. VI. Conclusion (optional—the closing quote may do the job) What is a memorable way to end your story? The end quote is a good way to sum things up. That doesn’t always work. If you are quoting more than one person with different points of view in your story, you cannot end with a quote from just one of them. Giving one of your interviewees the last word can tilt the story in their favor. In this age of the Internet, you can also end your story with a link to more information or even your own behind-the-scenes blog post. Now It’s Your Turn STEP 1: Read an article from the Scholastic Kids Press Corps and fill in the following blanks: What is the…? Lead sentence: Introduction: Opening quotation: Main body: Closing quotation: Conclusion: Remember, not ALL of these elements may be represented in the story, or even in one place. STEP 2: Now, using your research and notes, write an outline for your own article. Remember, your first version of a story is a first draft, not a finished article. Here a few good tips for turning in a quality story to your editor/teacher. Read the story at least one time for comprehension. You want to make sure your writing tells a story with a beginning, middle, and end. Also, check to make sure you have at least two good quotes in it if at all possible. Go back over your draft to check for spelling and punctuation errors. Now, read it out loud. This will help you catch any awkward phrases, or sentences that don’t sound right. Once your piece is polished, turn it in to your editor. Be sure you have a slug or headline (which tells the subject of the story), a date, and your byline. Related Subjects JOURNALISM Related Content ARTICLE Teaching Students How to Conduct Journalistic Research From Scholastic Kids Press Corps ARTICLE Writing Tips For News Stories From Scholastic Kids Press Corps ARTICLE How to Conduct a Journalistic Interview From Scholastic Kids Press Corps ARTICLE Creating a Class Newspaper From Scholastic Kids Press Corps PRIVACY POLICY Terms of Use TM ® & © 2021 Scholastic Inc. All Rights Reserved. Wordyard Hand-forged posts since 2002 Scott Rosenberg About Greatest hits Search this website Archives Archives Select Month Large blocks of uninterrupted text: a talk on blogging and “Say Everything” This is a light-edit/fleshing-out/neatening-up of a talk I gave Oct. 20, 2010, at College of St. Rose in Albany, NY. I want to start with a story from the Onion. Because really, shouldn’t every talk start with a story from the Onion? This is from earlier this year. The headline reads: “Nation Shudders At Large Block Of Uninterrupted Text.” “Unable to rest their eyes on a colorful photograph or boldface heading that could be easily skimmed and forgotten, Americans collectively recoiled Monday when confronted with a solid block of uninterrupted text. “Dumbfounded citizens from Maine to California gazed helplessly at the frightening chunk of print, unsure of what to do next. “Without an illustration, chart, or embedded YouTube video to ease them in, millions were frozen in place, terrified by the sight of one long, unbroken string of English words. ” ‘It demands so much of my time and concentration,’ said Chicago resident Dale Huza, who was confronted by the confusing mound of words early Monday afternoon. ‘This large block of text, it expects me to figure everything out on my own, and I hate it.’ ” This is a sign of how rough the outlook sometimes seems for our culture of reading and writing. In fact, every generation fears the death of literacy at the hands of some new media technology. And yet I’m here to share some optimism. After long existence as a confirmed cynic who shared the general belief in our imminent cultural doom, I felt an unfamiliar sensation 15 years ago when the Internet came over the horizon: I found myself becoming excited and hopeful. When I looked at the Internet I saw a medium that involves a huge amount of reading. Sure, a lot of it is presented in a highly decorated or distracting form. But a lot of it is in large blocks of uninterrupted text, too! And there’s something even more significant: The Web isn’t just inspiring a lot of reading. it has also opened the opportunity for a stunning amount of new writing. When I was growing up in the 1960s and 70s, the chief fear on behalf of literary culture was that television was going to destroy it. What if we were becoming a nation of passive, glassy-eyed couch potatoes — mindless consumers of numbing video entertainment? To some extent, that happened. Yet we survived! And then something came along that challenged TV. The Web was a two-way medium. Each consumer was also a potential creator or contributor in a way that never happened, couldn’t happen, with television. That’s a huge transformation of our media landscape, And we’re still just getting our heads around it. So this is the National Day on Writing. I confess I didn’t know there was such a thing till I got this invitation. I’m delighted there is. But it’s an odd construction: “Day *on* writing.” It sort of sounds like those old ads that went, “This is your brain on drugs.” Think about it: What is “your brain on writing” — or even “our world on writing”? That’s what I’m going to talk about today. So this Day on Writing is a great thing. I admit, when I first heard it, I thought it was “day *of* writing.” You know: What are we doing here? We should all be writing, right now! Of course, the only way to be a writer is to write frequently, regularly — ideally, daily. You could always do this, long before there was any such thing as a blog. You could keep a diary or a notebook or a commonplace book. but you couldn’t do it in public, for an audience. Now pretty much anyone can do that. And that’s changed our world in some big ways — some welcome, some distressing. When I titled my book “Say Everything” I don’t think I realized quite what I was getting into. It turns out to be a really interesting title. First of all, I promise I will not even attempt to say everything myself today. I’ll talk for maybe 30, 35 minutes, and then open it up for more of a conversation — which is very much the spirit of this topic, anyway. Pretty soon after I started working on this book I realized that the title was sort of a taunt to myself. Say everything? Saying everything is a writer’s dream. It’s what you think you’ll get to do when you write a book. Get it all between covers! Then you learn that a book ends up feeling really short. And you never get to say more than a fraction of what you want. The title also turned out to be problematic, because everyone, from my first radio interviewer on, gets it wrong. They say “Say *Anything*.” So don’t worry about it if you do, too. I don’t mind — it’s OK. I’m used to it. But my advice is, don’t give your book a title that’s just a little different from a popular old movie’s name. I chose the title because it seems to touch on so much of what’s exciting and what’s threatening, too, about blogging and all the other changes that we call, collectively, the digital revolution. “Say everything”: the phrase suggests the thrill of the universal project the Web sometimes seems to be, in which everyone gets to contribute to a vast collective conversation and pool of knowledge. “Say everything” also raises all kinds of questions about this new world. If we say everything, how will we have time to listen? And, “Aren’t some things better left unsaid?” So these are some of the things I’m going to look at today. Now, a little about the book itself. SAY EVERYTHING tells the story of blogging. Where did this thing come from? Who got it going, and what were their stories? So it’s a kind of contemporary history. I get two reactions when I say that: One group of people, in the technology industry, thinks blogging is now old hat. It’s over. They’ll say, “Blogging? That’s SO 1999!” They’ve already moved on. The other group, which I think is bigger than the first group, says: History? Blogging? What history? It’s so new! In fact, blogging by that name is now a decade old, and websites that were really blogs in all but name have been around since roughly the mid ’90s. There’s a lot of history — a lot of stories — tales of what happens when people get the chance to say everything they want to in public. I think these stories have a lot to teach us about how to navigate the opportunities and pitfalls of life online. The culture of Silicon Valley, the tech industry and the Web tends to have a very short memory. And even though the story of how blogging began is a recent one, it’s not that well known. I wrote “Say Everything” because I thought it would be good to get this story down while it’s still fresh. And I was lucky — I’d watched a lot of it first hand. I built my first website in 1994. And I want to take you back to those days, the early days of the Web. Have any of you seen a video that was circulating a while back called “Medieval Help Desk”? Look it up when you have a chance. This is the one where the medieval monk in Scandinavia is freaked out about this new thing called a “book.” He’s used to scrolls! Books are a weird new interface. He has to ask a helpdesk guy to explain to him how to open it, how to turn pages, and so on. He’s afraid the text will disappear when he closes the covers. It’s a reminder that every technology we take for granted today was once forbidding and unfamiliar. The Web was the same way at first. So back then I was the technology editor at Salon.com. My job was to find and assign stories about the Web and computing. We needed one story a week at first — later, we really cranked it up to one story a day. We’d take that story and edit it and illustrate it and publish it with a certain amount of loving care. And people liked it — we did good work — but we could only do so much. There were a bunch of other websites that I found myself returning to over and over during the course of my day. Because every time I returned to them, they seemed to have something new. These sites didn’t put a lot of time and effort into each story. In fact, they didn’t really publish stories — they posted items. Some of these sites were produced by professionals; others were one-man shows, amateur efforts. They all shared some traits: they tended to be written in a casual, personal voice. they linked a lot. And they didn’t have a “lead story” or “top story.” Each time they posted something new, it went at the top of the page. Now, I was an editor. I spent lots of time in meetings that were held for the purpose of deciding what goes on top of the page. And here these sites were saying, “Go home. We don’t need you to do that.” So this was a little distressing to me as an editor. And yet I kept going back to these sites. They worked. They got news out fast. And they were easy to use. What these early bloggers had discovered was a way of organizing writing that was native to the Web. It made such sense that it took off. It wasn’t an import from print or broadcasting. It was discovered by outsiders who fell in love with the Web and what it could do. SAY EVERYTHING tells some of their stories. So let me get a reading: How many of you read blogs? How many write a blog? To answer these questions you probably had to pause and ask: What exactly is a blog? We don’t have a formal definition, do we? The usual definition of “blog” is: A personal website where the newest material goes on top — often with lots of links to other sites. That definition is pretty neutral. It describes a form. But blogging was also the embodiment of a vision: The idea that the web should be two way — that we should be writing it as well as reading it. The spread of blogging represented the first time this idea of a two-way web got implemented on a really large scale. That’s why I think the story of blogging is worth our time as we see our culture filling up with ever more efficient variations on this idea –led by Facebook and Twitter and multiplying on all these ever smaller and more versatile little devices that we carry in our pockets. In SAY EVERYTHING I tried to sort of follow a spark that started among software developers, and then spread to upstart journalists and political writers and concerned citizens, and then out into the business world and pop culture and beyond. This spark carried the ideas of blogging into wider and wider circles of society. Let’s look at what those ideas were. The first idea is self-expression. Blogs are usually written in the first person and they are most often autobiographical. This is not, in itself, revolutionary. The ideal of self-expression isn’t some late-20th-century innovation. It has a long pedigree. I think of Walt Whitman’s Song of Myself. the essays of Montaigne. the diaries of Samuel Pepys. The confessions of St. Augustine. The difference today is that the opportunity is much more widely available to express yourself in public. In the early days of the web people began to realize this. One of those people was a guy named Justin Hall whose story opens my book. He was a student at Swarthmore in the mid-90s who told the story of his life as he lived it every day on the Web — then discovered the limits of that way of being. His tale is instructive for all of us in the Facebook age. Justin found that, tempting as it is to try to say everything, it can really mess up your life. For any of us to say everything about our life isn’t really possible and probably isn’t a good idea. The second idea at the heart of blogging is novelty. With a blog, the new stuff goes on top. This appeals to our innate sensory makeup. Our brains are finely tuned to sense what’s new inour environment. If a cat walked across this stage over there — and this has happened to me! — you’d stop paying any attention to me. The cat would be the new thing here. Blogs feed that. This is also a temptation, of course. It can lead us toward superficiality. We can find ourselves skimming the surface of the present And neglecting the timeless. This doesn’t worry me as much as it might. Because the Web has a beautiful duality at its heart. The stuff we post online is often ephemeral, of the moment, but it’s also archival. It has a staying power that our spoken words don’t. However casual our online writing may be, it is still writing. This brings me to the third idea at the heart of blogging, which is linking — connection. Links are pretty mundane: they just take you from one page to another, right? But links also represent paths of our attention. The links that bloggers put into their posts leave trails of meaning. These trails tell us what’s of note and lasting value in the vast pile of stuff we’re accumulating online. They sort out the present and leave a record for the future. Their value can be really simple, like: helping you find something you want to reread. They also provide usable data for programs and services that can mine unexpected meaning from our collective writing output. That’s how Google built what is still the most valuable tool for finding anything on the Web. So we have self-expression. Novelty. And links. Put that all together and you get a picture of what kind of writing blogging is: Personal, immediate, and connected. If you understand that, you can see why it has become so popular, even though so many of us looked at it at first and thought, what’s the big deal? Once it became popular, blogging also became the target of a series of criticisms about subjects like trust and truth, anonymity and civility, narcissism and shallowness, overload and addiction. These criticisms are worth spending some time on. They are proxies of a sort for the larger debate we’re all having today over the role of the Internet in our society and whether it is a force for good or ill. I want to begin here with a story. it’s about a blogger named Joey deVilla who calls himself Accordion Guy. (Cause he plays an accordion.) And it’s a story that didn’t make it into Say Everything – so you can think of this as a kind of bonus track. Now, to understand this story you need to know one thing in advance. If you study computer science, you know it already. There’s this problem in computer science called P=NP. Doesn’t matter right now what it is. What’s important is, nobody can prove that P=NP. If you could prove it, you’d get a million dollar prize. Hasn’t happened yet. It’s an unsolved problem. Anyway, here’s the story: Joey DeVilla is a computer programmer and blogger who plays an accordion. In 2003 he wrote a long post about a very strange situation. He’d started dating someone he called the New Girl and begun writing about his excitement at this new relationship. He even wrote a post on “Ten cool things about the New Girl.” Then he gets an email telling him: “Stop. You don’t know this person. I do. Everything she tells you about her life, including a lot of those ten cool things, is a lie. She’s pathological. She’s left behind a long line of people she’s taken advantage of. Beware!” So of course Joey DeVilla the Accordion Guy finds this really upsetting. He can’t believe it. He corresponds more with his informant, whom he refers to as Whistleblower. She seems reasonable and for real and what she says is plausible. Joey calls the Web company where New Girl had said she worked. Nobody there has ever heard of her. Accordion Guy comes to think Whistleblower might be right. But he has to know, he has to confront New Girl and be sure. So he lays everything out for her. She protests that he’s got it all wrong, she’s telling the truth about everything — for instance, about being a computer programmer with a computer science degree. So here’s what Joey DeVilla does: he pulls this trick he remembers from an old episode of Columbo. Here is the conversation as he presents it in the post where he tells this story. Me: So you really did graduate from computer engineering? New Girl: Yes I did! Me: And you took the “Algorithms” course? New Girl: Of course! Me: And you have all the papers you wrote? New Girl: Yes! I kept them all, and I’ll show them to you tomorrow! Me: I want to see the one we always called the “Hell Paper” — the mandatory fourth-year paper. You know the one, where we prove that P = NP? New Girl: I did that! I proved P = NP! Me: Gotcha. So Accordion Guy sadly concludes that his Whistleblower was right. And he says goodbye to his New Girl. End of story. So let’s start looking at this list of criticisms of blogging and the Web, using Joey DeVilla’s story as sort of a lens. Now, the standard take on trust and the Internet is, don’t trust anything you read on the Internet, right? It’s a cesspool of lies! Nobody is who they say they are! But now let’s look at this from where Accordion Guy is sitting. This person he met in the “real” world — this person he was having a relationship with — turned out to be a serial liar. And this anonymous whistleblower who contacted him out of the blue on the Internet, through his blog, turns out to be telling the truth. This is just one anecdote, of course and, as they say, the plural of anecdote is not “fact.” Still, if you spend a lot of time out there reading blogs and listening to the stories of the people who write them, you do begin to see a pattern. it turns out that there is very little correlation between whether you are online or offline and whether you are telling the truth or lying. It also turns out that people who share their stories in public frequently find that they create a bond with their readers. They expose vulnerabilities to the world. Doing this can invite assault and produce wounds. But it can also invite support and produce growth. This problem of trust online comes up not just in personal relations but also in public life. People sometimes say that the rise of blogging means a breakdown in authority. If anyone can say anything and everyone is saying everything, how do we recognize the truth? How do we know who we can trust? I’d argue that it’s not a breakdown in authority so much as a change in how we grant that authority. In this new media environment, institutions have relatively less sway. Individual voices have more impact. I know that people worry about the spread of misinformation and lies on the Web. And plainly, this is a real problem. But how exactly does this stuff spread? Right now, I’d argue, the all-news cable channels are far more powerful and efficient than the Web is in propagating lies — or “truthiness.” And the worst failures in our media system occur at the faultlines between new media and old media — when broadcast outlets start behaving like little websites. Or when cable channels with huge audiences decide that it’s OK to repeat some lie because, hey, they’re just quoting something somebody said on a blog. The bigger your megaphone, the greater your responsibility. We also have to accept that, sadly, gossip and gullibility are parts of human nature. You might know Winston Churchill’s famous line: “A lie is halfway around the world before the truth has a chance to get its boots on.” And that was decades before the Web, right? What the Web does mean is that, today, at least the truth can have a lot more boots on the ground. I’m an optimist about the power of open expression on the Web to sort truth from lies over time. There are sites and services that help this process — like Snopes.com and Politifact and even Wikipedia. Of course they’re imperfect. But they rely on good open processes that are as trustworthy in their own way as the traditional newsroom approach. 150 years ago, in On Liberty, John Stuart Mill wrote about how we obtain a “clearer perception and livelier impression of truth” from “its collision with error.” We all get disturbed and outraged sometimes at the sheer noise level of Internet-style debate. But the next time you do, I think you can take heart. That noise is the sound of “truth’s collision with error.” Mill urged us to be willing to “throw ourselves into the mental position of those who think differently from us” — to challenge our beliefs by tossing them in the ring. This is what we should do every time we sit down to write. And it’s one key to improving the balance of truth and lies in our own information diets. Remember that on the Web, we all gravitate toward the writers we agree with — but we’re also never more than a link or a click away from those we disagree with. Another frequent complaint about the writing we do on the Web is that so much of it is anonymous. I’ll put it to you that this complaint is overstated. There are anonymous blogs and websites but they are a relative minority. Sometimes bloggers will try to hide their identities because they want to tell stories about their workplaces without losing their jobs or blow the whistle on some institution without risking their necks. But these are rare cases. And even when bloggers are anonymous, the more successful they are, the less successful they’re going to be at staying anonymous. So the guy who began writing about what it’s like to be a waiter at WaiterRant kept his name a secret for a few years. But the more popular he got, the more inevitable it was that we would learn who this waiter was, and where he worked. In a similar vein to complaints about anonymity, we hear a lot about the awful manners people display online: The lack of courtesy, the nastiness, the juvenility,the anger. And you do see this. But you don’t see it everywhere. I’d suggest that you see it mostly in spaces that combine two characteristics: high traffic and low rules enforcement. The comments spaces on most news sites perfectly combine these traits which is why their discussions are so often so awful. The thing is, the Web didn’t suddenly produce an explosion of creepy rude people. They were always there. They just didn’t have a place to strut their rudeness in public. The answer here is to create spaces that have hosts who set the tone for visitors and enforce community standards — the same standards that keep those rude people in line in the physical world. If visitors to your discussions see that real people are having real conversations they are much more likely to do the same. If you look at the comments on Accordion Guy’s story that’s what you see. There’s a big contrast between the kind of interested, thoughtful responses so many bloggers get from their readers and the kind of drive-by stupidity that most professional news sites get from theirs. I think that explains why these two groups have such different understandings of the quality of online discourse. The next criticism I want to look at is the idea that the web eliminates serendipity. The medium makes it harder to stumble on interesting stuff to read that we didn’t know about. This is often the lament of people who love paper — magazines and newspapers. They miss the way your eye might land on a catchy headline or photo that might lead you to read something you didn’t know you were interested in. I have to confess I’ve never understood this complaint. I love paper, too. But the Web is like one great serendipity machine. Haven’t we all had that experience of starting to look something up — you know, like, the lyrics to White Christmas — then realizing that an entire hour has passed, and somehow we’ve ended up on the Wikipedia article about black holes? Blogs are especially amazing at generating serendipity. If you follow good bloggers you’re putting yourself in the hands of these writers without necessarily knowing what kind of thing they’re going to toss at you next. And if you’re the writer, you never know what you’re going to hear back from the Web. Look at what landed in Accordion Guy’s inbox. Couldn’t have been more relevant, more useful, or more unexpected to him. Let’s move on to the next criticism: That bloggers are narcissists. There’s this casual complaint that the Web is narcissistic simply because people are writing about themselves. I think that’s an oversimplification. It’s a little lazy. Yes: a lot of the messages online are casual conversation. These are messages for friends and family — like quick telephone calls. They’re what the social scientists call “phatic” communication, which is defined as “speech used to share feelings or to establish a mood of sociability rather than to communicate information or ideas.” Also, yes — there are plenty of people who are narcissists! And they take their narcissism with them wherever they go — including the Web. The Web created an opportunity to display this narcissism, but I don’t think it’s responsible for creating it. Remember that Christopher Lasch wrote his book “The Culture of Narcissism” in 1979 — long before the birth of online media. So sure, some bloggers are narcissistic. But being really successful at blogging usually requires being good at listening as well as speaking. Sometimes I think the people complaining about narcissism in blogging are really just objecting to the telling of personal stories, period — which just seems grossly unfair to all the amazing stories that the Web is capturing today. Like Accordion Guy’s or those of some of the people I write about in SAY EVERYTHING or those of countless others I couldn’t fit in. The next complaint about the Web is a cousin of the “Blogging is narcissism” idea. This is the notion that the Web is inherently shallow, and that it is undermining the deeper culture of reading books. Look, I’m an author. And I’d be the last person to say that the Web and blogs can or should somehow replace books. But have you ever met anyone who does say that? I haven’t! When you commit to reading a book you hand your time and attention over to the author. You agree to let that author’s voice fill your head. It’s a special pleasure. I don’t see it ever vanishing. But it’s silly to fail to see how a great blog can also offer a comparable experience. When you commit to reading a blog, you hand your time and attention over to the blogger. You agree to let the blogger’s voice fill your head. A blog is timed differently and delivered differently, but the experience of connection with a writer is similar. There are some important contrasts: An edited book is a more carefully assembled product. A blog is more timely and more porous to other voices. But a blog can be as deep as its writer chooses to make it. In today’s news media, in fact, it’s the bloggers who are providing us with the most substance. If you want to understand the really complex issues we face, the science of climate change, or the debate over healthcare reform, or the dreadful mess of our financial system, or any other problem that’s just too intricate to be explained in a news story or short broadcast — it’s the bloggers who specialize in these topics who will fill the cup of your curiosity. They will, in fact, overflow it if you let them. Which brings me to the last, and I think most difficult, problem that people raise with the phenomenon of blogging. There’s just so much of it! Millions of people saying everything! How do we keep from feeling overwhelmed? How do we possibly keep up? When people ask me that, the first thing I say is, Don’t try. Don’t try to keep up. Do you feel obligated to keep up with all the books that are published each year? There are thousands and thousands. Do you try to see all the movies released each year? Do you go through life thinking, my god, there are 7 billion people on the planet, I’m never going to be able to meet them all? No. We accept that our lives are a limited span of time, And we allocate that time to our family, our friends,our needs and our passions. The same logic applies to the explosion of writing and reading that blogging represents. No one can possibly encompass it all. I spent years writing a book on it, but I barely nicked the surface of what’s out there. The answer is not to push ourselves to become ever more efficient information processing machines. Instead, I’d argue we should consider feeling grateful to have this problem. Because when we complain about information overload, what we’re really saying is: There’s more stuff that I want to read than I have time to read. Which is a great problem to have. So one way of talking about this situation is to use words like “overload”; another is to use words like “abundance.” it’s the same glass, half-empty or half-full. I was talking recently with an old friend who is a professional book critic. And she said, “You know, it’s a lot harder to find readers today than writers.” There’s some truth in this, and it’s worth thinking about. But it’s also not as dire as it sounds. Because I believe that, even if you never end up with more than a handful of readers, writing in public can be its own reward. And I think that’s why so many people take up blogging even when they know they’re never going to get famous or make a lot of money doing it. Writing for other people is one of the best ways there is to know our own minds. This is really who we are when we are “on writing”: We are more ourselves. When I worked as a theater critic, people would often come up to me after a show and say, what’d you think? And I’d always have to say, gee, sorry I don’t know yet. Wait till I’ve written my piece. Then I’ll know. When I was thinking about what I was going to say today, I ended up doing what I always do: I sat down and wrote a post working through some ideas about just why the experience of writing in public can be so valuable. So if I may, let me read you just a little bit of it, give you the flavor. Here’s what I wrote: “Learning to make things changes how we understand and consume those things. When I started reporting the news as a teenager, I read the newspaper differently. When I learned to play guitar in my ’20s, I listened to songs differently. When I first played around with desktop video editing 15 years ago I began watching movies and TV differently. It’s the same with writing: Learning how to write changes how we read — and how we think.” Then I quoted a passage from Maryanne Wolf’s excellent book about reading and the brain, Proust and the Squid, in which she describes the work of a psychologist named Lev Vygotsky. Vygotsky’s research showed that “the very process of writing one’s thoughts leads individuals to refine those thoughts and to discover new ways of thinking.” Now, writing for an audience is a special and important case: it’s writing with feedback and consequences. The word “empowerment” describes a part of that change: writing is a way of discovering one’s voice and feeling its strength. But writing in public involves discovering the boundaries and limits of that power, too. We learn all the different ways in which we are not the center of the universe. That kind of discovery has a way of helping us grow up fast. So when I hear the still-commonplace dismissal of blogging as a trivial pastime or an amateurish hobby, I think, hold on a second. Writing — making texts — changes how we read and think. Every blogger is someone who has learned to read the world differently by writing for the world. The person who has struggled to turn a thought into a blog post, and then seen how that post has been reflected back by readers and other bloggers, is someone who can think more creatively about how sharing might work at other scales and in other contexts. A mind that has changed is more likely to imagine a world that can change. One way to assess the impact of blogging is to say that the number of people who have had the experience of writing in public has skyrocketed over the course of the last decade. Let’s say that, pre-Internet, the universe of people with experience writing in public — journalists, authors, scholars — was, perhaps, 100,000 people. And let’s say that, of the hundreds of millions of blogs reported to date, maybe 10 million of them are sustained enough efforts for us to say that their authors have gained real experience writing in public. I’m pulling these numbers out of a hat, trying to err on the conservative side. We still get an expansion of a hundredfold. In about a decade, then, we’ve expanded the number of people who’ve experienced writing in public by something like a factor of 100. Today, for way more of us than ever before, writing for one another is a regular part of our existence. With all the problems and the questions that new technologies raise, I still find this an incredibly hopeful development. I’m amazed and delighted that it’s happened in my lifetime. And I can’t wait to see what comes next from this vast and still growing community of keyboards. Even — or especially — if it comes in the form of large blocks of uninterrupted text. America's Finest News Source. Shop Subscribe HOME LATEST NEWS LOCAL ENTERTAINMENT POLITICS SPORTS OPINION OGN BREAKING NEWS NEWS Nation Shudders At Large Block Of Uninterrupted Text 3/09/10 5:00PM The giant mass of prose was devoid of so much as a large pulled quote for readers to glance at before moving on. The giant mass of prose was devoid of so much as a large pulled quote for readers to glance at before moving on. WASHINGTON—Unable to rest their eyes on a colorful photograph or boldface heading that could be easily skimmed and forgotten about, Americans collectively recoiled Monday when confronted with a solid block of uninterrupted text. Dumbfounded citizens from Maine to California gazed helplessly at the frightening chunk of print, unsure of what to do next. Without an illustration, chart, or embedded YouTube video to ease them in, millions were frozen in place, terrified by the sight of one long, unbroken string of English words. "Why won't it just tell me what it's about?" said Boston resident Charlyne Thomson, who was bombarded with the overwhelming mass of black text late Monday afternoon. "There are no bullet points, no highlighted parts. I've looked everywhere—there's nothing here but words." "Ow," Thomson added after reading the first and last lines in an attempt to get the gist of whatever the article, review, or possibly recipe was about. READ MORE Starstruck Man Can’t Think Of Anything To Say To Cruise Ship Hypnotist In Breakfast Buffet Line Bummer: Bowser Is Sending Bowser Jr. To Military School After He Got His High School Girlfriend Pregnant Friends, Family Worried Rock-Bottom Scottie Pippen Will End Up With Own ESPN Morning Show At 3:16 p.m., a deafening sigh was heard across the country as the nation grappled with the daunting cascade of syllables, whose unfamiliar letter-upon-letter structure stretched on for an endless 500 words. Children wailed for the attention of their bewildered parents, businesses were shuttered, and local governments ground to a halt as Americans scanned the text in vain for a web link to click on. Starstruck Man Can’t Think Of Anything To Say To Cruise Ship Hypnotist In Breakfast Buffet Line Sources also reported a 450 percent rise in temple rubbing and under-the-breath cursing around this time. "It demands so much of my time and concentration," said Chicago resident Dale Huza, who was confronted by the confusing mound of words early Monday afternoon. "This large block of text, it expects me to figure everything out on my own, and I hate it." "I've never seen anything like it," said Mark Shelton, a high school teacher from St. Paul, MN who stared blankly at the page in front of him for several minutes before finally holding it up to his ear. "What does it want from us?" As the public grows more desperate, scholars are working to randomly italicize different sections of the text, hoping the italics will land on the important parts and allow everyone to go on with their day. For now, though, millions of panicked and exhausted Americans continue to repetitively search the single column of print from top to bottom and right to left, looking for even the slightest semblance of meaning or perhaps a blurb. Some have speculated that the never-ending flood of sentences may be a news article, medical study, urgent product recall notice, letter, user agreement, or even a binding contract of some kind. But until the news does a segment in which they take sections of the text and read them aloud in a slow, calm voice while highlighting those same words on the screen, no one can say for sure. There are some, however, who remain unfazed by the virtual hailstorm of alternating consonants and vowels, and are determined to ignore it. "I'm sure if it's important enough, they'll let us know some other way," Detroit local Janet Landsman said. "After all, it can't be that serious. If there were anything worthwhile buried deep in that block of impenetrable English, it would at least have an accompanying photo of a celebrity or a large humorous title containing a pop culture reference." Subscribe to our newsletter! For the latest from the world's most unstoppable media juggernaut, subscribe to our newsletter. Type your email Sign me up By subscribing you agree to our Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Added Landsman, "Whatever it is, I'm pretty sure it doesn't even have a point." SHARE THIS STORY GET OUR NEWSLETTER Subscribe You may also like Americans Increasingly Worried Coronavirus Could Spread To U.S. Things Every Child Who Grew Up With Divorced Parents Will Understand Things Everyone Wishes They Knew Before Trying To Buy Their First Car Americans Increasingly Worried Coronavirus Could Spread To U.S. The Onion Americans Increasingly Worried Coronavirus Could Spread To U.S. Today 7:00AM Things Every Child Who Grew Up With Divorced Parents Will Understand The Onion Things Every Child Who Grew Up With Divorced Parents Will Understand Yesterday 1:55PM Things Everyone Wishes They Knew Before Trying To Buy Their First Car The Onion Things Everyone Wishes They Knew Before Trying To Buy Their First Car Tuesday 11:25AM MORE FROM G/O MEDIA READ ON Quiet City Streets Allow Neighborhood Residents To Hear The Natural Sounds Of Couples’ Blow-Out Fights READ ON Dream Crushed Over Trivial Bullshit Represents Nation Better Than Gold Medal Ever Could READ ON CIA Issues Posthumous Apology After New Evidence Clears Osama Bin Laden Of Involvement In 9/11 Attacks READ ON Pros And Cons Of Banning Trump From Social Media Platforms America's Finest News Source. Shop Subscribe HOME LATEST NEWS LOCAL ENTERTAINMENT POLITICS SPORTS OPINION OGN BREAKING NEWS NEWS Nation Shudders At Large Block Of Uninterrupted Text 3/09/10 5:00PM The giant mass of prose was devoid of so much as a large pulled quote for readers to glance at before moving on. The giant mass of prose was devoid of so much as a large pulled quote for readers to glance at before moving on. WASHINGTON—Unable to rest their eyes on a colorful photograph or boldface heading that could be easily skimmed and forgotten about, Americans collectively recoiled Monday when confronted with a solid block of uninterrupted text. Dumbfounded citizens from Maine to California gazed helplessly at the frightening chunk of print, unsure of what to do next. Without an illustration, chart, or embedded YouTube video to ease them in, millions were frozen in place, terrified by the sight of one long, unbroken string of English words. "Why won't it just tell me what it's about?" said Boston resident Charlyne Thomson, who was bombarded with the overwhelming mass of black text late Monday afternoon. "There are no bullet points, no highlighted parts. I've looked everywhere—there's nothing here but words." "Ow," Thomson added after reading the first and last lines in an attempt to get the gist of whatever the article, review, or possibly recipe was about. READ MORE Starstruck Man Can’t Think Of Anything To Say To Cruise Ship Hypnotist In Breakfast Buffet Line Bummer: Bowser Is Sending Bowser Jr. To Military School After He Got His High School Girlfriend Pregnant Friends, Family Worried Rock-Bottom Scottie Pippen Will End Up With Own ESPN Morning Show At 3:16 p.m., a deafening sigh was heard across the country as the nation grappled with the daunting cascade of syllables, whose unfamiliar letter-upon-letter structure stretched on for an endless 500 words. Children wailed for the attention of their bewildered parents, businesses were shuttered, and local governments ground to a halt as Americans scanned the text in vain for a web link to click on. Starstruck Man Can’t Think Of Anything To Say To Cruise Ship Hypnotist In Breakfast Buffet Line Sources also reported a 450 percent rise in temple rubbing and under-the-breath cursing around this time. "It demands so much of my time and concentration," said Chicago resident Dale Huza, who was confronted by the confusing mound of words early Monday afternoon. "This large block of text, it expects me to figure everything out on my own, and I hate it." "I've never seen anything like it," said Mark Shelton, a high school teacher from St. Paul, MN who stared blankly at the page in front of him for several minutes before finally holding it up to his ear. "What does it want from us?" As the public grows more desperate, scholars are working to randomly italicize different sections of the text, hoping the italics will land on the important parts and allow everyone to go on with their day. For now, though, millions of panicked and exhausted Americans continue to repetitively search the single column of print from top to bottom and right to left, looking for even the slightest semblance of meaning or perhaps a blurb. Some have speculated that the never-ending flood of sentences may be a news article, medical study, urgent product recall notice, letter, user agreement, or even a binding contract of some kind. But until the news does a segment in which they take sections of the text and read them aloud in a slow, calm voice while highlighting those same words on the screen, no one can say for sure. There are some, however, who remain unfazed by the virtual hailstorm of alternating consonants and vowels, and are determined to ignore it. "I'm sure if it's important enough, they'll let us know some other way," Detroit local Janet Landsman said. "After all, it can't be that serious. If there were anything worthwhile buried deep in that block of impenetrable English, it would at least have an accompanying photo of a celebrity or a large humorous title containing a pop culture reference." Subscribe to our newsletter! For the latest from the world's most unstoppable media juggernaut, subscribe to our newsletter. Type your email Sign me up By subscribing you agree to our Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Added Landsman, "Whatever it is, I'm pretty sure it doesn't even have a point." SHARE THIS STORY GET OUR NEWSLETTER Subscribe You may also like Americans Increasingly Worried Coronavirus Could Spread To U.S. Things Every Child Who Grew Up With Divorced Parents Will Understand Things Everyone Wishes They Knew Before Trying To Buy Their First Car Americans Increasingly Worried Coronavirus Could Spread To U.S. The Onion Americans Increasingly Worried Coronavirus Could Spread To U.S. Today 7:00AM Things Every Child Who Grew Up With Divorced Parents Will Understand The Onion Things Every Child Who Grew Up With Divorced Parents Will Understand Yesterday 1:55PM Things Everyone Wishes They Knew Before Trying To Buy Their First Car The Onion Things Everyone Wishes They Knew Before Trying To Buy Their First Car Tuesday 11:25AM MORE FROM G/O MEDIA READ ON Quiet City Streets Allow Neighborhood Residents To Hear The Natural Sounds Of Couples’ Blow-Out Fights READ ON Dream Crushed Over Trivial Bullshit Represents Nation Better Than Gold Medal Ever Could READ ON CIA Issues Posthumous Apology After New Evidence Clears Osama Bin Laden Of Involvement In 9/11 Attacks READ ON Pros And Cons Of Banning Trump From Social Media Platforms Slack needs your permission to enable notifications. Enable notifications1. This is a sample block of text designed to test indexing with the glossaries-extra. ˇ package. To test only \index. and theindex. environment, just use testidx. ˇ instead of testidx-glossaries. ˇ . Alternatively, use \tstidxtoidx. to switch back to the original testidx. ˇ behaviour. This sample text is provided to help test the layout. of the index. (or glossary.) and the . indexing applications, such as makeindex. ˇ or xindy. ˇ , that may be used with the glossaries-extra. ˇ package. This example. text is just filler. (produced using \testidx. provided by the testidx. ˇ package) to pad out the document with instances of \index. interspersed throughout. You can find out more information from the testidx. ˇ user manual, which can be accessed using the texdoc. ˇ application. 2. The testidx-glossaries. ˇ package uses \gls. (or \glspl.) unless no text should be displayed when indexing occurs (in which case just \glsadd. is used). This test package doesn’t make any modifications to \gls. (or \glspl.), but there are some minor changes to entry definitions and command use to allow this .dummy text to test various cases. By default \gls. performs the indexing before the . link text to prevent any unwanted interference caused by the whatsit. introduced by the indexing. However, it’s possible that you may want the indexing to occur after the . link text, even though it creates a whatsit. . This .dummy text is designed to use a mixture of pre- and post-indexing to investigate the results (particularly with phrases. spanning a .page break). The glossaries-extra. ˇ package (as from version 1.14) provides a new key “wrgloss” (for commands like \gls.), which may take the values “before” or “after”. If this key is available, it will be used for the post-indexing examples. , otherwise the post-indexing will be performed manually using \glsadd. after the . link text (which is displayed using \glshyperlink.). The testidx-glossaries. ˇ package just loads the base glossaries. ˇ package by default. Use the extraˇˇˇ package option to also load glossaries-extra. ˇ . The .visual effects in this .dummy text are provided to illustrate where the indexing occurs. The testidx-glossaries. ˇ package doesn’t attempt to produce a well-designed index or glossary. Its purpose. is to help you test. your chosen design. , which is easier to do with a relatively small test document. , than with a large book. . The .dummy text is intended to produce an index. that is at least three pages long to allow you to test the page headers and footers in a two-sided document. The “mcolindexgroup” style is set by default (rather than the “list” style) as that style more closely represents the style used in indexes. If you use the descˇˇˇ option, the style will instead be set to “indexgroup”. You can change the style using \setglossarystyle. . By default the “tree” styles (including “mcolindexgroup”) display the name field in bold in the glossary. . This is governed by the command \glstreenamefmt. , which may be redefined as appropriate. You can hide the visual effects with the hidemarksˇˇˇ package option. 3. The actual place where the indexing occurs in this .dummy text is marked with the symbol . (\tstidxmarker) . if there is no range. or .cross-reference. The word. or phrase. adjacent to this marker. is the text being indexed.1 A sub-entry is indicated with the symbol ˇ (\tstidxsubmarker) . and a sub-sub-entry is indicated with the symbol ˇˇ (\tstidxsubsubmarker) . . If an encap. value is provided, both the text. and the marker. are typeset in the argument. of the corresponding command. (The text occurring in the document is also typeset within the argument of \tstidxtext. . The default value is to use a dark grey, but since the default values for the predefined. encaps used in this text all change the colour, the dark grey will only apply where the encap hasn’t been set.) There are three encap. values used throughout this .dummy text (unless you’ve used the notestencapsˇˇˇ package option): tstidxencapi. ˇ , tstidxencapii. ˇ and tstidxencapiii. ˇ . (The default values use \textcolor. , so you might want to use the hidelinksˇˇˇ option if you want to use the hyperref. ˇ package.) If you use the noseekeyˇˇˇ 1The indexing may occur before or after the word. or phrase. ( . link text) being indexed in this .dummy text, but there’s no space between the marker. and the term being indexed. Incidentally, this footnote. text was produced using the command \tstidxfootnote. , which you can redefined as required. (It defaults to just \footnote. .) 1 package option, a cross-referenced entry (using \glssee. or \glsxtrindexseealso.) is identified using the marker. ˆ (\tstidxseemarker) . and the cross-referenced information is displayed as a .marginal note by default, with the term being indexed followed by the cross-reference. . For example, lyuk. has the marker . to show that the word “lyuk” was indexed. If the noseekeyˇˇˇ package option is set, this is followed by the marker ˆ to show that a cross-reference to digraph. has also been indexed (with the details shown in the margin). This document has used the seekeyˇˇˇ package option, which means that \glssee. and \glsxtrindexseealso. aren’t used in the .dummy text. Instead the “see” and “seealso” keys provided in the entry definition were used to perform the cross-reference. at the time the entry was defined, and so no markers or marginal notes are displayed. A sub-level cross-reference. is identified with the marker. ˇ ˆ (\tstidxsubseemarker) . and the marginal note displays the main term followed by the sub-term (separated by the symbol . ). The marker. used for the start of a range is (\tstidxopenmarker) . and the marker. used for the end of a range is (\tstidxclosemarker) . unless the entry is a sub-level, in which case the marker. for the start of the range is (\tstidxopensubmarker) . and the marker. used for the end of a range is (\tstidxclosesubmarker) . , or for a sub-sub-level (\tstidxopensubsubmarker) . and (\tstidxclosesubsubmarker) . . There are no tests for any further sub-levels. Although xindy. ˇ allows more than three levels (makeindex. ˇ doesn’t), it’s somewhat excessive. to go below a sub-sub-level. You’ll have to add your own tests for anything deeper. Watch out for lonelyˇ sub-items. 4. Here’s an example. of the start of a range but remember that a range must also have an end, so make sure that block. 9 has been included in this .dummy text, which closes this example. . When the verboseˇˇˇ option is used with just testidx. ˇ , the indexing information will show the argument. being passed to \tstindex. (which will cause .overfull lines). Since the testidx-glossaries. ˇ package doesn’t use \tstindex. , the verboseˇˇˇ package option will instead write information to the transcript file showing the label, name field, sort field, text field, parent field and see field for each entry as it’s defined. (The parent and see fields may be empty). If the texˇˇˇ package option is used, the sorting may take a long time (since TEX is being used to sort the entries). In this case, the verboseˇˇˇ package option will also write information while it’s sorting the entries, so that you know TEX is still doing something and hasn’t got stuck. This document has the noverboseˇˇˇ package option set. 5. Now that the preliminaries have been dispensed with in the previous paragraphs. , we can get on to some serious waffle. to act as filler. text because this really needs some padding. in order to get a decent sized index. with lots of locations. I did consider using just plain old . lorem ipsum (like the lipsum. ˇ package), but it gets a bit boring after a while, and it’s easier to check the indexing has been performed successfully if you can understand the text. Of course, this doesn’t help those who don’t know any English, but at least they’re no worse off than they would have been with random gibberish. , at least, I hope not. In other words, if I could just clarify. what I’m trying to say here, in a confidential. and not too roundabout. fashion. — .between you, me and the gatepost— is please don’t consider this to be an illustration. of my stunning wit. , eloquence. and .way with words because I’m shamelessly contravening the .creative writing adage. (or possibly motto.) of .cut to the chase, remove excessive verbiage. and .get to the point. I shall take care to hide this drivel. from my .creative writing tutor. and fellow writers, so .keep mum and don’t grass. on me because that just won’t be fair, and it might distress. them to a certain extent. I shall not be assailed. by indecision and will aspire. to find the .mot juste. Where was I? Oh, yes, padding. . I’m trying to make this paragraph. quite long, not because I have any pretensions of being the next James Joyce. ˇ and competing with Ulysses. ˇ , but because one of the things we need to check for is what happens with paragraphs that span a .page break. (If you’re feeling particularly daring, try out the starred version of \testidx. , although some of the blocks, such as block. 6, have some sneaky paragraph. breaks that won’t be suppressed.) TEX. ’s asynchronous 2 .output routine can cause things to go a bit .out of whack, so lengthy paragraphs in this example. document increase the chances of testing for these occurrences. Whether or not this particular paragraph. actually spans a .page break does, of course, depend on various things including your document propertiesˇ , such as the .page dimensions, . font family and . font size. If it turns out that this paragraph. has spanned a .page break, you might want to check the terms indexed here to make sure they have the correct page numbers listed. Something else that you might want to check, while you’re at it, is what’s happened to the location list. for the word “paragraph. ”, as I’ve used different encap. values for it in various places in this example. paragraph. . If you are using makeindex. ˇ , you might notice some warnings about .multiple encaps, and the .page number may be duplicated in the location list. If you are using xindy. ˇ , then it will discard duplicate page numbers and give preference to the first defined attribute in whatever xindy. ˇ module you’re using. However, be careful if a range. overlaps a different encap. . Remember that there’s a difference between an index. and a concordance. . If you just index pertinent places, there’s less likelihood of conflicting encaps. This is the end of a paragraph. that was written to deliberately upset makeindex. ˇ . Mean, aren’t I? 6. On the subject of xindy. ˇ , if you want to use it with this example. document, you’ll need to add the encap. values used in this .dummy text as allowed attributes. (Don’t forget you’ll also need the xindyˇˇˇ package option when you load testidx-glossaries. ˇ .) With the glossaries. ˇ package, this means using \GlsAddXdyAttribute. with the encap name as the argument. For example \GlsAddXdyAttribute{tstidxencapi} \GlsAddXdyAttribute{tstidxencapii} \GlsAddXdyAttribute{tstidxencapiii} This sets up allowed encap values and how they should be formatted. The ordering of the allowed attributes. here gives the tstidxencapi. ˇ encap precedence in the event of a .multiple encaps clash, since it’s the first one in the list. Check out the difference between using xindy. ˇ and makeindex. ˇ on this document. Also check the difference between using makeglossaries. ˇ and makeglossaries-lite. ˇ to build this document. The page separatorˇ is given by \delimN. , and the range separatorˇ is given by \delimR. . On the subject of location lists, the word passim. (meaning “here and there”) is sometimes used to tidy up ragged lists. For example, the locations “1, 3, 4, 6, 7” may look neater as “1-7 passim”, which indicates references are scattered (here and there) throughout that range. The bib2gls. ˇ application may be used with the glossaries-extra. ˇ package instead of makeindex. ˇ or xindy. ˇ . Use the bib2glsˇˇˇ package option to set up this dummy text to use it. Note that this option doesn’t make use of the prefix commands \tstidxindexmarkerprefix. or \tstidxindexmathsymprefix. . The prefixˇˇˇ package option will instead alter the way the bib files are loaded to produce a similar grouping. 7. Computer algorithms can sometimes have difficulties with localisation. . They can be tripped up by . input encoding issues and digraphs. (such as the Welsh ll. digraph in llan. , the Dutch ij. digraph in lijnbus. and ijsvrij. , and the dz. digraph in the Hungarian dzéta. and Polish dzwon.) or trigraphs. (such as the Hungarian dzs. trigraph in dzsóker. and dzsungel.), so this paragraph. is designed to provide some examples for testing various Latin alphabets. If you enable both UTF-8 (either with inputenc. ˇ or using XeLaTeX/LuaLaTeX) and the digraphsˇˇˇ option, then the examples above will use the “ll”, “ij” and “dz” glyphs. (if supported) for the digraphs. (but not for “dzs”, which is a trigraph.). Remember that you’ll also need a font that supports those glyphs. Other digraphs include the Welsh dd. , ff. , and ng. , the Hungarian ly. (in lyuk. mentioned earlier) and the Polish cz. , but these don’t use glyphs in the sort value. Now for some more nonsense. text to pad the index. We, the élite. who discovered the æsthetic. delights of 3 TEX. , must not become blasé. about being the protégé. of the great Donald Knuth. ˇ . It may stagger the clientèle. of the commercial world. to discover our résumé. (after foraging for it in our natty .attaché case) while we sample a vol-au-vent. or two. at the soirée. in the .pied-àterre with the delightful phœnix. -themed décor. , daft. oak. .dado rail and færie. façade. that has stunned many an æthereal. débutante. sporting a .bergère hat, but it would be naïve. to fall for such a fœtid. cliché. . This paragraph. is in a state of déshabillé. . Like a sculpture. of Venus. in a négligée. , it’s transparently obvious that this paragraph. is provided for the sole purpose of ogling. .extended Latin characters and testing how xindy. ˇ and makeindex. ˇ compare. Time for a quick trip to the café. for an anæmic. .cup of tea (to recover. from our travels) with Anders Jonas Ångström. ˇ (but don’t let it scald your œsophagus.) and then off to find a zoo. in Östergötland. ˇ , so we can get to the end of the alphabet. . (We may even see an adventurous aardvark. or a lucky llama. or a rhinoceros. eating rhubarb. .) Perhaps then we should go over to Ängelholm. ˇ and head off across the Øresund. ˇ bridge and resume. our search for some more examples. We’ll go on a .whistle-stop tour around Tårnby. ˇ , Rødovre. ˇ , Næstved. ˇ and ØlstykkeStenløse. ˇ . Afterwards, we’ll fly. to Poland. ˇ (possibly in an aeroplane. — if passengers would like to look out of their window. , they’ll see we’re passing over Aßlar. ˇ and Bad GottleubaBerggießhübel. ˇ ) and then we’ll say “cześć. ” to Łódź. ˇ , and visit Świętokrzyskie. ˇ (that one will cause a problem for certain font encodings because of the ogonek. and will be omitted if you use the default OT1ˇ encoding, but not if you use the fontenc. ˇ package with, for example, the T1ˇˇˇ option), Żory. ˇ , Żelechów. ˇ , Łobez. ˇ , Głogów. ˇ (not to be confused with Glasgow. ˇ ), Ćmielów. ˇ , Ścinawa. ˇ and Świdnica. ˇ . Then let’s sail. to Iceland. ˇ (possibly in a ship.) and visit the lakes of Iceland. ˇ , such as Ölvesvatn. ˇ , Úlfsvatn. ˇ , Ánavatn. ˇ , Másvatn. ˇ , Þríhyrningsvatn. ˇ (that one starts with a thorn (þ).), Sigríðarstaðavatn. ˇ (that one has an eth (ð). — those last two will also be omitted if you use the default OT1. font encoding.), Grænavatn. ˇ , Árneslón. ˇ and Íshólsvatn. ˇ . If you are using this with xindy. ˇ and UTF-8. , try this out with a different language option, for example -L swedish (xindy) . ˇˇˇ or -L danish (xindy) . ˇˇˇ or -L german-duden (xindy) . ˇˇˇ or -L german-din5007 (xindy) . ˇˇˇ or -L polish (xindy) . ˇˇˇ or -L icelandic (xindy) . ˇˇˇ . If you want to use makeindex. ˇ instead of xindy. ˇ , then the package option germanˇˇˇ or ngermanˇˇˇ will allow you to use makeindex. ˇ ’s -g (makeindex) . ˇˇˇ option. You currently have the sanitizeˇˇˇ option on. This means that the words containing UTF-8. characters will first be sanitized before being passed to \tstindex. , which will allow you to test how well the . indexing application sorts UTF-8. characters. If you’d rather test how \index. writes these characters to the file read by the indexing application, use the nosanitizeˇˇˇ option instead. This may cause the UTF-8. characters to be written in terms of \IeC. . The nosanitizeˇˇˇ option doesn’t have an effect when used with the bib2glsˇˇˇ package option, since the sort value isn’t written to an external file. 8. Don’t forget there’s also a .number group, so let’s have some numbers. the Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy. ˇ has of course propelled the number 42. to stardom, as the answer to life. , the universe. and everything. We usually deal in base 10. , but sometimes base 16. is useful to programmers, and computers prefer base 2 . (and 2 . is the only even. prime number.). A century. in cricket. means 100. runs, and in the calendar. 100. years. If you’re using xindy. ˇ , the “glsnumbers” letter group (with the title “Numbers”) will automatically be added to your .xdy file unless you switch off this feature with the noglsnumbersˇˇˇ package option. Whilst we’re on the subject of numbers, let’s try out some equations. .E = mc2 (1) 4 Since this document is using amsmath. ˇ , let’s try out the align. environment: .f(~x) = α.X. .n i xi + β.Xn i x 2 i + γ . (2) ∂ .f ∂xj = α + 2βxj (3) (Note how the subscripts and superscripts can be affected by material inserted between the symbol and the sub- and superscripts. With the glossaries. ˇ package, this can be avoided by using the final optional argument of commands like \gls. to bring the scripts into the . link text, but not if the scripts also include \gls. , as the superscript does here.) If this document hadn’t loaded the amsmath. ˇ package, we would have had to use the eqnarray. environment instead. Incidentally, that’s just a regular partial derivative symbol ∂ . . Not to be confused with the spin-weighted partial derivative ð . , which can be displayed here as this document has loaded the amssymb. ˇ package. Now I’ve been a bit fancy here and used multiple bib files to define the glossary entries. The maths symbols are defined in their own separate bib file. This document has used the prefixˇˇˇ package option, which means that \tstidxmakegloss. is defined to perform separate sorts for each resource block, which enables the maths symbols to appear in their own group. If you haven’t used \tstidxmakegloss. then the above won’t apply. If you don’t use the bib2glsˇˇˇ package option, then the prefixˇˇˇ package will instead insert > in front of the sort key so I can get xindy. ˇ to create a special group for the maths symbols. Here’s the code you can add to your document to implement it: \GlsAddLetterGroup{Maths}{:prefixes (">") :before "glsnumbers"} I’ve done something similar with the markers. where I’ve used < as the prefix. . 9. Let’s re-cover. old ground and talk about ranges again. This is the end of the range example. from block. 4. There’s not much else to say about this block. really. It’s quite boring, isn’t it? However, you’ll need it if you’ve included block 4. Unless you’re testing for a mismatched range, of course. That might be quite interesting, possibly, but I’m not going to .hold my breath. 10. Now this is going to be hard to believe— in fact I’m totally gobsmacked. and utterly astounded. — but I’ve discovered that we’re still missing some . letter groups, and I’ve run out of anything quaint. to say, so I’m going to have to yatter. for a while longer, which will probably make you yawn. and fall asleep. . What shall we talk about? My quirky. badinage. is about to expire. . How about a story.? Here’s one I made up for my friend Paulo Cereda. ˇ in TEX. .SE chat because he likes ducks and is the creator of arara. ˇ . So, are you sitting comfortably? Then let’s begin. . By the way, before I forget. , it’s called Sir Quackalot and the Golden Arara. ˇ and is the first story in the Adventures of Sir Quackalot. ˇ . It’s a tale. of adventure. and derring-do. . The hero. of the story. is Sir Quackalot. ˇ , in case you can’t tell from the title. . .Once upon a time, a long time ago in a far away land. , there lived a knight. . He was handsome. , he was bold. , he was brave. . He was — a duck. . His name. was Sir Quackalot. ˇ . One day the Fairy Goose. ˇ appeared. “Brave knight. ,” she said. “A terrible plight. has fallen on the land. . The evil OgRe. has stolen the Golden Arara. . Only you can save it.” (That’s a reference. to TEX. ’s .output routine, if you missed it.) “It will be a perilous. quest. , but find the Mighty Helm of Knuth. and the Legendary Sword. xor. to aid you.” (Ask David Carlisle. ˇ about the xor. reference. .) 11. So Sir Quackalot. ˇ set out on his quest. . (This is the continuation. from the previous block. , for any newcomers. who have just turned up.) He soon arrived at the Bog of Eternal Glossaries. (that’s a reference to my glossaries. ˇ package, and it’s also a nod. to the Bog of Eternal Stench. ˇ in Labyrinth. ˇ ), in the centre. (or center. for those of you .across the pond) 5 of which was suspended the Mighty Helm of Knuth. , but Sir Quackalot. ˇ was learned in the lore. of installing Perl. ˇ and was able to leap upon the magical. raft. makeglossaries. ˇ and steer his way through the external. . indexing applications and their many arguments. (That’s supposed to be a pun. , but it’s .bad form to explain the joke. , and it wasn’t even particularly witty. . Incidentally, Joseph Wright. ˇ makes a cameo. at this point with the exclamation. “fetchez la vache!” but you’ll have to ask Paulo Cereda. ˇ what that’s all about. It wouldn’t surprise me if it had something to do with .Monty Python.) 12. Anyway, where were we? Oh, yes. He (that’s Sir Quackalot. ˇ we’re talking about, if you’ve only just joined us) snatched up the Mighty Helm of Knuth. and escaped from the perilous. bog. . Soon he came to the Dread Vale of the Editors. , guarded at either end by the ever-quarrelling leviathans. Emacs. ˇ and Vi. ˇ . As he approached the vale. , Emacs uttered the .magic incantation that sent forth the butterflies of chaos. . (I know “doom. ” is more appropriate but, as is .common knowledge, chaos. is a butterfly. motif. .) 13. But Sir Quackalot. ˇ was protected by the Mighty Helm of Knuth. and raced past into the vale. , where he found the Legendary Sword. xor. in the centre of the great longtable. ˇ . (Ooh. , I’ve started a sentence. with a conjunction. . How naughty. is that?) With a great leap. and a bound. , Sir Quackalot. ˇ plucked out the sword. and headed for the far end of the vale. . Up pounced Vi. ˇ and belched forth a myriad. of clones. that bore down on Sir Quackalot. ˇ . But, brandishing the sword. xor. , Sir Quackalot. ˇ sliced them down. (There’s some repetition. there, but hopefully no one’s noticed. There’s even more coming up in the next block. .) 14. Sir Quackalot. ˇ escaped from the Dread Vale of the Editors. and set off up the path that led to the evil OgRe. ’s lair. . As Sir Quackalot. ˇ approached, there was a fearful roar. , and the OgRe. pounced on Sir Quackalot. ˇ . The brave knight. raised his powerful sword. xor. and brought it down on the OgRe. , destroying him. Sir Quackalot. ˇ rescued the Golden Arara. and the land. was once more restored to peace. and harmony. and paragraphs. were able to span. .page breaks without fear. . The End. . Don’t miss the next thrilling. adventure. Sir Quackalot and the Hyper Lake of Doom. ˇ where our seaborne. . intrepid hero meets a quixotic. seal. with a zither. (a zealous. fan. of The Third Man. ˇ ), a youthful. .sea lion with a magic. yo-yo. , and a wily. wombat. warrior. with a laser-guided. .sealant gun. Can they defeat the villainous. , zany. zoologist. sailing a xebec. across the sea. bearing canisters of xenon. , xylem. and xylene.? Oh, zounds. ! He’s ashore. wearing a .zoot suit and smoking a zucchini. whilst playing a xylophone. . As one .anonymous reviewer said, it’s as exhilarating. as watching a yuppie. eating a .yule log soaked in .yoghurt. Hmm, yummy. — or yuck. , depending on your tastes. Don’t forget to check. you have some chalk. so we can write ddisgynedig. and ddyrchafedig. in Nghaerdydd. ˇ (over in Nghymru. ˇ ) because I want a few more words with digraphs. , and then we can take a ffotograff. of Ffestiniog. ˇ . 15. Oh, did I tell you about the .vice-president who was a Viking. in a vignette.? No? Well, I can’t quite remember the story. myself, but it had something to do with a .vice admiral with a .Victoria plum and a .viceroy with a .Victoria sponge, or was it .vice versa? The .vice chancellor preferred vichyssoise. . For . letter ordering use the -l (makeindex) . ˇˇˇ option with makeindex. ˇ or the ord/letorder module with xindy. ˇ (-M ord/letorder (xindy) . ˇˇˇ ). If you omit this, the default .word ordering is used. The ordering in the Compact Oxford English Dictionary. ˇ (third edition, revised) for these words are: vice admiral, vice chancellor, vice-president, viceregal. , viceroy, vice versa. Quick quiz. . Can you get makeindex. ˇ or xindy. ˇ to reproduce that order? 16. This is the final block. of dummy text provided by the testidx. ˇ package. This block contains the close of a range. that was started in block 1. Fun, wasn’t it? 6 Glossary Maths | Markers | Numbers | A | B | C | D | Dd | Dz | Dzs | Ð | E | F | Ff | G | H | I | IJ | J | K | L | Ll | M | N | Ng | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z | Æ | Œ | Þ | Ø | Ł Maths α 4 β 4 γ 4 ∂ 4 ð P 4 4 Markers (\tstidxclosemarker) 2 (\tstidxclosesubmarker) 2 (\tstidxclosesubsubmarker) 2 . (\tstidxmarker) 1 (\tstidxopenmarker) 2 (\tstidxopensubmarker) 2 (\tstidxopensubsubmarker) 2 ˆ (\tstidxseemarker) 1 ˇ (\tstidxsubmarker) 1 ˇ ˆ (\tstidxsubseemarker) 2 ˇˇ (\tstidxsubsubmarker) 1 Numbers 2 4 10 4 16 4 42 4 100 4 A aardvark 3 across the pond 5 adage 2 Adventures of Sir Quackalot, the 4 adventure 4, 5 aeroplane 3 align environment 4 alphabet 3 amsmath package 4 amssymb package 4 Ánavatn 3 anonymous reviewer 5 anæmic 3 Ängelholm 3 Ångström, Anders Jonas 3 applications arara 4 bib2gls 3 Emacs 5 makeglossaries-lite 3 makeglossaries 3, 5 makeindex 1–3, 5 -g 3 -l 5 Perl 5 texdoc 1 Vi 5 xindy 1–5 -L danish 3 -L german-din5007 3 -L german-duden 3 -L icelandic 3 -L polish 3 -L swedish 3 -M ord/letorder 5 arara 4 argument 1, 2 Árneslón 3 7 ashore 5 asleep 4 aspire 2 assailed 2 astounded 4 attaché case 3 attributes 3 Aßlar 3 B badinage 4 bad form 5 Bad Gottleuba-Berggießhübel 3 begin 4 bergère hat 3 between you, me and the gatepost 2 bib2gls 3 blasé 3 block 2, 4, 5 bog 5 Bog of Eternal Glossaries, the 5 Bog of Eternal Stench, the 5 bold 5 books Adventures of Sir Quackalot, the 4 Compact Oxford English Dictionary 5 Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy, the 4 Sir Quackalot and the Golden Arara 4 Sir Quackalot and the Hyper Lake of Doom 5 Ulysses 2 book 1 bound 5 brave 5 butterflies of chaos, the 5 butterfly 5 C café 3 calendar 4 cameo 5 Carlisle, David 5 center 5 centre 5 century 4 Cereda, Paulo 4, 5 chalk 5 chaos 5 check 5 clarify 2 cliché 3 clientèle 3 clones 5 Ćmielów 3 commercial world, the 3 common knowledge 5 Compact Oxford English Dictionary 5 concordance 2 confidential 2 conjunction 5 continuation 5 creative writing 2 cricket 4 cross-reference 1, 2 cup of tea 3 cut to the chase 2 cześć 3 cz 3 D dado rail 3 daft 3 débutante 3 décor 3 \delimN 3 \delimR 3 derring-do 4 déshabillé 3 design 1 digraph 1, 3, 5 distress 2 document 1 properties 2 doom 5 Dread Vale of the Editors, the 5 drivel 2 duck 5 dummy text 1, 2 Dd ddisgynedig 5 ddyrchafedig 5 dd 3 Dz dzéta 3 8 dzwon 3 dz 3 Dzs dzsóker 3 dzsungel 3, see also trigraph dzs 3 Ð ð see eth (ð) E élite 3 eloquence 2 Emacs 5 encap 1, 2 tstidxencapiii 1 tstidxencapii 1 tstidxencapi 1, 3 End, The 5 eqnarray environment 4 eth (ð) 3 even 4 example 1, 2, 4 excessive 2 exclamation 5 exhilarating 5 expire 4 extended Latin characters 3 external 5 E 4 F façade 3 Fairy Goose, the 5 fan 5 far away land, a 5 fashion 2 fear 5 films Labyrinth 5 Third Man, The 5 filler 1, 2 fly 3 fontenc package 3, see also inputenc package T1 3 font encoding 3 OT1 3 font family 2 font size 2 \footnote 1 footnote 1 forget 4 færie 3 fœtid 3 f(~x) 4 Ff Ffestiniog 5 ffotograff 5 ff 3 G gawping see ogling get to the point 2 gibberish 2 Glasgow 3 glossaries-extra package 1, 3 glossaries package 1, 2, 4, 5 glossary 1 \GlsAddXdyAttribute 2 \glsadd 1 \glshyperlink 1 \glspl 1 \glssee 1 \glstreenamefmt 1 \glsxtrindexseealso 1 \gls 1, 4 glyph 3 gobbledegook see gibberish gobsmacked 4 Golden Arara, the 5 grass 2 Grænavatn 3 Głogów 3 -g (makeindex) 3 H handsome 5 harmony 5 hero 4 intrepid see intrepid hero Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy, the 4 hold my breath 4 9 hyperref package 1 hidelinks 1 I Iceland 3 \IeC 4 illustration 2, see also example indexing application 1, 4, 5 \index 1, 4 index 1, 2 inputenc package 3 input encoding 3 intrepid hero 5 Íshólsvatn 3 IJ ijsvrij 3 ij 3 J joke 5 Joyce, James 2 K keep mum 2, see also confidential knight 5 Knuth, Donald 3 L Labyrinth 5 lair 5 land 5 laser-guided 5 layout 1 leap 5 Legendary Sword, the 5 letter groups 4 letter ordering 5 leviathans 5 life 4 link text 1, 4 lipsum package 2 lijnbus 3 localisation 3 location list 2, see also cross-reference page separator 3 range separator 3 longtable package 5 lorem ipsum 2 lore 5 lyuk 1, 3, see also digraph ly 3 -L danish (xindy) 3 -L german-din5007 (xindy) 3 -L german-duden (xindy) 3 -L icelandic (xindy) 3 -l (makeindex) 5 -L polish (xindy) 3 -L swedish (xindy) 3 Ll llama 3 llan 3 ll 3 M magical 5 magic 5 magic incantation 5 makeglossaries-lite 3 makeglossaries 3, 5 makeindex 1–3, 5 -g 3 -l 5 marginal note 1 marker 1, 2, 4 Másvatn 3 Mighty Helm of Knuth, the 5 Monty Python 5 motif 5 motto 2 mot juste 2 multiple encaps 2, 3 myriad 5 -M ord/letorder (xindy) 5 N naïve 3 name 5 naughty 5 négligée 3 newcomers 5 nod 5 10 nonsense 3 number group 4 Næstved 3 n 4 Ng Nghaerdydd 5 Nghymru 5 ng 3 O oak 3 ogling 3 ogonek 3 OgRe 5 Ölvesvatn 3 Once upon a time 4 Ooh 5 Östergötland 3 OT1 3 output routine 2, 5 out of whack 2 overfull lines 2 P packages amsmath 4 amssymb 4 fontenc 3 T1 3 glossaries-extra 1 , 3 glossaries 1 , 2 , 4 , 5 hyperref 1 hidelinks 1 inputenc 3 lipsum 2 longtable 5 testidx-glossaries 1 , 2 bib2gls 3 , 4 desc 1 extra 1 noglsnumbers 4 nosanitize 4 noseekey 1 noverbose 2 sanitize 3 seekey 1 tex 2 verbose 2 xindy 2 testidx 1 – 5 digraphs 3 german 3 hidemarks 1 notestencaps 1 ngerman 3 prefix 3 , 4 verbose 2 padding 2, see also filler page break 1, 2, 5 page dimensions 2 page number 2 paragraph 2, 3, 5 passim 3 peace 5 people Ångström, Anders Jonas 3 Carlisle, David 5 Cereda, Paulo 4, 5 Fairy Goose, the 5 Joyce, James 2 Knuth, Donald 3 Quackalot, Sir 4, 5 Wright, Joseph 5 perilous 5 Perl 5 phrase 1 phœnix 3 pied-à-terre 3 places Ánavatn 3 Ängelholm 3 Árneslón 3 Aßlar 3 Bad Gottleuba-Berggießhübel 3 Bog of Eternal Stench, the 5 Ćmielów 3 Ffestiniog 5 Glasgow 3 Grænavatn 3 Głogów 3 Iceland 3 Íshólsvatn 3 Másvatn 3 Næstved 3 Nghaerdydd 5 11 Nghymru 5 Ölvesvatn 3 Östergötland 3 Poland 3 Rødovre 3 Ścinawa 3 Sigríðarstaðavatn 3 Świdnica 3 Świętokrzyskie 3 Tårnby 3 Úlfsvatn 3 Żelechów 3 Żory 3 Þríhyrningsvatn 3 Ølstykke-Stenløse 3 Øresund 3 Łobez 3 Łódź 3 plight 5 Poland 3 predefined 1 prefix 4 prime number 4 protégé 3 pun 5 purpose 1 Q Quackalot, Sir 4, 5 quaint 4 quest 5 quirky 4 quixotic 5 quiz 5 R raft 5 range 1, 2–4, 5 range separator see location list recover 3 reference 5 repetition 5 resume 3 résumé 3 re-cover 4 rhinoceros 3 rhubarb 3 roar 5 roundabout 2 Rødovre 3 S sail 3 Ścinawa 3 sculpture 3 seaborne 5 sealant gun 5 seal 5 sea 5 sea lion 5 sentence 5 \setglossarystyle 1 ship 3 Sigríðarstaðavatn 3 Sir Quackalot and the Golden Arara 4 Sir Quackalot and the Hyper Lake of Doom 5 soirée 3 span 5 story 4, 5 sub-items lonely 2 Świdnica 3 Świętokrzyskie 3 sword 5 T tale 4 Tårnby 3 testidx-glossaries package 1, 2 bib2gls 3, 4 desc 1 extra 1 noglsnumbers 4 nosanitize 4 noseekey 1 noverbose 2 sanitize 3 seekey 1 tex 2 verbose 2 xindy 2 \testidx 1, 2 testidx package 1–5 digraphs 3 german 3 hidemarks 1 12 notestencaps 1 ngerman 3 prefix 3, 4 verbose 2 test 1 texdoc 1 \textcolor 1 text 1 TEX 2–5 theindex environment 1 Third Man, The 5 thorn (þ) 3 thrilling 5 title 4 trigraph 3 tstidxencapiii (\tstidxencapiii) 1 tstidxencapii (\tstidxencapii) 1 tstidxencapi (\tstidxencapi) 1, 3 \tstidxfootnote 1 \tstidxindexmarkerprefix 3 \tstidxindexmathsymprefix 3 \tstidxmakegloss 4 \tstidxtext 1 \tstidxtoidx 1 \tstindex 2, 3 tutor 2 two 3 U Úlfsvatn 3 Ulysses 2 universe 4 UTF-8 3, 4 V vale 5 Venus 3 verbiage 2 viceregal 5 viceroy 5 vice-president 5 vice admiral 5 vice chancellor 5 vice versa 5 vichyssoise 5 Victoria plum 5 Victoria sponge 5 vignette 5 Viking 5 villainous 5 visual effects 1 Vi 5 vol-au-vent 3 W waffle 2 warrior 5 way with words 2 whatsit 1 whistle-stop tour 3 wily 5 window 3 witty 5 wit 2 wombat 5 word 1 word ordering 5 Wright, Joseph 5 X xebec 5 xenon 5 xindy 1–5 -L danish 3 -L german-din5007 3 -L german-duden 3 -L icelandic 3 -L polish 3 -L swedish 3 -M ord/letorder 5 xor 5 xylem 5 xylene 5 xylophone 5 Y yatter 4 yawn 4 yoghurt 5 youthful 5 yo-yo 5 yuck 5 yule log 5 yummy 5 yuppie 5 Z 13 zany 5 zealous 5 Żelechów 3 zither 5 zoologist 5 zoot suit 5 zoo 3 Żory 3 zounds 5 zucchini 5 Æ æsthetic 3 æthereal 3 Œ œsophagus 3 Þ Þríhyrningsvatn 3 þ see thorn (þ) Ø Ølstykke-Stenløse 3 Øresund 3 Ł Łobez 3 Łódź 3 14 Page protected with pending changes Cryptography From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia Jump to navigationJump to search "Secret code" redirects here. For the Aya Kamiki album, see Secret Code. "Cryptology" redirects here. For the David S. Ware album, see Cryptology (album). Lorenz cipher machine twelve rotors with mechanism German Lorenz cipher machine, used in World War II to encrypt very-high-level general staff messages Cryptography, or cryptology (from Ancient Greek: κρυπτός, romanized: kryptós "hidden, secret"; and γράφειν graphein, "to write", or -λογία -logia, "study", respectively[1]), is the practice and study of techniques for secure communication in the presence of third parties called adversaries.[2] More generally, cryptography is about constructing and analyzing protocols that prevent third parties or the public from reading private messages;[3] various aspects in information security such as data confidentiality, data integrity, authentication, and non-repudiation[4] are central to modern cryptography. Modern cryptography exists at the intersection of the disciplines of mathematics, computer science, electrical engineering, communication science, and physics. Applications of cryptography include electronic commerce, chip-based payment cards, digital currencies, computer passwords, and military communications. Cryptography prior to the modern age was effectively synonymous with encryption, converting information from a readable state to unintelligible nonsense. The sender of an encrypted message shares the decoding technique only with intended recipients to preclude access from adversaries. The cryptography literature often uses the names Alice ("A") for the sender, Bob ("B") for the intended recipient, and Eve ("eavesdropper") for the adversary.[5] Since the development of rotor cipher machines in World War I and the advent of computers in World War II, cryptography methods have become increasingly complex and its applications more varied. Modern cryptography is heavily based on mathematical theory and computer science practice; cryptographic algorithms are designed around computational hardness assumptions, making such algorithms hard to break in actual practice by any adversary. While it is theoretically possible to break into a well-designed system, it is infeasible in actual practice to do so. Such schemes, if well designed, are therefore termed "computationally secure"; theoretical advances, e.g., improvements in integer factorization algorithms, and faster computing technology require these designs to be continually reevaluated, and if necessary, adapted. There exist information-theoretically secure schemes that provably cannot be broken even with unlimited computing power, such as the one-time pad, but these schemes are much more difficult to use in practice than the best theoretically breakable but computationally secure schemes. The growth of cryptographic technology has raised a number of legal issues in the information age. Cryptography's potential for use as a tool for espionage and sedition has led many governments to classify it as a weapon and to limit or even prohibit its use and export.[6] In some jurisdictions where the use of cryptography is legal, laws permit investigators to compel the disclosure of encryption keys for documents relevant to an investigation.[7][8] Cryptography also plays a major role in digital rights management and copyright infringement disputes in regard to digital media.[9] Contents 1 Terminology 2 History of cryptography and cryptanalysis 2.1 Classic cryptography 2.2 Computer era 2.3 Advent of modern cryptography 3 Modern cryptography 3.1 Symmetric-key cryptography 3.2 Public-key cryptography 3.3 Cryptanalysis 3.4 Cryptographic primitives 3.5 Cryptosystems 3.6 Lightweight cryptography 4 Legal issues 4.1 Prohibitions 4.2 Export controls 4.3 NSA involvement 4.4 Digital rights management 4.5 Forced disclosure of encryption keys 5 See also 6 References 7 Further reading 8 External links Terminology diagram showing shift three alphabetic cypher D becomes A and E becomes B Alphabet shift ciphers are believed to have been used by Julius Caesar over 2,000 years ago.[5] This is an example with k = 3. In other words, the letters in the alphabet are shifted three in one direction to encrypt and three in the other direction to decrypt. The first use of the term cryptograph (as opposed to cryptogram) dates back to the 19th century—originating from The Gold-Bug, a story by Edgar Allan Poe.[10][11][broken footnote] Until modern times, cryptography referred almost exclusively to encryption, which is the process of converting ordinary information (called plaintext) into unintelligible form (called ciphertext).[12] Decryption is the reverse, in other words, moving from the unintelligible ciphertext back to plaintext. A cipher (or cypher) is a pair of algorithms that carry out the encryption and the reversing decryption. The detailed operation of a cipher is controlled both by the algorithm and, in each instance, by a "key". The key is a secret (ideally known only to the communicants), usually a string of characters (ideally short so it can be remembered by the user), which is needed to decrypt the ciphertext. In formal mathematical terms, a "cryptosystem" is the ordered list of elements of finite possible plaintexts, finite possible cyphertexts, finite possible keys, and the encryption and decryption algorithms which correspond to each key. Keys are important both formally and in actual practice, as ciphers without variable keys can be trivially broken with only the knowledge of the cipher used and are therefore useless (or even counter-productive) for most purposes. Historically, ciphers were often used directly for encryption or decryption without additional procedures such as authentication or integrity checks. There are, generally, two kinds of cryptosystems: symmetric and asymmetric. In symmetric systems, the only ones known until the 1970s, the same key (the secret key) is used to encrypt and decrypt a message. Data manipulation in symmetric systems is faster than asymmetric systems in part because they generally use shorter key lengths. Asymmetric systems use a "public key" to encrypt a message and a related "private key" to decrypt it. The use of asymmetric systems enhances the security of communication, largely because the relation between the two keys is very hard to discover.[13] Examples of asymmetric systems include RSA (Rivest–Shamir–Adleman), and ECC (Elliptic Curve Cryptography). Quality symmetric algorithms include the commonly used AES (Advanced Encryption Standard) which replaced the older DES (Data Encryption Standard).[14] Not very high quality symmetric algorithms include the assorted children's language tangling schemes such as Pig Latin or other cant, and indeed effectively all cryptographic schemes, however seriously intended, from any source prior to the invention of the one-time pad early in the 20th century. In colloquial use, the term "code" is often used to mean any method of encryption or concealment of meaning. However, in cryptography, code has a more specific meaning: the replacement of a unit of plaintext (i.e., a meaningful word or phrase) with a code word (for example, "wallaby" replaces "attack at dawn"). A cypher, in contrast, is a scheme for changing or substituting an element below such a level (a letter, or a syllable or a pair of letters or ...) in order to produce a cyphertext. Cryptanalysis is the term used for the study of methods for obtaining the meaning of encrypted information without access to the key normally required to do so; i.e., it is the study of how to "crack" encryption algorithms or their implementations. Some use the terms cryptography and cryptology interchangeably in English, while others (including US military practice generally) use cryptography to refer specifically to the use and practice of cryptographic techniques and cryptology to refer to the combined study of cryptography and cryptanalysis.[15][16] English is more flexible than several other languages in which cryptology (done by cryptologists) is always used in the second sense above. RFC 2828 advises that steganography is sometimes included in cryptology.[17] The study of characteristics of languages that have some application in cryptography or cryptology (e.g. frequency data, letter combinations, universal patterns, etc.) is called cryptolinguistics. History of cryptography and cryptanalysis Main article: History of cryptography Before the modern era, cryptography focused on message confidentiality (i.e., encryption)—conversion of messages from a comprehensible form into an incomprehensible one and back again at the other end, rendering it unreadable by interceptors or eavesdroppers without secret knowledge (namely the key needed for decryption of that message). Encryption attempted to ensure secrecy in communications, such as those of spies, military leaders, and diplomats. In recent decades, the field has expanded beyond confidentiality concerns to include techniques for message integrity checking, sender/receiver identity authentication, digital signatures, interactive proofs and secure computation, among others. Classic cryptography Skytala stick with strip of paper wound around in spiral Reconstructed ancient Greek scytale, an early cipher device The main classical cipher types are transposition ciphers, which rearrange the order of letters in a message (e.g., 'hello world' becomes 'ehlol owrdl' in a trivially simple rearrangement scheme), and substitution ciphers, which systematically replace letters or groups of letters with other letters or groups of letters (e.g., 'fly at once' becomes 'gmz bu podf' by replacing each letter with the one following it in the Latin alphabet). Simple versions of either have never offered much confidentiality from enterprising opponents. An early substitution cipher was the Caesar cipher, in which each letter in the plaintext was replaced by a letter some fixed number of positions further down the alphabet. Suetonius reports that Julius Caesar used it with a shift of three to communicate with his generals. Atbash is an example of an early Hebrew cipher. The earliest known use of cryptography is some carved ciphertext on stone in Egypt (ca 1900 BCE), but this may have been done for the amusement of literate observers rather than as a way of concealing information. The Greeks of Classical times are said to have known of ciphers (e.g., the scytale transposition cipher claimed to have been used by the Spartan military).[18] Steganography (i.e., hiding even the existence of a message so as to keep it confidential) was also first developed in ancient times. An early example, from Herodotus, was a message tattooed on a slave's shaved head and concealed under the regrown hair.[12] More modern examples of steganography include the use of invisible ink, microdots, and digital watermarks to conceal information. In India, the 2000-year-old Kamasutra of Vātsyāyana speaks of two different kinds of ciphers called Kautiliyam and Mulavediya. In the Kautiliyam, the cipher letter substitutions are based on phonetic relations, such as vowels becoming consonants. In the Mulavediya, the cipher alphabet consists of pairing letters and using the reciprocal ones.[12] In Sassanid Persia, there were two secret scripts, according to the Muslim author Ibn al-Nadim: the šāh-dabīrīya (literally "King's script") which was used for official correspondence, and the rāz-saharīya which was used to communicate secret messages with other countries.[19] David Kahn notes in The Codebreakers that modern cryptology originated among the Arabs, the first people to systematically document cryptanalytic methods.[20] Al-Khalil (717–786) wrote the Book of Cryptographic Messages, which contains the first use of permutations and combinations to list all possible Arabic words with and without vowels.[21] Arabic text of a book by Al-Kindi First page of a book by Al-Kindi which discusses encryption of messages Ciphertexts produced by a classical cipher (and some modern ciphers) will reveal statistical information about the plaintext, and that information can often be used to break the cipher. After the discovery of frequency analysis, by the Arab mathematician and polymath Al-Kindi (also known as Alkindus) in the 9th century,[22][23][24] nearly all such ciphers could be broken by an informed attacker. Such classical ciphers still enjoy popularity today, though mostly as puzzles. Al-Kindi wrote a book on cryptography entitled Risalah fi Istikhraj al-Mu'amma (Manuscript for the Deciphering Cryptographic Messages), which described the first known use of frequency analysis and cryptanalysis techniques.[22][25] An important contribution of Ibn Adlan (1187–1268) was on sample size for use of frequency analysis.[21] book sized metal machine with large dial left page and nineteen small dials right page 16th-century book-shaped French cipher machine, with arms of Henri II of France manuscript from Gabriel de Luetz d'Aramon in bound volume Enciphered letter from Gabriel de Luetz d'Aramon, French Ambassador to the Ottoman Empire, after 1546, with partial decipherment Language letter frequencies may offer little help for some extended historical encryption techniques such as homophonic cipher that tend to flatten the frequency distribution. For those ciphers, language letter group (or n-gram) frequencies may provide an attack. Essentially all ciphers remained vulnerable to cryptanalysis using the frequency analysis technique until the development of the polyalphabetic cipher. While it was known to Al-Kindi to some extent,[25][26] it was first clearly described in the work of Al-Qalqashandi (1355–1418), based on the earlier work of Ibn al-Durayhim (1312–1359), describing a polyalphabetic cipher in which each plaintext letter is assigned more than one substitute.[27] It was later also described by Leon Battista Alberti around the year 1467, though there is some indication that Alberti's method was to use different ciphers (i.e., substitution alphabets) for various parts of a message (perhaps for each successive plaintext letter at the limit). He also invented what was probably the first automatic cipher device, a wheel that implemented a partial realization of his invention. In the Vigenère cipher, a polyalphabetic cipher, encryption uses a key word, which controls letter substitution depending on which letter of the key word is used. In the mid-19th century Charles Babbage showed that the Vigenère cipher was vulnerable to Kasiski examination, but this was first published about ten years later by Friedrich Kasiski.[28] Although frequency analysis can be a powerful and general technique against many ciphers, encryption has still often been effective in practice, as many a would-be cryptanalyst was unaware of the technique. Breaking a message without using frequency analysis essentially required knowledge of the cipher used and perhaps of the key involved, thus making espionage, bribery, burglary, defection, etc., more attractive approaches to the cryptanalytically uninformed. It was finally explicitly recognized in the 19th century that secrecy of a cipher's algorithm is not a sensible nor practical safeguard of message security; in fact, it was further realized that any adequate cryptographic scheme (including ciphers) should remain secure even if the adversary fully understands the cipher algorithm itself. Security of the key used should alone be sufficient for a good cipher to maintain confidentiality under an attack. This fundamental principle was first explicitly stated in 1883 by Auguste Kerckhoffs and is generally called Kerckhoffs's Principle; alternatively and more bluntly, it was restated by Claude Shannon, the inventor of information theory and the fundamentals of theoretical cryptography, as Shannon's Maxim—'the enemy knows the system'. Different physical devices and aids have been used to assist with ciphers. One of the earliest may have been the scytale of ancient Greece, a rod supposedly used by the Spartans as an aid for a transposition cipher. In medieval times, other aids were invented such as the cipher grille, which was also used for a kind of steganography. With the invention of polyalphabetic ciphers came more sophisticated aids such as Alberti's own cipher disk, Johannes Trithemius' tabula recta scheme, and Thomas Jefferson's wheel cypher (not publicly known, and reinvented independently by Bazeries around 1900). Many mechanical encryption/decryption devices were invented early in the 20th century, and several patented, among them rotor machines—famously including the Enigma machine used by the German government and military from the late 1920s and during World War II.[29] The ciphers implemented by better quality examples of these machine designs brought about a substantial increase in cryptanalytic difficulty after WWI.[30] Computer era This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2021) (Learn how and when to remove this template message) Prior to the early 20th century, cryptography was mainly concerned with linguistic and lexicographic patterns. Since then the emphasis has shifted, and cryptography now makes extensive use of mathematics, including aspects of information theory, computational complexity, statistics, combinatorics, abstract algebra, number theory, and finite mathematics generally. Cryptography is also a branch of engineering, but an unusual one since it deals with active, intelligent, and malevolent opposition; other kinds of engineering (e.g., civil or chemical engineering) need deal only with neutral natural forces. There is also active research examining the relationship between cryptographic problems and quantum physics. Just as the development of digital computers and electronics helped in cryptanalysis, it made possible much more complex ciphers. Furthermore, computers allowed for the encryption of any kind of data representable in any binary format, unlike classical ciphers which only encrypted written language texts; this was new and significant. Computer use has thus supplanted linguistic cryptography, both for cipher design and cryptanalysis. Many computer ciphers can be characterized by their operation on binary bit sequences (sometimes in groups or blocks), unlike classical and mechanical schemes, which generally manipulate traditional characters (i.e., letters and digits) directly. However, computers have also assisted cryptanalysis, which has compensated to some extent for increased cipher complexity. Nonetheless, good modern ciphers have stayed ahead of cryptanalysis; it is typically the case that use of a quality cipher is very efficient (i.e., fast and requiring few resources, such as memory or CPU capability), while breaking it requires an effort many orders of magnitude larger, and vastly larger than that required for any classical cipher, making cryptanalysis so inefficient and impractical as to be effectively impossible. Advent of modern cryptography Cryptanalysis of the new mechanical devices proved to be both difficult and laborious. In the United Kingdom, cryptanalytic efforts at Bletchley Park during WWII spurred the development of more efficient means for carrying out repetitious tasks. This culminated in the development of the Colossus, the world's first fully electronic, digital, programmable computer, which assisted in the decryption of ciphers generated by the German Army's Lorenz SZ40/42 machine. Extensive open academic research into cryptography is relatively recent; it began only in the mid-1970s. In recent times, IBM personnel designed the algorithm that became the Federal (i.e., US) Data Encryption Standard; Whitfield Diffie and Martin Hellman published their key agreement algorithm;[31] and the RSA algorithm was published in Martin Gardner's Scientific American column. Since then, cryptography has become a widely used tool in communications, computer networks, and computer security generally. Some modern cryptographic techniques can only keep their keys secret if certain mathematical problems are intractable, such as the integer factorization or the discrete logarithm problems, so there are deep connections with abstract mathematics. There are very few cryptosystems that are proven to be unconditionally secure. The one-time pad is one, and was proven to be so by Claude Shannon. There are a few important algorithms that have been proven secure under certain assumptions. For example, the infeasibility of factoring extremely large integers is the basis for believing that RSA is secure, and some other systems, but even so, proof of unbreakability is unavailable since the underlying mathematical problem remains open. In practice, these are widely used, and are believed unbreakable in practice by most competent observers. There are systems similar to RSA, such as one by Michael O. Rabin that are provably secure provided factoring n = pq is impossible; it is quite unusable in practice. The discrete logarithm problem is the basis for believing some other cryptosystems are secure, and again, there are related, less practical systems that are provably secure relative to the solvability or insolvability discrete log problem.[32] As well as being aware of cryptographic history, cryptographic algorithm and system designers must also sensibly consider probable future developments while working on their designs. For instance, continuous improvements in computer processing power have increased the scope of brute-force attacks, so when specifying key lengths, the required key lengths are similarly advancing.[33] The potential effects of quantum computing are already being considered by some cryptographic system designers developing post-quantum cryptography; the announced imminence of small implementations of these machines may be making the need for preemptive caution rather more than merely speculative.[4] Modern cryptography Symmetric-key cryptography Main article: Symmetric-key algorithm diagram showing encrypt with a key and decrypt process Symmetric-key cryptography, where a single key is used for encryption and decryption Symmetric-key cryptography refers to encryption methods in which both the sender and receiver share the same key (or, less commonly, in which their keys are different, but related in an easily computable way). This was the only kind of encryption publicly known until June 1976.[31] logic diagram showing International Data Encryption Algorithm cypher process One round (out of 8.5) of the IDEA cipher, used in most versions of PGP and OpenPGP compatible software for time-efficient encryption of messages Symmetric key ciphers are implemented as either block ciphers or stream ciphers. A block cipher enciphers input in blocks of plaintext as opposed to individual characters, the input form used by a stream cipher. The Data Encryption Standard (DES) and the Advanced Encryption Standard (AES) are block cipher designs that have been designated cryptography standards by the US government (though DES's designation was finally withdrawn after the AES was adopted).[34] Despite its deprecation as an official standard, DES (especially its still-approved and much more secure triple-DES variant) remains quite popular; it is used across a wide range of applications, from ATM encryption[35] to e-mail privacy[36] and secure remote access.[37] Many other block ciphers have been designed and released, with considerable variation in quality. Many, even some designed by capable practitioners, have been thoroughly broken, such as FEAL.[4][38] Stream ciphers, in contrast to the 'block' type, create an arbitrarily long stream of key material, which is combined with the plaintext bit-by-bit or character-by-character, somewhat like the one-time pad. In a stream cipher, the output stream is created based on a hidden internal state that changes as the cipher operates. That internal state is initially set up using the secret key material. RC4 is a widely used stream cipher.[4] Block ciphers can be used as stream ciphers by generating blocks of a keystream (in place of a Pseudorandom number generator) and applying an XOR operation to each bit of the plaintext with each bit of the keystream.[39] Cryptographic hash functions are a third type of cryptographic algorithm. They take a message of any length as input, and output a short, fixed-length hash, which can be used in (for example) a digital signature. For good hash functions, an attacker cannot find two messages that produce the same hash. MD4 is a long-used hash function that is now broken; MD5, a strengthened variant of MD4, is also widely used but broken in practice. The US National Security Agency developed the Secure Hash Algorithm series of MD5-like hash functions: SHA-0 was a flawed algorithm that the agency withdrew; SHA-1 is widely deployed and more secure than MD5, but cryptanalysts have identified attacks against it; the SHA-2 family improves on SHA-1, but is vulnerable to clashes as of 2011; and the US standards authority thought it "prudent" from a security perspective to develop a new standard to "significantly improve the robustness of NIST's overall hash algorithm toolkit."[40] Thus, a hash function design competition was meant to select a new U.S. national standard, to be called SHA-3, by 2012. The competition ended on October 2, 2012, when the NIST announced that Keccak would be the new SHA-3 hash algorithm.[41] Unlike block and stream ciphers that are invertible, cryptographic hash functions produce a hashed output that cannot be used to retrieve the original input data. Cryptographic hash functions are used to verify the authenticity of data retrieved from an untrusted source or to add a layer of security. Message authentication codes (MACs) are much like cryptographic hash functions, except that a secret key can be used to authenticate the hash value upon receipt;[4] this additional complication blocks an attack scheme against bare digest algorithms, and so has been thought worth the effort. Public-key cryptography Main article: Public-key cryptography diagram of Public-key cryptography showing public key and private key Public-key cryptography, where different keys are used for encryption and decryption. padlock icon in the internet browser line next to the url Padlock icon from the Firefox Web browser, which indicates that TLS, a public-key cryptography system, is in use. Symmetric-key cryptosystems use the same key for encryption and decryption of a message, although a message or group of messages can have a different key than others. A significant disadvantage of symmetric ciphers is the key management necessary to use them securely. Each distinct pair of communicating parties must, ideally, share a different key, and perhaps for each ciphertext exchanged as well. The number of keys required increases as the square of the number of network members, which very quickly requires complex key management schemes to keep them all consistent and secret. headshots of Whitfield Diffie and Martin Hellman Whitfield Diffie and Martin Hellman, authors of the first published paper on public-key cryptography. In a groundbreaking 1976 paper, Whitfield Diffie and Martin Hellman proposed the notion of public-key (also, more generally, called asymmetric key) cryptography in which two different but mathematically related keys are used—a public key and a private key.[42] A public key system is so constructed that calculation of one key (the 'private key') is computationally infeasible from the other (the 'public key'), even though they are necessarily related. Instead, both keys are generated secretly, as an interrelated pair.[43] The historian David Kahn described public-key cryptography as "the most revolutionary new concept in the field since polyalphabetic substitution emerged in the Renaissance".[44] In public-key cryptosystems, the public key may be freely distributed, while its paired private key must remain secret. In a public-key encryption system, the public key is used for encryption, while the private or secret key is used for decryption. While Diffie and Hellman could not find such a system, they showed that public-key cryptography was indeed possible by presenting the Diffie–Hellman key exchange protocol, a solution that is now widely used in secure communications to allow two parties to secretly agree on a shared encryption key.[31] The X.509 standard defines the most commonly used format for public key certificates.[45] Diffie and Hellman's publication sparked widespread academic efforts in finding a practical public-key encryption system. This race was finally won in 1978 by Ronald Rivest, Adi Shamir, and Len Adleman, whose solution has since become known as the RSA algorithm.[46] The Diffie–Hellman and RSA algorithms, in addition to being the first publicly known examples of high-quality public-key algorithms, have been among the most widely used. Other asymmetric-key algorithms include the Cramer–Shoup cryptosystem, ElGamal encryption, and various elliptic curve techniques.[citation needed] A document published in 1997 by the Government Communications Headquarters (GCHQ), a British intelligence organization, revealed that cryptographers at GCHQ had anticipated several academic developments.[47] Reportedly, around 1970, James H. Ellis had conceived the principles of asymmetric key cryptography. In 1973, Clifford Cocks invented a solution that was very similar in design rationale to RSA.[47][48] In 1974, Malcolm J. Williamson is claimed to have developed the Diffie–Hellman key exchange.[49] In this example the message is only signed and not encrypted. 1) Alice signs a message with her private key. 2) Bob can verify that Alice sent the message and that the message has not been modified. Public-key cryptography is also used for implementing digital signature schemes. A digital signature is reminiscent of an ordinary signature; they both have the characteristic of being easy for a user to produce, but difficult for anyone else to forge. Digital signatures can also be permanently tied to the content of the message being signed; they cannot then be 'moved' from one document to another, for any attempt will be detectable. In digital signature schemes, there are two algorithms: one for signing, in which a secret key is used to process the message (or a hash of the message, or both), and one for verification, in which the matching public key is used with the message to check the validity of the signature. RSA and DSA are two of the most popular digital signature schemes. Digital signatures are central to the operation of public key infrastructures and many network security schemes (e.g., SSL/TLS, many VPNs, etc.).[38] Public-key algorithms are most often based on the computational complexity of "hard" problems, often from number theory. For example, the hardness of RSA is related to the integer factorization problem, while Diffie–Hellman and DSA are related to the discrete logarithm problem. The security of elliptic curve cryptography is based on number theoretic problems involving elliptic curves. Because of the difficulty of the underlying problems, most public-key algorithms involve operations such as modular multiplication and exponentiation, which are much more computationally expensive than the techniques used in most block ciphers, especially with typical key sizes. As a result, public-key cryptosystems are commonly hybrid cryptosystems, in which a fast high-quality symmetric-key encryption algorithm is used for the message itself, while the relevant symmetric key is sent with the message, but encrypted using a public-key algorithm. Similarly, hybrid signature schemes are often used, in which a cryptographic hash function is computed, and only the resulting hash is digitally signed.[4] Cryptanalysis Main article: Cryptanalysis Enigma machine typewriter keypad over many rotors in a wood box Variants of the Enigma machine, used by Germany's military and civil authorities from the late 1920s through World War II, implemented a complex electro-mechanical polyalphabetic cipher. Breaking and reading of the Enigma cipher at Poland's Cipher Bureau, for 7 years before the war, and subsequent decryption at Bletchley Park, was important to Allied victory.[12] The goal of cryptanalysis is to find some weakness or insecurity in a cryptographic scheme, thus permitting its subversion or evasion. It is a common misconception that every encryption method can be broken. In connection with his WWII work at Bell Labs, Claude Shannon proved that the one-time pad cipher is unbreakable, provided the key material is truly random, never reused, kept secret from all possible attackers, and of equal or greater length than the message.[50] Most ciphers, apart from the one-time pad, can be broken with enough computational effort by brute force attack, but the amount of effort needed may be exponentially dependent on the key size, as compared to the effort needed to make use of the cipher. In such cases, effective security could be achieved if it is proven that the effort required (i.e., "work factor", in Shannon's terms) is beyond the ability of any adversary. This means it must be shown that no efficient method (as opposed to the time-consuming brute force method) can be found to break the cipher. Since no such proof has been found to date, the one-time-pad remains the only theoretically unbreakable cipher. Although well-implemented one-time-pad encryption cannot be broken, traffic analysis is still possible. There are a wide variety of cryptanalytic attacks, and they can be classified in any of several ways. A common distinction turns on what Eve (an attacker) knows and what capabilities are available. In a ciphertext-only attack, Eve has access only to the ciphertext (good modern cryptosystems are usually effectively immune to ciphertext-only attacks). In a known-plaintext attack, Eve has access to a ciphertext and its corresponding plaintext (or to many such pairs). In a chosen-plaintext attack, Eve may choose a plaintext and learn its corresponding ciphertext (perhaps many times); an example is gardening, used by the British during WWII. In a chosen-ciphertext attack, Eve may be able to choose ciphertexts and learn their corresponding plaintexts.[4] Finally in a man-in-the-middle attack Eve gets in between Alice (the sender) and Bob (the recipient), accesses and modifies the traffic and then forwards it to the recipient.[51] Also important, often overwhelmingly so, are mistakes (generally in the design or use of one of the protocols involved). Kaiserschloss Kryptologen monument numbers on stele Poznań monument (center) to Polish cryptanalysts whose breaking of Germany's Enigma machine ciphers, beginning in 1932, altered the course of World War II Cryptanalysis of symmetric-key ciphers typically involves looking for attacks against the block ciphers or stream ciphers that are more efficient than any attack that could be against a perfect cipher. For example, a simple brute force attack against DES requires one known plaintext and 255 decryptions, trying approximately half of the possible keys, to reach a point at which chances are better than even that the key sought will have been found. But this may not be enough assurance; a linear cryptanalysis attack against DES requires 243 known plaintexts (with their corresponding ciphertexts) and approximately 243 DES operations.[52] This is a considerable improvement over brute force attacks. Public-key algorithms are based on the computational difficulty of various problems. The most famous of these are the difficulty of integer factorization of semiprimes and the difficulty of calculating discrete logarithms, both of which are not yet proven to be solvable in polynomial time using only a classical Turing-complete computer. Much public-key cryptanalysis concerns designing algorithms in P that can solve these problems, or using other technologies, such as quantum computers. For instance, the best-known algorithms for solving the elliptic curve-based version of discrete logarithm are much more time-consuming than the best-known algorithms for factoring, at least for problems of more or less equivalent size. Thus, other things being equal, to achieve an equivalent strength of attack resistance, factoring-based encryption techniques must use larger keys than elliptic curve techniques. For this reason, public-key cryptosystems based on elliptic curves have become popular since their invention in the mid-1990s. While pure cryptanalysis uses weaknesses in the algorithms themselves, other attacks on cryptosystems are based on actual use of the algorithms in real devices, and are called side-channel attacks. If a cryptanalyst has access to, for example, the amount of time the device took to encrypt a number of plaintexts or report an error in a password or PIN character, he may be able to use a timing attack to break a cipher that is otherwise resistant to analysis. An attacker might also study the pattern and length of messages to derive valuable information; this is known as traffic analysis[53] and can be quite useful to an alert adversary. Poor administration of a cryptosystem, such as permitting too short keys, will make any system vulnerable, regardless of other virtues. Social engineering and other attacks against humans (e.g., bribery, extortion, blackmail, espionage, torture, ...) are usually employed due to being more cost-effective and feasible to perform in a reasonable amount of time compared to pure cryptanalysis by a high margin. Cryptographic primitives Much of the theoretical work in cryptography concerns cryptographic primitives—algorithms with basic cryptographic properties—and their relationship to other cryptographic problems. More complicated cryptographic tools are then built from these basic primitives. These primitives provide fundamental properties, which are used to develop more complex tools called cryptosystems or cryptographic protocols, which guarantee one or more high-level security properties. Note, however, that the distinction between cryptographic primitives and cryptosystems, is quite arbitrary; for example, the RSA algorithm is sometimes considered a cryptosystem, and sometimes a primitive. Typical examples of cryptographic primitives include pseudorandom functions, one-way functions, etc. Cryptosystems One or more cryptographic primitives are often used to develop a more complex algorithm, called a cryptographic system, or cryptosystem. Cryptosystems (e.g., El-Gamal encryption) are designed to provide particular functionality (e.g., public key encryption) while guaranteeing certain security properties (e.g., chosen-plaintext attack (CPA) security in the random oracle model). Cryptosystems use the properties of the underlying cryptographic primitives to support the system's security properties. As the distinction between primitives and cryptosystems is somewhat arbitrary, a sophisticated cryptosystem can be derived from a combination of several more primitive cryptosystems. In many cases, the cryptosystem's structure involves back and forth communication among two or more parties in space (e.g., between the sender of a secure message and its receiver) or across time (e.g., cryptographically protected backup data). Such cryptosystems are sometimes called cryptographic protocols. Some widely known cryptosystems include RSA encryption, Schnorr signature, El-Gamal encryption, PGP, etc. More complex cryptosystems include electronic cash[54] systems, signcryption systems, etc. Some more 'theoretical'[clarification needed] cryptosystems include interactive proof systems,[55] (like zero-knowledge proofs),[56] systems for secret sharing,[57][58] etc. Lightweight cryptography Lightweight cryptography (LWC) concerns cryptographic algorithms developed for a strictly constrained environment. The growth of Internet of Things (IoT) has spiked research into the development of lightweight algorithms that are better suited for the environment. An IoT environment requires strict constraints on power consumption, processing power, and security.[59] Algorithms such as PRESENT, AES, and SPECK are examples of the many LWC algorithms that have been developed to achieve the standard set by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.[60] Legal issues See also: Cryptography laws in different nations Prohibitions Cryptography has long been of interest to intelligence gathering and law enforcement agencies.[8] Secret communications may be criminal or even treasonous[citation needed]. Because of its facilitation of privacy, and the diminution of privacy attendant on its prohibition, cryptography is also of considerable interest to civil rights supporters. Accordingly, there has been a history of controversial legal issues surrounding cryptography, especially since the advent of inexpensive computers has made widespread access to high-quality cryptography possible. In some countries, even the domestic use of cryptography is, or has been, restricted. Until 1999, France significantly restricted the use of cryptography domestically, though it has since relaxed many of these rules. In China and Iran, a license is still required to use cryptography.[6] Many countries have tight restrictions on the use of cryptography. Among the more restrictive are laws in Belarus, Kazakhstan, Mongolia, Pakistan, Singapore, Tunisia, and Vietnam.[61] In the United States, cryptography is legal for domestic use, but there has been much conflict over legal issues related to cryptography.[8] One particularly important issue has been the export of cryptography and cryptographic software and hardware. Probably because of the importance of cryptanalysis in World War II and an expectation that cryptography would continue to be important for national security, many Western governments have, at some point, strictly regulated export of cryptography. After World War II, it was illegal in the US to sell or distribute encryption technology overseas; in fact, encryption was designated as auxiliary military equipment and put on the United States Munitions List.[62] Until the development of the personal computer, asymmetric key algorithms (i.e., public key techniques), and the Internet, this was not especially problematic. However, as the Internet grew and computers became more widely available, high-quality encryption techniques became well known around the globe. Export controls Main article: Export of cryptography In the 1990s, there were several challenges to US export regulation of cryptography. After the source code for Philip Zimmermann's Pretty Good Privacy (PGP) encryption program found its way onto the Internet in June 1991, a complaint by RSA Security (then called RSA Data Security, Inc.) resulted in a lengthy criminal investigation of Zimmermann by the US Customs Service and the FBI, though no charges were ever filed.[63][64] Daniel J. Bernstein, then a graduate student at UC Berkeley, brought a lawsuit against the US government challenging some aspects of the restrictions based on free speech grounds. The 1995 case Bernstein v. United States ultimately resulted in a 1999 decision that printed source code for cryptographic algorithms and systems was protected as free speech by the United States Constitution.[65] In 1996, thirty-nine countries signed the Wassenaar Arrangement, an arms control treaty that deals with the export of arms and "dual-use" technologies such as cryptography. The treaty stipulated that the use of cryptography with short key-lengths (56-bit for symmetric encryption, 512-bit for RSA) would no longer be export-controlled.[66] Cryptography exports from the US became less strictly regulated as a consequence of a major relaxation in 2000;[67] there are no longer very many restrictions on key sizes in US-exported mass-market software. Since this relaxation in US export restrictions, and because most personal computers connected to the Internet include US-sourced web browsers such as Firefox or Internet Explorer, almost every Internet user worldwide has potential access to quality cryptography via their browsers (e.g., via Transport Layer Security). The Mozilla Thunderbird and Microsoft Outlook E-mail client programs similarly can transmit and receive emails via TLS, and can send and receive email encrypted with S/MIME. Many Internet users don't realize that their basic application software contains such extensive cryptosystems. These browsers and email programs are so ubiquitous that even governments whose intent is to regulate civilian use of cryptography generally don't find it practical to do much to control distribution or use of cryptography of this quality, so even when such laws are in force, actual enforcement is often effectively impossible.[citation needed] NSA involvement NSA headquarters in Fort Meade, Maryland See also: Clipper chip Another contentious issue connected to cryptography in the United States is the influence of the National Security Agency on cipher development and policy.[8] The NSA was involved with the design of DES during its development at IBM and its consideration by the National Bureau of Standards as a possible Federal Standard for cryptography.[68] DES was designed to be resistant to differential cryptanalysis,[69] a powerful and general cryptanalytic technique known to the NSA and IBM, that became publicly known only when it was rediscovered in the late 1980s.[70] According to Steven Levy, IBM discovered differential cryptanalysis,[64] but kept the technique secret at the NSA's request. The technique became publicly known only when Biham and Shamir re-discovered and announced it some years later. The entire affair illustrates the difficulty of determining what resources and knowledge an attacker might actually have. Another instance of the NSA's involvement was the 1993 Clipper chip affair, an encryption microchip intended to be part of the Capstone cryptography-control initiative. Clipper was widely criticized by cryptographers for two reasons. The cipher algorithm (called Skipjack) was then classified (declassified in 1998, long after the Clipper initiative lapsed). The classified cipher caused concerns that the NSA had deliberately made the cipher weak in order to assist its intelligence efforts. The whole initiative was also criticized based on its violation of Kerckhoffs's Principle, as the scheme included a special escrow key held by the government for use by law enforcement (i.e. wiretapping).[64] Digital rights management Main article: Digital rights management Cryptography is central to digital rights management (DRM), a group of techniques for technologically controlling use of copyrighted material, being widely implemented and deployed at the behest of some copyright holders. In 1998, U.S. President Bill Clinton signed the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA), which criminalized all production, dissemination, and use of certain cryptanalytic techniques and technology (now known or later discovered); specifically, those that could be used to circumvent DRM technological schemes.[71] This had a noticeable impact on the cryptography research community since an argument can be made that any cryptanalytic research violated the DMCA. Similar statutes have since been enacted in several countries and regions, including the implementation in the EU Copyright Directive. Similar restrictions are called for by treaties signed by World Intellectual Property Organization member-states. The United States Department of Justice and FBI have not enforced the DMCA as rigorously as had been feared by some, but the law, nonetheless, remains a controversial one. Niels Ferguson, a well-respected cryptography researcher, has publicly stated that he will not release some of his research into an Intel security design for fear of prosecution under the DMCA.[72] Cryptologist Bruce Schneier has argued that the DMCA encourages vendor lock-in, while inhibiting actual measures toward cyber-security.[73] Both Alan Cox (longtime Linux kernel developer) and Edward Felten (and some of his students at Princeton) have encountered problems related to the Act. Dmitry Sklyarov was arrested during a visit to the US from Russia, and jailed for five months pending trial for alleged violations of the DMCA arising from work he had done in Russia, where the work was legal. In 2007, the cryptographic keys responsible for Blu-ray and HD DVD content scrambling were discovered and released onto the Internet. In both cases, the Motion Picture Association of America sent out numerous DMCA takedown notices, and there was a massive Internet backlash[9] triggered by the perceived impact of such notices on fair use and free speech. Forced disclosure of encryption keys Main article: Key disclosure law In the United Kingdom, the Regulation of Investigatory Powers Act gives UK police the powers to force suspects to decrypt files or hand over passwords that protect encryption keys. Failure to comply is an offense in its own right, punishable on conviction by a two-year jail sentence or up to five years in cases involving national security.[7] Successful prosecutions have occurred under the Act; the first, in 2009,[74] resulted in a term of 13 months' imprisonment.[75] Similar forced disclosure laws in Australia, Finland, France, and India compel individual suspects under investigation to hand over encryption keys or passwords during a criminal investigation. In the United States, the federal criminal case of United States v. Fricosu addressed whether a search warrant can compel a person to reveal an encryption passphrase or password.[76] The Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF) argued that this is a violation of the protection from self-incrimination given by the Fifth Amendment.[77] In 2012, the court ruled that under the All Writs Act, the defendant was required to produce an unencrypted hard drive for the court.[78] In many jurisdictions, the legal status of forced disclosure remains unclear. The 2016 FBI–Apple encryption dispute concerns the ability of courts in the United States to compel manufacturers' assistance in unlocking cell phones whose contents are cryptographically protected. As a potential counter-measure to forced disclosure some cryptographic software supports plausible deniability, where the encrypted data is indistinguishable from unused random data (for example such as that of a drive which has been securely wiped). See also Outline of cryptography – Overview of and topical guide to cryptography List of cryptographers – Wikipedia list article List of important publications in cryptography – Wikipedia list article List of multiple discoveries – Wikipedia list article List of unsolved problems in computer science – Wikipedia list article Syllabical and Steganographical Table – Eighteenth-century work believed to be the first cryptography chart – first cryptography chart Comparison of cryptography libraries Crypto Wars Encyclopedia of Cryptography and Security – Book by Technische Universiteit Eindhoven Global surveillance – Mass surveillance across national borders Indistinguishability obfuscation – Cryptographic algorithm Information theory – Theory dealing with information Strong cryptography World Wide Web Consortium's Web Cryptography API – World Wide Web Consortium cryptography standard Collision attack References Liddell, Henry George; Scott, Robert; Jones, Henry Stuart; McKenzie, Roderick (1984). A Greek-English Lexicon. Oxford University Press. Rivest, Ronald L. (1990). "Cryptography". In J. Van Leeuwen (ed.). Handbook of Theoretical Computer Science. 1. Elsevier. Bellare, Mihir; Rogaway, Phillip (21 September 2005). "Introduction". Introduction to Modern Cryptography. p. 10. Menezes, A.J.; van Oorschot, P.C.; Vanstone, S.A. (1997). Handbook of Applied Cryptography. ISBN 978-0-8493-8523-0. Biggs, Norman (2008). Codes: An introduction to Information Communication and Cryptography. Springer. p. 171. "Overview per country". Crypto Law Survey. February 2013. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "UK Data Encryption Disclosure Law Takes Effect". PC World. 1 October 2007. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Ranger, Steve (24 March 2015). "The undercover war on your internet secrets: How online surveillance cracked our trust in the web". TechRepublic. Archived from the original on 12 June 2016. Retrieved 12 June 2016. Doctorow, Cory (2 May 2007). "Digg users revolt over AACS key". Boing Boing. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Whalen, Terence (1994). "The Code for Gold: Edgar Allan Poe and Cryptography". Representations. University of California Press. 46 (46): 35–57. doi:10.2307/2928778. JSTOR 2928778. Rosenheim 1997, p. 20 Kahn, David (1967). The Codebreakers. ISBN 978-0-684-83130-5. "An Introduction to Modern Cryptosystems". Sharbaf, M.S. (1 November 2011). "Quantum cryptography: An emerging technology in network security". 2011 IEEE International Conference on Technologies for Homeland Security (HST): 13–19. doi:10.1109/THS.2011.6107841. ISBN 978-1-4577-1376-7. S2CID 17915038. Oded Goldreich, Foundations of Cryptography, Volume 1: Basic Tools, Cambridge University Press, 2001, ISBN 0-521-79172-3 "Cryptology (definition)". Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary (11th ed.). Merriam-Webster. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "Internet Security Glossary". Internet Engineering Task Force. May 2000. RFC 2828. Retrieved 26 March 2015. I︠A︡shchenko, V.V. (2002). Cryptography: an introduction. AMS Bookstore. p. 6. ISBN 978-0-8218-2986-8. electricpulp.com. "CODES – Encyclopaedia Iranica". www.iranicaonline.org. Kahn, David (1996). The Codebreakers: The Comprehensive History of Secret Communication from Ancient Times to the Internet. Simon and Schuster. ISBN 9781439103555. Broemeling, Lyle D. (1 November 2011). "An Account of Early Statistical Inference in Arab Cryptology". The American Statistician. 65 (4): 255–257. doi:10.1198/tas.2011.10191. S2CID 123537702. Singh, Simon (2000). The Code Book. New York: Anchor Books. pp. 14–20. ISBN 978-0-385-49532-5. Leaman, Oliver (16 July 2015). The Biographical Encyclopedia of Islamic Philosophy. Bloomsbury Publishing. ISBN 9781472569455. Retrieved 19 March 2018 – via Google Books. Al-Jubouri, I. M. N. (19 March 2018). History of Islamic Philosophy: With View of Greek Philosophy and Early History of Islam. Authors On Line Ltd. ISBN 9780755210114. Retrieved 19 March 2018 – via Google Books. Al-Kadi, Ibrahim A. (April 1992). "The origins of cryptology: The Arab contributions". Cryptologia. 16 (2): 97–126. doi:10.1080/0161-119291866801. Simon Singh, The Code Book, pp. 14–20 Lennon, Brian (2018). Passwords: Philology, Security, Authentication. Harvard University Press. p. 26. ISBN 9780674985377. Schrödel, Tobias (October 2008). "Breaking Short Vigenère Ciphers". Cryptologia. 32 (4): 334–337. doi:10.1080/01611190802336097. S2CID 21812933. Hakim, Joy (1995). A History of US: War, Peace and all that Jazz. New York: Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-509514-2. Gannon, James (2001). Stealing Secrets, Telling Lies: How Spies and Codebreakers Helped Shape the Twentieth Century. Washington, D.C.: Brassey's. ISBN 978-1-57488-367-1. Diffie, Whitfield; Hellman, Martin (November 1976). "New Directions in Cryptography" (PDF). IEEE Transactions on Information Theory. IT-22 (6): 644–654. CiteSeerX 10.1.1.37.9720. doi:10.1109/tit.1976.1055638. Cryptography: Theory and Practice, Third Edition (Discrete Mathematics and Its Applications), 2005, by Douglas R. Stinson, Chapman and Hall/CRC Blaze, Matt; Diffie, Whitefield; Rivest, Ronald L.; Schneier, Bruce; Shimomura, Tsutomu; Thompson, Eric; Wiener, Michael (January 1996). "Minimal key lengths for symmetric ciphers to provide adequate commercial security". Fortify. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "FIPS PUB 197: The official Advanced Encryption Standard" (PDF). Computer Security Resource Center. National Institute of Standards and Technology. Archived from the original (PDF) on 7 April 2015. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "NCUA letter to credit unions" (PDF). National Credit Union Administration. July 2004. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "Open PGP Message Format". Internet Engineering Task Force. November 1998. RFC 2440. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Golen, Pawel (19 July 2002). "SSH". WindowSecurity. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Schneier, Bruce (1996). Applied Cryptography (2nd ed.). Wiley. ISBN 978-0-471-11709-4. Paar, Christof (2009). Understanding cryptography : a textbook for students and practitioners. Jan Pelzl. Berlin: Springer. p. 123. ISBN 3-642-04101-9. OCLC 567365751. "Notices". Federal Register. 72 (212). 2 November 2007. "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original on 28 February 2008. Retrieved 27 January 2009. "NIST Selects Winner of Secure Hash Algorithm (SHA-3) Competition". Tech Beat. National Institute of Standards and Technology. 2 October 2012. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Diffie, Whitfield; Hellman, Martin (8 June 1976). "Multi-user cryptographic techniques". AFIPS Proceedings. 45: 109–112. doi:10.1145/1499799.1499815. S2CID 13210741. Ralph Merkle was working on similar ideas at the time and encountered publication delays, and Hellman has suggested that the term used should be Diffie–Hellman–Merkle aysmmetric key cryptography. Kahn, David (Fall 1979). "Cryptology Goes Public". Foreign Affairs. 58 (1): 141–159. doi:10.2307/20040343. JSTOR 20040343. "Using Client-Certificate based authentication with NGINX on Ubuntu - SSLTrust". SSLTrust. Retrieved 13 June 2019. Rivest, Ronald L.; Shamir, A.; Adleman, L. (1978). "A Method for Obtaining Digital Signatures and Public-Key Cryptosystems". Communications of the ACM. 21 (2): 120–126. CiteSeerX 10.1.1.607.2677. doi:10.1145/359340.359342. S2CID 2873616. "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 16 November 2001. Retrieved 20 April 2006. Previously released as an MIT "Technical Memo" in April 1977, and published in Martin Gardner's Scientific American Mathematical recreations column Wayner, Peter (24 December 1997). "British Document Outlines Early Encryption Discovery". The New York Times. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Cocks, Clifford (20 November 1973). "A Note on 'Non-Secret Encryption'" (PDF). CESG Research Report. Singh, Simon (1999). The Code Book. Doubleday. pp. 279–292. Shannon, Claude; Weaver, Warren (1963). The Mathematical Theory of Communication. University of Illinois Press. ISBN 978-0-252-72548-7. "An Example of a Man-in-the-middle Attack Against Server Authenticated SSL-sessions" (PDF). Junod, Pascal (2001). On the Complexity of Matsui's Attack (PDF). Selected Areas in Cryptography. Lecture Notes in Computer Science. 2259. pp. 199–211. doi:10.1007/3-540-45537-X_16. ISBN 978-3-540-43066-7. Song, Dawn; Wagner, David A.; Tian, Xuqing (2001). "Timing Analysis of Keystrokes and Timing Attacks on SSH" (PDF). Tenth USENIX Security Symposium. Brands, S. (1994). "Untraceable Off-line Cash in Wallet with Observers". Untraceable Off-line Cash in Wallets with Observers. Advances in Cryptology—Proceedings of CRYPTO. Lecture Notes in Computer Science. 773. pp. 302–318. doi:10.1007/3-540-48329-2_26. ISBN 978-3-540-57766-9. Archived from the original on 26 July 2011. Babai, László (1985). "Trading group theory for randomness". Proceedings of the seventeenth annual ACM symposium on Theory of computing - STOC '85. Proceedings of the Seventeenth Annual Symposium on the Theory of Computing. Stoc '85. pp. 421–429. CiteSeerX 10.1.1.130.3397. doi:10.1145/22145.22192. ISBN 978-0-89791-151-1. S2CID 17981195. Goldwasser, S.; Micali, S.; Rackoff, C. (1989). "The Knowledge Complexity of Interactive Proof Systems". SIAM Journal on Computing. 18 (1): 186–208. CiteSeerX 10.1.1.397.4002. doi:10.1137/0218012. Blakley, G. (June 1979). "Safeguarding cryptographic keys". Proceedings of AFIPS 1979. 48: 313–317. Shamir, A. (1979). "How to share a secret". Communications of the ACM. 22 (11): 612–613. doi:10.1145/359168.359176. S2CID 16321225. Gunathilake, Nilupulee A.; Al-Dubai, Ahmed; Buchana, William J. (2 November 2020). "Recent Advances and Trends in Lightweight Cryptography for IoT Security". 2020 16th International Conference on Network and Service Management (CNSM). Izmir, Turkey: IEEE: 1–5. doi:10.23919/CNSM50824.2020.9269083. ISBN 978-3-903176-31-7. S2CID 227277538. Thakor, Vishal A.; Razzaque, Mohammad Abdur; Khandaker, Muhammad R. A. (2021). "Lightweight Cryptography Algorithms for Resource-Constrained IoT Devices: A Review, Comparison and Research Opportunities". IEEE Access. 9: 28177–28193. doi:10.1109/ACCESS.2021.3052867. ISSN 2169-3536. S2CID 232042514. "6.5.1 What Are the Cryptographic Policies of Some Countries?". RSA Laboratories. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Rosenoer, Jonathan (1995). "Cryptography & Speech". CyberLaw. "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 1 December 2005. Retrieved 23 June 2006. "Case Closed on Zimmermann PGP Investigation". IEEE Computer Society's Technical Committee on Security and Privacy. 14 February 1996. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Levy, Steven (2001). Crypto: How the Code Rebels Beat the Government—Saving Privacy in the Digital Age. Penguin Books. p. 56. ISBN 978-0-14-024432-8. OCLC 244148644. "Bernstein v USDOJ". Electronic Privacy Information Center. United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit. 6 May 1999. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "Dual-use List – Category 5 – Part 2 – "Information Security"" (PDF). Wassenaar Arrangement. Retrieved 26 March 2015. ".4 United States Cryptography Export/Import Laws". RSA Laboratories. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Schneier, Bruce (15 June 2000). "The Data Encryption Standard (DES)". Crypto-Gram. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Coppersmith, D. (May 1994). "The Data Encryption Standard (DES) and its strength against attacks" (PDF). IBM Journal of Research and Development. 38 (3): 243–250. doi:10.1147/rd.383.0243. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Biham, E.; Shamir, A. (1991). "Differential cryptanalysis of DES-like cryptosystems". Journal of Cryptology. 4 (1): 3–72. doi:10.1007/bf00630563. S2CID 206783462. "The Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998" (PDF). United States Copyright Office. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Ferguson, Niels (15 August 2001). "Censorship in action: why I don't publish my HDCP results". Archived from the original on 1 December 2001. Retrieved 16 February 2009. Schneier, Bruce (6 August 2001). "Arrest of Computer Researcher Is Arrest of First Amendment Rights". InternetWeek. Retrieved 7 March 2017. Williams, Christopher (11 August 2009). "Two convicted for refusal to decrypt data". The Register. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Williams, Christopher (24 November 2009). "UK jails schizophrenic for refusal to decrypt files". The Register. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Ingold, John (4 January 2012). "Password case reframes Fifth Amendment rights in context of digital world". The Denver Post. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Leyden, John (13 July 2011). "US court test for rights not to hand over crypto keys". The Register. Retrieved 26 March 2015. "Order Granting Application under the All Writs Act Requiring Defendant Fricosu to Assist in the Execution of Previously Issued Search Warrants" (PDF). United States District Court for the District of Colorado. Retrieved 26 March 2015. Further reading Further information: Books on cryptography Becket, B (1988). Introduction to Cryptology. Blackwell Scientific Publications. ISBN 978-0-632-01836-9. OCLC 16832704. Excellent coverage of many classical ciphers and cryptography concepts and of the "modern" DES and RSA systems. Cryptography and Mathematics by Bernhard Esslinger, 200 pages, part of the free open-source package CrypTool, "PDF download" (PDF). Archived from the original on 22 July 2011. Retrieved 23 December 2013.. CrypTool is the most widespread e-learning program about cryptography and cryptanalysis, open source. In Code: A Mathematical Journey by Sarah Flannery (with David Flannery). Popular account of Sarah's award-winning project on public-key cryptography, co-written with her father. James Gannon, Stealing Secrets, Telling Lies: How Spies and Codebreakers Helped Shape the Twentieth Century, Washington, D.C., Brassey's, 2001, ISBN 1-57488-367-4. Oded Goldreich, Foundations of Cryptography, in two volumes, Cambridge University Press, 2001 and 2004. Introduction to Modern Cryptography by Jonathan Katz and Yehuda Lindell. Alvin's Secret Code by Clifford B. Hicks (children's novel that introduces some basic cryptography and cryptanalysis). Ibrahim A. Al-Kadi, "The Origins of Cryptology: the Arab Contributions," Cryptologia, vol. 16, no. 2 (April 1992), pp. 97–126. Christof Paar, Jan Pelzl, Understanding Cryptography, A Textbook for Students and Practitioners. Archived 31 October 2020 at the Wayback Machine Springer, 2009. (Slides, online cryptography lectures and other information are available on the companion web site.) Very accessible introduction to practical cryptography for non-mathematicians. Introduction to Modern Cryptography by Phillip Rogaway and Mihir Bellare, a mathematical introduction to theoretical cryptography including reduction-based security proofs. PDF download. Johann-Christoph Woltag, 'Coded Communications (Encryption)' in Rüdiger Wolfrum (ed) Max Planck Encyclopedia of Public International Law (Oxford University Press 2009). "Max Planck Encyclopedia of Public International Law"., giving an overview of international law issues regarding cryptography. Jonathan Arbib & John Dwyer, Discrete Mathematics for Cryptography, 1st Edition ISBN 978-1-907934-01-8. Stallings, William (March 2013). Cryptography and Network Security: Principles and Practice (6th ed.). Prentice Hall. ISBN 978-0-13-335469-0. External links Wikiquote has quotations related to: Cryptography Wikibooks has more on the topic of: Cryptography At Wikiversity, you can learn more and teach others about Cryptography at the Department of Cryptography Wikisource has the text of the 1911 Encyclopædia Britannica article Cryptography . Library resources about Cryptography Online books Resources in your library Resources in other libraries The dictionary definition of cryptography at Wiktionary Media related to Cryptography at Wikimedia Commons Cryptography on In Our Time at the BBC Crypto Glossary and Dictionary of Technical Cryptography NSA's CryptoKids. Overview and Applications of Cryptology by the CrypTool Team; PDF; 3.8 MB. July 2008 A Course in Cryptography by Raphael Pass & Abhi Shelat – offered at Cornell in the form of lecture notes. For more on the use of cryptographic elements in fiction, see: Dooley, John F., William and Marilyn Ingersoll Professor of Computer Science, Knox College (23 August 2012). "Cryptology in Fiction". Archived from the original on 29 July 2020. Retrieved 20 February 2015. The George Fabyan Collection at the Library of Congress has early editions of works of seventeenth-century English literature, publications relating to cryptography. Articles relating to Cryptography vte Espionage vte Hidden messages vte Intelligence management Authority control Edit this at Wikidata Categories: CryptographyBanking technologyFormal sciencesApplied mathematics Navigation menu Not logged in Talk Contributions Create account Log in ArticleTalk ReadEditView historySearch Search Wikipedia Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Tools What links here Related changes Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Wikidata item Print/export Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikibooks Wikiquote Wikiversity Languages Deutsch Español Français 한국어 Italiano Русский Tagalog Tiếng Việt 中文 82 more Edit links This page was last edited on 28 May 2021, at 22:54 (UTC). Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization. Privacy policyAbout WikipediaDisclaimersContact WikipediaMobile viewDevelopersStatisticsCookie statementWikimedia FoundationPowered by MediaWiki Letter frequency is the number of times letters of the alphabet appear on average in written language. Letter frequency analysis dates back to the Arab mathematician Al-Kindi (c. 801–873 AD), who formally developed the method to break ciphers. Letter frequency analysis gained importance in Europe with the development of movable type in 1450 AD, where one must estimate the amount of type required for each letterform. Linguists use letter frequency analysis as a rudimentary technique for language identification, where it is particularly effective as an indication of whether an unknown writing system is alphabetic, syllabic, or ideographic. The use of letter frequencies and frequency analysis plays a fundamental role in cryptograms and several word puzzle games, including Hangman, Scrabble and the television game show Wheel of Fortune. One of the earliest descriptions in classical literature of applying the knowledge of English letter frequency to solving a cryptogram is found in Edgar Allan Poe's famous story The Gold-Bug, where the method is successfully applied to decipher a message instructing on the whereabouts of a treasure hidden by Captain Kidd.[1] Letter frequencies also have a strong effect on the design of some keyboard layouts. The most frequent letters are on the bottom row of the Blickensderfer typewriter, and the home row of the Dvorak keyboard layout. Skip to content  This website uses cookies to improve the user experience. By using this website you consent to all cookies in accordance with our cookie policy.   I understand  Nobel Prizes & Laureates  Physics Prize  Chemistry Prize  Medicine Prize  Literature Prize  Peace Prize  Prize in Economic Sciences  Quick facts  Nomination  Physics Prize  Chemistry Prize  Medicine Prize  Literature Prize  Peace Prize  Prize in Economic Sciences  Nomination Archive  Alfred Nobel  Alfred Nobel’s life  Alfred Nobel’s will  News & insights  Press  In-depth  Events  Public events  Nobel Prize Concert  Nobel Week Dialogue  Nobel Prize Dialogue  Nobel Prize Summit  Nobel Prize Inspiration Initiative  Nobel Prize award ceremonies  Education network  Nobel Prize Lessons  Nobel Prize Teacher Summit   Literature  The Nobel Prize in Literature 2012   Mo Yan - Prose  The Nobel Prize in Literature 2012  Mo Yan  Share this  Facebook  Twitter  LinkedIn  Email this page  Prose   Excerpt from The Garlic Ballads  Chapter 16  Arrest me if that’s what you want …  Someone read the Criminal Code aloud for me –  Blind lawbreakers get lenient treatment –  I won’t shut my mouth just because you put me in jail …   – from a ballad by Zhang Kou sung after being touched on the mouth  with a policeman’s electric prod. The incident occurred in a tiny  lane around the corner from the county government compound on  the twenty-ninth of May, 1987   1  A jailer led him down the long corridor while another walked behind him to the right, pressing a rifle muzzle up against his ribs. An identical gray metal door with an identical small opening fronted each cell, the only differences being the Arabic numbers above the doors and the faces looking out through the tiny openings. They were bloated, grotesquely enlarged, the faces of living ghosts. He shuddered. Every step was torture. Behind one of the windows a female convict giggled. “Jailer, here’s twenty cents, buy me some sanitary napkins, okay?” The jailer responded with an angry curse: “Slut!” But when Gao Yang turned to see what the woman looked like, he felt a nudge from the rifle. “Keep moving!”   Reaching the end of the corridor, they passed through a steel door and climbed a narrow, rickety staircase. The jailer’s leather shoes clacked loudly on the wooden, steps, while the slaps of Gao Yang’s bare feet were barely audible. The warm, dry wood felt so much better on his feet than the damp, slippery concrete corridor floor. Up and up he climbed, with no end in sight; he was soon panting, and as the staircase wound steeply round, he began to get dizzy. If not for the jailer behind him, silently nudging him along with his rifle, he’d have lain down like a dying dog, spread out over as many steps as were required to support him. His injured ankle throbbed like a pulsating heart; the surrounding skin was so puffy his anklebone all but disappeared. It burned and ached. Old man in heaven, please don’t let it get infected, he uttered in silent prayer. Would that aristocratic woman be willing to lance it and release the pus? That thought reminded him of how she had smelled.   A large room with a wooden floor painted red. White plaster shows through the peeling green paint on the walls. Bright daylight shines down from the ceiling on four crackling electric prods. Desks line the northern wall. A male and two female jailers sit behind the desks. One of the women has a face like a persimmon fresh from the garden. He recognizes the words painted on the wall behind them.   A jailer orders him to sit on the floor, for which he is immensely grateful. He is then told to stretch his legs out in front and rest his manacled hands on his knees. He does as he’s told.   “Is your name Gao Yang?”   “Yes.”   “Age?”   “Forty-one.”   “Occupation?”   “Farmer.”   “Family background?”   “Um … my, uh, parents were landlords …”   “Are you familiar with government policy?”   “Yes. Leniency to those who confess, severity to those who refuse to do so. Not coming clean brings severe punishment.”   “Good. Now tell us about your criminal activities of May twenty-eighth.”   2  Dark clouds filled the sky on May 28 as Gao Yang drove his donkey; it was scrawnier than ever, after exhausting itself day after day lugging eighty bundles of wilting garlic to town so Gao Yang could try his luck again. Nine days since Fourth Uncle had met his tragic end, but it seemed like an eternity. During that period Gao Yang had made four trips to town, selling fifty bundles of garlic for a total of a hundred twenty yuan, minus eighteen yuan for the various fees and taxes, which left him a profit of one hundred and two. The eighty bundles he was hauling now should have been sold two days earlier at a purchasing station set up north of the tracks by the South Counties Supply and Marketing Cooperative, which was buying garlic at fifty fen a pound. But just as Gao Yang reached the scales with his load, a gang of men in gray uniforms and wide-brimmed hats showed up, led by Wang Tai.   Gao Yang nodded obsequiously to Wang Tai, who, ignoring him, went up and began arguing with the co-op representatives, eventually knocking over their scales. “No one’s going to walk off with a single stalk of Paradise garlic until my storehouse is filled,” Wang Tai insisted. The dejected representatives of the South Counties Supply and Marketing Cooperative climbed into their trucks and drove off.   So Gao Yang packed up his garlic. But before he left, he tried again to get the attention of Wang Tai as he walked off with his men.   Dark clouds filled the sky two days later, on May 28. It looked like rain. Gao Yang had just crossed the tracks when someone up ahead passed word down: “The supply and marketing co-op’s storehouses are full, so now we can sell our garlic anywhere we want.”   “But where? The locals have already squeezed out us farmers from outlying districts. They don’t care if we live or die.”   As the talk heated up, feelings of helplessness began to grip the farmers, but none turned his cart around and headed home. It was as if their only hope lay up ahead somewhere.   The line of wagons pressed forward, so Gao Yang fell in behind them, gradually realizing that instead of heading toward the cold-storage area, they were rolling down the renowned May First Boulevard on their way to May First Square, directly in front of the county government compound.   As the number of garlic farmers increased, the air above the square grew increasingly pungent. Dark clouds roiled above the downcast farmers, who began to grumble and swear. Zhang Kou, the blind minstrel, stood atop a rickety oxcart, strumming his erhu and chanting loudly in his raspy voice, froth bubbling at the corners of his mouth. His song plucked the heartstrings of everyone within earshot; Gao Yang couldn’t speak for the others, but he felt sad one moment and angry the next, with a measure of hidden fear mixed in. He had a premonition that trouble was brewing that day, for there, in a nearby lane, some people – he couldn’t tell who – were taking pictures of the square. He wanted to turn his wagon around and put some distance between him and this dangerous spot, but was hemmed in.   The county government compound was on the northern side of the boulevard, running past the public square. Pines and poplars grew tall and green behind the wall; fresh flowers bloomed everywhere; and a column of water rose in the center of the compound, only to fan out and rain down on the fountain below. The government offices were housed in a handsome three-story building with glass-inlaid arched eaves and yellow ceramic tiles set in the walls. A bright red flag billowed atop a flagpole. The place was as grand as an imperial palace. Traffic on May First Boulevard was blocked by the carts and wagons and their loads of garlic. Impatient drivers honked their horns, but their sonorous complaints were ignored. Noticing the carefree looks on others’ faces, Gao Yang relaxed. Why worry? he thought. The worst that can happen is I lose my load of garlic.   Zhang Kou, the blind minstrel, sang: “… Hand baby to Mother to stem its grief. / If you can’t sell your garlic, look up the county administrator …”   The heavy wrought-iron gate was shut tight. Well-dressed office workers peeked through windows to watch the goings-on in the square, where hundreds of people were massed before the gate. A cry went up: “Come out, County Administrator! Come out here, Zhong Weimin! If your name really means ‘Serve the People,’ then do it!”   Fists and clubs pounded the gate, but the compound remained still as death – not a person in sight, until an old caretaker came out to secure the gate with a huge padlock. While he was about his business, phlegm and spittle rained down on his clothes and face. Not daring to say a word, he turned and darted inside.   “Hey, you old dog, you old watchdog, come back and open this gate!” the crowd bellowed.   By now the horns of the jammed-up cars were silent. Drivers leaned out their windows to see what was going on.   “Get the county administrator or the party secretary out here to give us an explanation!”   “Get out here, Zhong Weimin!”   Gao Yang saw a horse-faced young man perched on a cart, like a crane standing amid a flock of chickens. “Fellow townsmen,” he shouted, “don’t just yell anything that comes to mind! The county administrator won’t hear you that way. F-follow my lead!” He had a slight stammer. The crowd roared its approval.   “His name is ‘Serve the People,’ but he should change it to ‘Serve Myself!” The horse-faced young man shook his fist.   The shout was repeated by the crowd, including Gao Yang, who was so caught up in the heat of the moment he too shook his fist.   “County Administrator, Master ‘Serve the People’ Zhong, come out and face your people!” The horse-faced young man had a strange look on his face; his lips hardly moved.   The crowd echoed his shout, a deafening roar to which Gao Yang contributed.   “Officials who don’t bail people out of jams should stay home and plant their yams!” Everyone knew that slogan, so they shouted it over and over.   Finally two men in Western suits emerged from the building and walked up to the gate. “Garlic farmers, quiet down! Quiet down, I said!”   The crowd held its collective tongue to observe the newcomers on the other side of the gate. The gaunt-faced one pointed to the middle-aged man beside him, who wore tinted sunglasses, and said, “Garlic farmers, this is Deputy Director Pang of the County Government Administrative Office. He has instructions.”   “Garlic farmers, I am here on behalf of the county administrator, who wants you all to go home and stop this unlawful and potentially explosive demonstration. Don’t let a few rabble-rousers lead you astray!”   “What about our garlic?” someone shouted.   “The county administrator says that since the co-op cold-storage storehouse is filled to capacity, take your garlic home with you. What you do with it is your business. If you can sell it, well and good. If not, eat it yourselves!”   “Go fuck yourself! You’re the ones who told us to plant the stuff, and now you refuse to take it off our hands. Is this some sick joke?”   “To keep us from selling our crops, you confiscated or smashed the scales!’   “We can’t give the stuff away now!”   “Come out here, Zhong Weimin! Officials who don’t bail people out of jams should fuck off and plant their yams!”   “Back off, garlic farmers!” Deputy Director Pang screamed angrily, his face sweaty. “The county administrator can’t come out now. He has important business to attend to. Don’t you understand that he’s in charge of an entire county? His hands are full just taking care of really important matters. You don’t expect him to sell your garlic for you, too, do you?”   Gao Yang felt his heart go thump as he listened to Deputy Director Pang’s harangue. That’s right, he’s in charge of the whole county, and we can’t expect him to sell our garlic for us, can we? Of course not, even if we have to let it rot. He wished he could quietly leave and go home, but he was boxed in by wagons and farmers. He was nearly in tears.   “Tell him to come out and talk to us!”   “Right! Bring out the county administrator! Bring out the county administrator!”   “Garlic farmers,” Deputy Director Pang shouted, “I’m warning you – turn around and go home, right now, or we’ll call the police and let them teach you some manners!”   “Fellow townsmen,” the horse-faced young man raised his voice, “don’t fall for their scare tactics! We’re not breaking any law. Who says it’s illegal for the people to ask to see the county administrator? He’s an elected public servant, and we’re within our rights to see him.”   “Who the fuck elected him? I couldn’t tell you if his face was black or white! How did he get elected?”   “Zhong Weimin, get out here! Zhong Weimin, get out here!”   “Now you’ve gone too far!” Deputy Director Pang thundered.   “Down with corrupt officials! Down with bureaucrats!” Gao Yang saw Gao Ma climb onto the oxcart and shake his fist.   Gao Ma picked up a bundle of garlic and flung it into the compound. “We don’t want this stuff. Put it on the old masters’ dinner tables!”   “Right, we don’t want it. It’s worthless, anyhow! Get rid of it! Throw it into the county compound to feed the old masters!”   Frenzy gripped the crowd, as thousands of bundles of garlic sprouted wings and flew across the wall, landing in heaps inside the government compound.   Deputy Director Pang turned to make a dash for the building. “Stop him!” someone shouted. “He’s going to call the police!”   The heavy gate shuddered violentiy as the people up front crashed into it. Clubs, fists, feet, shoulders, bricks, and tiles all became weapons as the gate began to yield to the assault.   “Storm the compound! If the county administrator won’t come talk to us, we’ll go find him!”   Emitting one last gasp, the lock snapped, and the gate flew open in the face of a surging tide of people. Poor Gao Yang was swept along, powerless to resist. He hadn’t thrown a single bundle of his precious garlic, and was worried that his donkey might get trampled. But he was not even able to look behind him.   The crowd carried him along, his feet barely touching the octagonal slabs of cement covering the ground; his face was moistened by an icy spray as he passed the fountain. The crowd surged into the office building, where a grand clatter echoed across the tiled floor, compounded by the crisp tinkle of shattering glass, the thud of splintering cabinets, and the shrieks of terrified women. A sense of ecstasy crept into Gao Yang’s mounting anxiety as he saw the destruction of luxurious trappings that induced in him feelings of envy and hatred. As an initial probe, he picked up a flowering cactus in a shallow red-and-pink vase and flung it at a window whose glass was polished until it shone. It parted without a murmur, allowing the vase and its contents to pass slowly through. He ran to the window in time to see the red-and-pink vase, the green cactus, and shards of window glass dance and skitter across the concrete ground. The vase broke, the detached petals scattered in all directions. A gratifying sight. Then he went back, picked up an oval aquarium, and admired the plump black and orange goldfish for a moment. The sloshing water and filthy debris rising from the bottom alarmed the aquarium’s denizens, which began splashing frantically, releasing a fishy odor that he found extremely disagreeable. He flung it against another window, which also disintegrated slowly as he ran up to watch the aquarium float downward, followed by glistening drops of water and sparkling shards of glass. The black and orange goldfish swam in midair. When it hit the concrete below, the aquarium shattered without a sound.   Unsettled by the sight of goldfish flapping around on the concrete below, he looked up and saw that the square was alive with people and animals, all in motion. His donkey and wagon were nowhere in sight, he noted with chagrin. Throngs of people poured into the compound, as a phalanx of armed policemen in white uniforms emerged from a lane east of the square and swarmed over it like tigers on a flock of sheep, swinging their batons to clear a path to the compound. He turned away from the window, concentrating on getting out of there as fast as his legs would carry him. But his way was blocked by dozens of people who by then had flocked into the office. He could hardly believe his eyes when he spotted Fourth Aunt Fang, who had hobbled in on tiny bound feet. A youngster in a white vest with an anchor logo shouted, “This is the county administrator’s office. Let’s hunt him down!” Oh my God! Gao Yang thought, the young man’s shout hitting him like a thunderbolt. The county administrator’s office! It was his vase, his aquarium, his windows. He would have fled if he could, but there were too many sticks and clubs fanning the air between him and the door. Vases with exotic plants came off the floor and began flying out the windows like so many artillery shells. One of them must have hit someone, if the string of screams and curses below were any indication.   Scrolls were ripped off the walls, and one young fellow even smashed a filing cabinet with a dumbbell, sending files, documents, and books tumbling out into a pile. He then used the same dumbbell to smash two telephones on the desk.   Meanwhile, Fourth Aunt was grabbing everything in sight, including some green satin curtains, which she pulled down and began tearing to shreds, as if ripping a rival’s hair. “Give me back my husband!” she screamed through her tears. “I want my husband back!”   While farmers rifled desk drawers, the young fellow put his dumbbell to work smashing the glass top and metal ashtray. The county administrator had cleared out so fast that his cigarette was still smoldering in the ashtray. Spotting a tin of ginseng cigarettes and a box of matches on the desk, the young fellow stuck one of the former between his lips and announced, “I’m going to try out the old magistrate’s throne.” With that he sat down in the county administrator’s rattan chair, leaned back, lit up, and crossed his feet on the desk, looking mighty pleased with himself, as the other farmers rushed up to fight over the remaining cigarettes. Fourth Aunt, who had made a pile of the torn curtains, scrolls, and files, lit a match from the box on the desk and touched it to the satin curtains, which began to burn at once. Amid puffs of smoke, the paper then caught fire, sending tongues of flames snaking up the smashed cabinets by the wall. Falling to her knees, she banged her head on the floor in a kowtow and muttered, “Husband, I’ve avenged your death!”   The fire quickly spread, forcing the farmers into the hallway. On his way out the door, Gao Yang grabbed Fourth Aunt and yelled, “Run for your life!”   Dense smoke swirling up and down the hallway indicated that more than one office had been torched. Everything was shaking – the ceiling above and the stairs below. People ran and clawed for their lives. As Gao Yang dragged Fourth Aunt out the entrance, he thought about the black and orange goldfish, but only for a fleeting moment, since with a thousand heads and twice that many legs fighting over limited space, anyone who stumbled was sure to be trampled – already you could hear the screams. Holding Fourth Aunt’s hand in a deathlike grip, he virtually flew out of the compound, past the blurred faces of seven or eight armed policemen.   3  “Was it you who led the mob that demolished the county administrator’s office?”   “Mr. Jailer, I didn’t know it was his office … I stopped as soon as I found out.” He was on his knees.   “Sit down like you’re supposed to!” the policeman demanded roughly. “Do you mean to say if it had been somebody else’s office it would have been okay?”   “Mr. Jailer, I didn’t know what I was doing. I got swept along with the crowd … I’ve been a model citizen all my life. I’ve never done anything bad.”   “If you weren’t such a model citizen you’d have torched the State Council Headquarters, I suppose,” the policeman said derisively.   “I didn’t start the fire. Fourth Aunt did that.”   A policewoman handed a sheet of paper to the policeman in the center, who read it aloud. “Is this an accurate statement of what you said, Gao Yang?” he asked.   “Yes.”   “Come over here and sign it.”   One of the policemen dragged him over to the desk, where the policewoman handed him a pen. His hand shook as he held it. Were there two vertical strokes in “Yang,” or three? “Three,” the policewoman told him.   “Take him back to his cell.”   “Mr. Jailer,” Gao Yang fell to his knees again and begged, “I’m afraid to go back there …”   “Why?”   “Because they gang up on me. Please, Mr. Jailer, put me in another cell!”   “Let him bunk with the condemned prisoner,” the policeman in the center said to his colleagues.   “Want to bunk with a condemned man, Number Nine?”   “Anything, just so you don’t put me back with them!”   “Okay, but make sure he doesn’t try to kill himself. That’ll be your job, for which you’ll get an extra bun at each meal.”   4  The condemned man, sallow-faced, clean-shaven, with green eyes that rolled around his sunken sockets, terrified Gao Yang, who was in his new cell only a few seconds before realizing what a terrible mistake he’d made. Except for a single cot, the cell was furnished only with a rotting straw mat. The condemned man, manacled hand and foot, hunkered in the corner and glared menacingly at Gao Yang, who nodded and bowed slightly. “Elder Brother, they sent me to keep you company.”   The condemned man’s lips split into what passed for a smile. His face was the color of gold foil, and so were his teeth. “Come over here,” he said with a nod.   Gao Yang was wary, but the manacles were reassuring – how much damage could he do all trussed up like that? Cautiously he approached the condemned man, who smiled and nodded, urging him to come closer, and closer, and closer.   “Elder Brother, is there something you want?”   The words were barely out of Gao Yang’s mouth when the condemned man reached out and banged Gao Yang’s head with the handcuff chain. With a cry of pain, Gao Yang crawled and rolled over to the cell door, followed by the condemned man, who hopped in pursuit, murder in his eyes, his manacles scraping the floor. Gao Yang slipped under the outstretched arms and darted over to the bed, only to be driven back to the door when the man came after him again. That went on another dozen times or so, until the condemned man plopped down on the bed and said through clenched teeth, “Don’t come near me or I’ll bite your head off. Since I’m going to die, I want somebody to lead the way.”   An exhausted Gao Yang forced himself to stay away that night. The overhead light, which was left on twenty-four hours a day, allowed a measure of well-being as he curled up on the floor alongside the door, putting as much distance between him and his cellmate as possible.   The condemned man’s greenish eyes stayed open all night long, and whenever Gao Yang started to doze off, he stood up. Gradually the threat of danger sharpened Gao Yang’s senses: at the first sign of a rattle he sprang to his feet and readied himself for another confrontation.   At dawn the condemned man finally rested his head against the wall and closed his eyes. He looked dead already. Gao Yang recalled hearing people talk when he was just a boy about the scary business of spending the night with a corpse. They said that late at night, when everyone’s asleep, the dead rise to haunt the living, chasing them round and round until cockcrow, when they finally lie down again. The night just past was pretty much like that, except that spending the night with a corpse could earn you a tidy sum, while all he’d get for watching his condemned cellmate was an extra bun at mealtime.   At this rate, he thought, I’ll be dead in a month.   He could kick himself.   Old man upstairs, get me out of here. If you do, I’ll never complain, never fight, never ask for help, even if someone dumps a load of shit on my head.   Excerpt from The Garlic Ballads by Mo Yan, translated from the Chinese by Howard Goldblatt.  Copyright © Mo Yan, 1988  Translation copyright © Howard Goldblatt, 1994  Reprinted by permission of Methuen   Excerpt selected by the Nobel Library of the Swedish Academy.   To cite this section  MLA style: Prose. NobelPrize.org. Nobel Prize Outreach AB 2021. Thu. 8 Jul 2021. <https://www.nobelprize.org/prizes/literature/2012/yan/25486-prose/>   Back to top  Learn more  Nobel Prizes 2020  Twelve laureates were awarded a Nobel Prize in 2020, for achievements that have conferred the greatest benefit to humankind.   Their work and discoveries range from the formation of black holes and genetic scissors to efforts to combat hunger and develop new auction formats.   See them all presented here.  Nobel Prizes 2020 graphics  Explore prizes and laureates  Look for popular awards and laureates in different fields, and discover the history of the Nobel Prize.  Select the category or categories you would like to filter by  Physics  Chemistry  Medicine  Literature  Peace  Economic Sciences  Decrease the year by one-  Choose a year you would like to search in  2012  Increase the year by one+  Explore  About the Nobel Prize organisation  The Nobel Foundation  Tasked with a mission to manage Alfred Nobel's fortune and has ultimate responsibility for fulfilling the intentions of Nobel's will.   The prize-awarding institutions  For more than a century, these academic institutions have worked independently to select Nobel Laureates in each prize category.   Nobel Prize outreach activities  Several outreach organisations and activities have been developed to inspire generations and disseminate knowledge about the Nobel Prize.   Press  Contact  FAQ  Privacy policy  Technical support  Terms of use  For developers  Media player  Join us  Facebook Twitter Instagram Youtube LinkedIn  THE NOBEL PRIZE  Copyright © Nobel Prize Outreach AB 2021  Skip to content  This website uses cookies to improve the user experience. By using this website you consent to all cookies in accordance with our cookie policy.   I understand  Nobel Prizes & Laureates  Physics Prize  Chemistry Prize  Medicine Prize  Literature Prize  Peace Prize  Prize in Economic Sciences  Quick facts  Nomination  Physics Prize  Chemistry Prize  Medicine Prize  Literature Prize  Peace Prize  Prize in Economic Sciences  Nomination Archive  Alfred Nobel  Alfred Nobel’s life  Alfred Nobel’s will  News & insights  Press  In-depth  Events  Public events  Nobel Prize Concert  Nobel Week Dialogue  Nobel Prize Dialogue  Nobel Prize Summit  Nobel Prize Inspiration Initiative  Nobel Prize award ceremonies  Education network  Nobel Prize Lessons  Nobel Prize Teacher Summit   Literature  The Nobel Prize in Literature 2008   Jean-Marie Gustave Le Clézio - Jean Marie Gustave Le Clezio Prose  The Nobel Prize in Literature 2008  Jean-Marie Gustave Le Clézio  Share this  Facebook  Twitter  LinkedIn  Email this page  Jean-Marie Gustave Le Clézio – Prose  English   French  Excerpt from Onitsha  The Surabaya, an aging three-hundred-ton ship of the Holland Africa Line, had just left the dirty waters of the Gironde estuary, bound for the west coast of Africa, and Fintan looked at his mother as if it were for the first time. Perhaps he had never before realized how young she was, how close to him she was, like the sister he had never had. Not really beautiful, but so alive, so strong. It was late afternoon; the sun illuminated her dark gold-flecked hair, the outline of her profile, her high forehead which rounded sharply to meet her nose, the shape of her lips, her chin. There was a clear fuzz on her skin, like that of a fruit. He watched her; he loved her face.   When he turned ten, Fintan decided he would call his mother only by her nickname. Her name was Maria Luisa, but she was called Maou; Fintan, as a baby, could not pronounce her name, and so it had stuck. He had taken his mother by the hand, looked straight into her eyes, and decided: “From today on I shall call you Maou.” He looked so serious that she stood speechless for a moment, then she burst out laughing, a mad laughter that occasionally took hold of her, irresistibly. Fintan had laughed, too, and that had sealed their agreement.   Maou leaned against the wooden handrail and watched the ship’s wake, and Fintan watched her. It was late Sunday afternoon, 14 March 1948 – a date Fintan would never forget. The sky and sea were in­tensely blue, almost violet. The air was still, so the ship must have been moving at the speed of the wind. A few gulls hovered in heavy flight above the rear deck, approaching, then winging away from the mast where the flag with its triple stripes fluttered like an old dish towel. From time to time they dove to the side, calling out in strange harmony with the attendant drone of the propellers.   Fintan watched his mother, and listened with almost painful atten­tion to the sounds around him, to the gulls’ cries. He felt the waves sliding under the ship’s bow as they rose in a prolonged effort to lift the hull, as if taking a breath.   It was the first time. He looked at Maou’s face, the left side, as it gradually became a pure profile in the brilliance of the sky and the sun. Yes, he thought, this was it, this was the first time. And still he did not understand the tightness in his throat, this feeling which made his heart beat and filled his eyes with tears, because it was also the last time. They were going away, nothing would ever be as before. Beyond the white wake the ribbon of land was fading. The silt from the estuary had suddenly given way to the deep blue of the sea. The reed-spiked fingers of sand, where the fishermen’s huts looked like toys, and all the strange shapes on shore – towers, beacons, hoop nets, quarries, block­houses – all were lost to the movement of the sea, drowned in the tide.   /- – -/   Africa burns like a secret, like a fever. Geoffroy Allen cannot tear his eyes away, not even for a moment; he cannot dream another dream. It is the face sculpted with the marks of the itsi, the masked face of the Umundri. In the morning they wait on the quays of Onitsha, immobile, balancing on one leg, like scorched statues, Chuku’s envoys on earth.   It is for them that Geoffroy has remained in this town, despite the horror inspired in him by the offices of the United Africa, despite the Club, despite the Resident and his wife, their dogs who eat nothing but beef filet and sleep under mosquito nets. Despite the climate, despite the routine of the wharf. Despite separation from Maou, and the son born far away whom he did not watch grow up, for whom he is nothing but a stranger.   But they are there every day, on the quay, from dawn, waiting for who knows what, a pirogue to carry them upstream or bring them a mysterious message. Then they leave, they disappear, walking through the tall grass, to the east, on the road to Awgu and Owerri. Geoffroy tries to speak to them, a few words of Ibo, phrases in Yoruba, in pidgin, but they are always silent, not haughty, merely absent, disappearing rapidly in single file along the river, lost to view in the tall grass yellowed by drought. They are the Umundri, the Ndinze, the “ancestors,” the “initiated.” The people of Chuku, the Sun, circled by his halo as a father is circled by his children.   It is the itsi sign. That is what Geoffroy saw on the faces when he first arrived in Onitsha. The sign carved into the skin of the men’s faces, like writing upon stone. It is the sign which entered him, touched his heart, marked him, too, on his too white face, on his skin where from birth there has never been the mark of the burn. But now he feels this burn, this secret. Men and women of the Umundri people, in the streets of Onitsha; absurd shadows wandering in the alleyways of red dust, among the acacia groves, with their herds of goats and their dogs. Only some of them wear on their faces the sign of their ancestor Ndri, the sign of the sun.   Onitsha by J. M. G. Le Clézio, translated by Alison Anderson, is available wherever books are sold or from the University of Nebraska Press 800.755.1105 and on the web at nebraskapress.unl.edu.  Copyright © 1997 by the University of Nebraska Press.  Éditions Gallimard, Copyright © 1992.   Excerpt selected by the Nobel Library of the Swedish Academy.   To cite this section  MLA style: Jean-Marie Gustave Le Clézio – Prose. NobelPrize.org. Nobel Prize Outreach AB 2021. Thu. 8 Jul 2021. <https://www.nobelprize.org/prizes/literature/2008/clezio/25782-jean-marie-gustave-le-clezio-prose-2008-2/>   Back to top  Learn more  Nobel Prizes 2020  Twelve laureates were awarded a Nobel Prize in 2020, for achievements that have conferred the greatest benefit to humankind.   Their work and discoveries range from the formation of black holes and genetic scissors to efforts to combat hunger and develop new auction formats.   See them all presented here.  Nobel Prizes 2020 graphics  Explore prizes and laureates  Look for popular awards and laureates in different fields, and discover the history of the Nobel Prize.  Select the category or categories you would like to filter by  Physics  Chemistry  Medicine  Literature  Peace  Economic Sciences  Decrease the year by one-  Choose a year you would like to search in  2008  Increase the year by one+  Explore  About the Nobel Prize organisation  The Nobel Foundation  Tasked with a mission to manage Alfred Nobel's fortune and has ultimate responsibility for fulfilling the intentions of Nobel's will.   The prize-awarding institutions  For more than a century, these academic institutions have worked independently to select Nobel Laureates in each prize category.   Nobel Prize outreach activities  Several outreach organisations and activities have been developed to inspire generations and disseminate knowledge about the Nobel Prize.   Press  Contact  FAQ  Privacy policy  Technical support  Terms of use  For developers  Media player  Join us  Facebook Twitter Instagram Youtube LinkedIn  THE NOBEL PRIZE  Copyright © Nobel Prize Outreach AB 2021  Skip to content  This website uses cookies to improve the user experience. By using this website you consent to all cookies in accordance with our cookie policy.   I understand  Nobel Prizes & Laureates  Physics Prize  Chemistry Prize  Medicine Prize  Literature Prize  Peace Prize  Prize in Economic Sciences  Quick facts  Nomination  Physics Prize  Chemistry Prize  Medicine Prize  Literature Prize  Peace Prize  Prize in Economic Sciences  Nomination Archive  Alfred Nobel  Alfred Nobel’s life  Alfred Nobel’s will  News & insights  Press  In-depth  Events  Public events  Nobel Prize Concert  Nobel Week Dialogue  Nobel Prize Dialogue  Nobel Prize Summit  Nobel Prize Inspiration Initiative  Nobel Prize award ceremonies  Education network  Nobel Prize Lessons  Nobel Prize Teacher Summit   Literature  The Nobel Prize in Literature 2014   Patrick Modiano - Patrick Modiano Prose  The Nobel Prize in Literature 2014  Patrick Modiano  Share this  Facebook  Twitter  LinkedIn  Email this page  Patrick Modiano – Prose  English   French  Excerpt from Dora Bruder/The Search Warrant  Eight years ago, in an old copy of Paris Soir dated 31 December 1941, a heading on page three caught my eye: “From Day to Day”.* Below this, I read:   PARIS  Missing, a young girl, Dora Bruder, age 15, height 1.55m, oval-shaped face, grey-brown eyes, grey sports jacket, maroon pullover, navy-blue skirt and hat, brown gym shoes. Address all information to M. and Mme Bruder, 41 Boulevard Ornano, Paris.   I had long been familiar with the area around the Boulevard Ornano. As a child, I would accompany my mother to the Saint-Ouen flea markets. We would get off the bus either at the Porte de Clignancourt or, occasionally, outside the 18th arrondissement Town Hall. Always, it was a Saturday or Sunday afternoon.   In winter, on the tree-shaded pavement outside Clignancourt barracks, the fat photographer with the round spectacles and a lumpy nose who offered “souvenir snaps” would set up his tripod amid the stream of passers-by. In summer, he stationed himself on the broadwalk at Deauville, outside the Bar du Soleil. There, he found plenty of customers. But here, at the Porte de Clignancourt, people seemed not to wish to be photographed. His overcoat was shabby and he had a hole in one shoe.   I remember the Boulevard Ornano and the Boulevard Barbes one sunny afternoon in May 1958, deserted. A knot of riot police at each crossroads because of the Algerian situation.   I was in the neighbourhood in the winter of 1965. I had a girlfriend who lived in the Rue Championnet, Ornano 49-20.   Already, by that time, the Sunday stream of passers-by outside the barracks must have swept away the fat photographer, though I never went back to check. What were they used for, those barracks?** I was told they were occupied by colonial troops.   January 1965. Dusk comes at around six o’clock to the crossroads of the Boulevard Ornano and the Rue Championnet. I was non-existent, I blended into that twilight, into those streets.   The last café at the top of Boulevard Ornano on the right was called the “Verse Toujours”.*** There was another, on the left, at the corner of the Boulevard Ney, with a jukebox. The Ornano-Championnet crossroads had a chemist and a couple of cafés, the one on the corner of the Rue Duhesme being the older of the two.   The time I’ve spent, waiting in those cafés … First thing in the morning, when it was still dark. Early in the evening, at dusk. Later on, at closing time …   That Sunday evening, an old black sports car – it looked to me like a Jaguar – was parked outside the nursery school on the Rue Championnet. It bore a sign on the rear: Disabled Ex-Serviceman. The presence of such a car in this neighbourhood surprised me. I tried to imagine what its owner might look like.   After nine o’clock, the boulevard was deserted. I could still see lights at the mouth of Simplon métro station and, almost opposite, in the foyer of the Cinéma Ornano 43. I had never really noticed the building next to the cinema, no. 41, even though I had been passing it for months, for years. From 1965 to 1968. Address all information to M. and Mme Bruder, 41 Boulevard Ornano, Paris.   * “D’hier à aujourd’hui“.  ** During the Occupation of Paris, Clignancourt barracks housed French volunteers serving in the Waffen SS. See David Pryce-Jones, Paris in the Third Reich. London:Collins, 1981.  *** “Keep Pouring”   Excerpt from Dora Bruder, by Patrick Modiano, translated by Joanna Kilmartin.  In UK published under the titleThe Search Warrant  © 1999 by the Regents of the University of California Press.   With the kind authorization of Random House (UK) and of California University Press (USA) for the excerpt in English translation.  With the kind authorization of Editions Gallimard for the excerpt in original French.  www.gallimard.fr.   To cite this section  MLA style: Patrick Modiano – Prose. NobelPrize.org. Nobel Prize Outreach AB 2021. Thu. 8 Jul 2021. <https://www.nobelprize.org/prizes/literature/2014/modiano/25245-patrick-modiano-prose-2014/>   Back to top  Learn more  Nobel Prizes 2020  Twelve laureates were awarded a Nobel Prize in 2020, for achievements that have conferred the greatest benefit to humankind.   Their work and discoveries range from the formation of black holes and genetic scissors to efforts to combat hunger and develop new auction formats.   See them all presented here.  Nobel Prizes 2020 graphics  Explore prizes and laureates  Look for popular awards and laureates in different fields, and discover the history of the Nobel Prize.  Select the category or categories you would like to filter by  Physics  Chemistry  Medicine  Literature  Peace  Economic Sciences  Decrease the year by one-  Choose a year you would like to search in  2014  Increase the year by one+  Explore  About the Nobel Prize organisation  The Nobel Foundation  Tasked with a mission to manage Alfred Nobel's fortune and has ultimate responsibility for fulfilling the intentions of Nobel's will.   The prize-awarding institutions  For more than a century, these academic institutions have worked independently to select Nobel Laureates in each prize category.   Nobel Prize outreach activities  Several outreach organisations and activities have been developed to inspire generations and disseminate knowledge about the Nobel Prize.   Press  Contact  FAQ  Privacy policy  Technical support  Terms of use  For developers  Media player  Join us  Facebook Twitter Instagram Youtube LinkedIn  THE NOBEL PRIZE  Copyright © Nobel Prize Outreach AB 2021  